


  p. 1568 (#493)                      #

United States
Naval Institute
Proceedings
September, 1925
Edited by H. A. Baldridge

IN
ST
VA I
TU
U.S.NL
1873
U. S. Naval Institute
Publication Office: Menasha, Wisconsin
Editorial and Business Office: Annapolis, Maryland


  p. 1568 (#494)                      #


11214, Twin Pop Safety Valve
Any valve or fitting
for any ships
CRANE
Address all inquiries to Crane Co., Chicago
GENERAL OFFICES: CRANE BUILDING, 836 S. MICHIGAN AVENUE, CHICAGO
Branches and Sales Offices in One Hundred and Fifty Cities
National Exhibit Rooms: Chicago, New York, Atlantic City, San Francisco and Montreal
Works: Chicago, Bridgeport, Birmingham, Chattanooga, Trenton and Montreal
CRANE EXPORT CORPORATION: NEW YORK, SAN FRANCISCO, SHANGHAI
CRANE LIMITED: CRANE BUILDING, 886 BEAVER HALL SQUARE, MONTREAL
CRANE-BENNETT, LTD., LONDON
CW CRANE: PARIS, NANTES, BRUSSELS


  p. 1569 (#495)                      #

UNITED STATES
NAVAL INSTITUTE
PRO CE E DINGS
WHOLE No. 271
Vol. No. 51, No. 9
SEPTEMBER, 1925
1606
Contents
EXCELLENCE OF NAVAL MATERIAL By LIEUTENANT COM-
MANDER F. S. CRAVEN, U. S. Navy....
1573
AVIATION AT THE NAVAL ACADEMY. BY CAPTAIN H. A.
BALDRIDGE, U. S. Navy..
1632
NAVAL AVIATION TRAINING. BY CAPTAIN JAMES J. Raby,
U. S. NAVY ..............
1646
AVIATION IN Coast DEFENSE. By CAPTAIN A. W. JOHNSON,
U. S. NAVY ........
1652
STAR IDENTIFICATION DIAGRAM. BY MIDSHIPMAN (NOW
ENSIGN) L. H. BURKHEAD AND MIDSHIPMAN (NOW EN-
SIGN) W. H. BENSON, U. S. Navy ..... ......... 1667
The BRIDGE ACROSS THE ATLANTIC. BY CAPTAIN YATES
STIRLING, JR., U. S. NAVY ......
R., U. S. NAVY ........................... 1669
THE NATION IN ARMS AND NATIONAL DOCTRINE, BY MAJOR
J. M. SCAMMELL, INF. O. R. C. ..................... 1684
PossIBLE IMPROVEMENTS IN OUR GUNNERY TRAINING. By
LIEUTENANT COMMANDER W. H. P. BLANDY, U. S.
NAVY ............
.........
The PANAMA CANAL's Biggest Ship. By CAPTAIN A. W.
HINDS, U. S. Navy ........
1703
GRAPHICAL AIDS TO NAVIGATION. BY LIEUTENANT W. A.
MASON, U. S. Navy .......
1707
A HOME-MADE PLANISPHERE. BY CAPTAIN ALBERT N.
Wood, U. S. Navy, RETIRED ......
...........
1710
A MOORING BOARD PROBLEM. By LIEUTENANT COMMANDER
T. L. Gatch, U. S. Navy
1716
RETARDATION OF SHIPS' SPEED DUE TO TURNING. BY EN-
SIGN W. K. MENDEN HALL, JR., U. S. Navy .......... 1719
DISCUSSION ................................
...........
1723
PROFESSIONAL NOTES ..........
NOTES ON INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS ....
1799
Book REVIEWS ................
................
SECRETARY'S NOTES...........
..... 1815
The writers only are responsible for the contents of their respective articles
Editor, Captain H. A. Baldridge; Assistant Editor, Lieutenant Com.
mander R. S. Field.
Published monthly at 450 Ahnaip St., Menasha, Wis.
Executive, Editorial, and Business Offices, U. S. Naval Institute,
Annapolis, Md.
Entered as second-class matter at the post-office at Menasha, Wis.,
April 4, 1922, and at the post-office at Annapolis, Md., under Act of Aug. 24,
1912. Acceptance for mailing at the special rate of postage provided for
in section 1103, Act of Oct. 3, 1919, authorized Mar. 13, 1922.
Membership dues (including Proceedings), $3.00 a year.
Subscription Rates, $5.00 a year. (Foreign postage extra.) Single
copics, 50c.
Copyright, 1925, by U. S. Naval Institute
....
806
...........................


  p. 1570 (#496)                      #

OFFICERS OF THE INSTITUTE
President
REAR ADMIRAL HENRY B. WILSON, U. S. Navy
Vice-President
REAR ADMIRAL RICHARD H. JACKSON, U. S. Navy
Secretary-Treasurer
Cap;AIN H. A. BALDRIDGE, U. S. Navy
Board of Control
REAR ADMIRAL HENRY B. WILSON, U. S. Navy (ex officio)
REAR ADMIRAL RICHARD H. JACKSON, U. S. Navy (ex officio)
BRIGADIER GENERAL GEORGE RICHARDS, U. S. MARINE CORPS
Captain W. T. CLUVERIUS, U. S. Navy
Captain W. G. DUBOSE, (CC), U. S. Navy
CAPTAIN P. B. DUNGAN, U. S. Navy
COMMANDER BYRON McCANDLESS, U. S. Navy
LIEUTENANT COMMANDER W. G. GREENMAN, U. S. Navy
Captain H. A. BALDRIDGE, U. S. Navy (ex officio)
PAST PRESIDENTS
ADMIRAL DAVID D. PORTER, U. S. Navy, 1873
REAR ADMIRAL JOHN L. WORDEN, U. S. Navy, 1874
REAR ADMIRAL C. R. P. RODGERS, U. S. Navy, 1875-78
COMMODORE FOXHALL A. PARKER, U. S. Navy, 1878-79
REAR ADMIRAL JOHN RODGERS, U. S. Navy, 1879-82
REAR ADMIRAL C. R. P. RODGERS, U. S. Navy, 1882-83
REAR ADMIRAL THORNTON A. JENKINS, U. S. Navy, 1883-85
REAR ADMIRAL EDWARD SIMPSON, U. S. Navy, 1885-87
REAR ADMIRAL STEPHEN B. LUCE, U. S. Navy, 1887-08
REAR ADMIRAL WM. T. SAMPSON, U. S. Navy, 1898-1902
REAR ADMIRAL H. C. TAYLOR, U. S. Navy, 1902-04
REAR ADMIRAL C. F. GOODRICH, U. S. Navy, 1904-09
REAR ADMIRAL RICHARD WAINWRIGHT, U. S. Navy, 1909-11
REAR ADMIRAL BRADLEY A. FISKE, U. S. Navy, 1911-23
Rear ADMIRAL WILLIAM L. RODGERS, U. S. Navy, 1923-24


  p. 1571 (#497)                      #



  p. 1572 (#498)                      #


Bureau of Aeronautics Photo
F-5.L Type of Sea Plane in Which Midshipmen at the Naval Academy Receive Practical Flight INSTRUCTION


  p. 1573 (#499)                      #

UNITED STATES
NAVAL INSTITUTE
PRO CE E D I N GS
Vol. No. 51, No. 9 SEPTEMBER, 1925 WHOLE No. 271
EXCELLENCE OF NAVAL MATERIAL
TRODUCTION
By LIEUTENANT COMMANDER F. S. Craven, U. S. N.
I. INTRODUCTION
THE present paper comprises: first, a study of the factors
which determine material excellence in order to isolate its
principles; second, an examination of our existing material
agencies in the light of these principles; finally, resultant sug-
gestions for improving the agencies and their methods in order
to secure higher quality of our naval material.
By quality is meant both military (functional) and operational
suitability for war. By naval material is meant ships and their
appurtenances. Aircraft would be included.
The reason excellence of naval material has especially engaged
the writer's attention is because it now appears to be the deter-
mining factor of naval superiority. The two other factors,
namely, quantity of material and excellence of personnel, appear
too rigid in character to be determinants, for reasons which
follow.
In the factor of quantity of material we have been restricted
by the Limitation of Armament Treaty in the major types of
ships. It assures us no more than approximate numerical equality
at the logical point of contact.
As regards excellence of personnel, whereas we may naively
consider ourselves superior in intelligence, we should realize that
our short term of enlistment necessarily renders us inferior in
training. Those in a position to know, state that our industrial


  p. 1574 (#500)                      #

Chart I
CONCEPTION
DESIGN
PRODUCTION
MAINTENANCE
1. Maintenance re. 1. Design secures in 1. Mutual interchange
ports troubles. formation furnished of useful technica!
2. Maintenance re-
by Maintenance to experiences.
Conception through 2. Production
ports cases of ex-
does
Record's Office.
ceptionally good
work for Mainte-
service.
2. Design does special nance when its
work for Mainte-
3. Conception must
quantity or special
nance when re-
authorize all altera-
nature requires or
quested.
permits.
tions, after first
considering their
effect with aid of
Design.
PRODUCTION
1. Production keeps 1. Production requests
Conception
I explanations
formed of its capa 1 points not clear in
bilities and limita general designs.
tions.
2. Production informs
Design of imprac-
ticabilities encoun-
tered,
3. Detailing of de-
signs must suit
productive require.
ments.
1. Design makes
"studies" to assist
process of concep-
tion,
2. Conception super-
vises general design
work and standards.
DESIGN
CHART I
Illustrates Interaction Required Between the
Functions Whereby Naval Material Is
Developed, as Described in
Article on
EXCELLENCE OF NAVAL MATERIAL
by
F. S. Craven, U.S.N.
15 March, 1925.


  p. 1575 (#501)                      #

Chart II
THE PRESIDENT
CONGRESS
THE
SECRETARY
L
OF THE
NAVY
PROFESSIONAL,
COUNSEL
POLITICAL
Assistant
SECRETARY
PLAISOM
WAYS
GENERAL
BOARD
MEANS
REVIEW
OF
FINANCE
ESTIM. ACCTO
JAN AND PLANS
GRATING LANS
MATERIAL
PLANS
)
O'N
CNM
SUPERIOR GROUP
TACTICS STRATEGY
STAFF
O
CHART
C.NM.
BUDGET
WAYS
AND
MEANS
TECNNICAL
RESOURC
ELEMENTS
AUXILIARY
FUNCTIONS
WEAPONS!
DIVISION
OF
NAVAL
MATERIAL
INSPECTION
MAINTCE PROD'TION
SUPERVISION OF
FUNCTIONAL
DESION
RECORD
OFFKE
BUR. MAINTENANCE
BUA. PRODUCTION
BUR OF DESIGN
DIVISION
OF
NAVAL
OPERATIONS
ADMINISTRATION
PLANS + ADMIN.
SHIP DESIGN
FABRICATION
HEAVY
SNIPS
ZIGNT
SNIPS
SUB's
AIRCRAFT
CASTINGS
FORGINGS
MY, MACNC
L. MACN&
SHEET MET
NON-METC
HY. SNITS
LT. SHins
Auxiline's
Suo's
JAJRCRAFT
YARDS
MINOR ASSEMAS
STEAM
MACNIN'YI
ELECTA2
MACNINY
AIRCRAFT
Rull:
Aprol:
ORDNANCE
HEAVY
SNPS
LIGHT
SMIPS
Sue's
TVZETTS
TINYPIN
Nowo
plynur
Equimoda
Commun
A
ENGINES
SPECIAL
DEVICES
***
DETAILING
MAJOR ASSEMO'S
THE
REPAIR SHIPS
PROPUL. M.
ORDNANCE
SF. CONTROL
COMMUN'S
Equipe
AERON'Z
7701
TO SUIT
ALLOCATION
FOR
MODATI
La
FLEET
SNIPS
AIRCRAFT
IN917
SHIPS
Suo's
ERECTING +
SHIP BUILDING
YARD
FACILITIES
TESTING
FACILITIES
PROCUREMENT
STORAGE
FS.CRAVEN
U.S.N
EXCELLENCE OF NAVAL MATERIAL
EXPERIMTAL
FACILITIES
-COOAPINATION
COOPERATION
TECMICAL
Suri Arison
INSPECTION
19 MARCH 1993


  p. 1576 (#502)                      #

1576
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
prosperity and the natural ambition of our youth preclude longer
enlistments. The product of superior intelligence and inferior
training cannot result in more than equality with the personnel
of the other large navies.
Material quality, therefore, is the only unlimited variable.
II. Basic CONSIDERATIONS
Naval material is developed through the direct action of con-
ception, design, and production and the indirect participation of
operation and maintenance. The last two, through observing
service performance of material, gain information necessary to
the others. These five functions are the natural bases for fur-
ther analysis, and therefore will be defined at this point.
Conception is the mental process whereby strategical, tactical,
and operational requirements of the fleet are resolved into charac-
teristics for naval material. The first phase of conception, there-
fore, is composition of the fleet. Characteristics of ships, which
naturally develop from it, should, in turn, determine the military
and operational characteristics of the elements of which ships are
composed.
Design is the technical visualization of conception. It embodies
the desired characteristics in a form which will permit manufac-
ture of the material.
Production is the materialization of design, and therefore, like-
wise, of conception. It is the process whereby the mechanism is
built, and consists not only of fabrication of the parts but their
assembly and adjustment; also test of the completed device.
Maintenance is the upkeep of naval material. It involves not
only keeping material in condition but keeping it up to date.
Thus it includes alterations, repairs, and the care of material in
operation.
Operation is the use of naval material. Essentially, this means
its use at sea, in training and in war.
Operation is the competent judge of functional and operational
excellence—that is, how well the material fulfills its purposes.
Maintenance is the competent judge of technical excellence and
to some extent, as will appear, of minor functional excellence.
Thus, the lessons learned by operation and maintenance are
necessary to the progress of both conception and design.


  p. 1577 (#503)                      #

1925)
1577
Excellence of Naval Material
III. CONCEPTION ..
Composition of the Fleet.—Composition of the fleet can be prop-
erly derived only through a comprehensive study of the probable
nature of our possible wars, from the standpoints of strategy, tac-
tics and logistics, together with coordinate consideration of the
trend of scientific development. These considerations enable us to
work out the essential qualities and types of ships we require.
The military qualities of ships are the essential determinants of
excellence of naval material because, although excellence of design
and construction will intensify the quality of well conceived ships,
it cannot rectify the military deficiencies of poorly conceived ones.
Factors Which Determine Composition of the Fleet.—The fac-
tors which determine composition of the fleet are of two general
classes, direct and indirect.
The direct factors are tactical, strategical, and logistical in char-
acter, and may be considered in related groups. The superior
group consists of the tactical handling of ships in battle and the
strategical use of naval forces to attain war objectives. The weap-
ons group, chiefly tactical in character, consists of the technique of
the four essential weapons: namely, gunnery, bombing, torpedo
control, and mining. The auxiliary functions group, which is both
tactical and strategical in character, consists of communications,
ship control, and ship propulsion. The elemental group consists
of personnel, supplies, including fuel and food, and material
maintenance.
The two factors comprised in the superior group are complex,
involving applications of most of the simpler factors.
The superior factor of tactics tends to develop ships for tactical
applications. It would classify them in two categories: namely,
primary types, which are the carriers of the four essential weap-
ons, and secondary types, which aid the tactical application or
supplement the protection of the weapon carriers. Battleships,
aircraft carriers (rather than aircraft themselves), torpedo vessels
including submarines, and mine layers are the present-day tactical
primary types. The secondary tactical types include battle cruisers,
light cruisers, destroyer leaders, mine sweepers, and aircraft.
The other superior factor, strategy, tends to develop ships for
strategical applications, such as scouting, distant screening, con-


  p. 1578 (#504)                      #

1578
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The indirect factors consist of the nature of foreign fleets, war
voying, and commerce destroying, and the logistic functions of
supplying and maintaining a fleet.
plans, scientific progress, and money.
From all foreign fleets we can learn valuable lessons, but the
fleet of our most probable enemy should be the concrete basis of
comparison for our fleet. It may have certain characteristics ac-
centuated to an extent that we cannot safely overlook, or others
inadequately developed, providing opportunities we should not
ignore. Yet we must also provide against the possibility that we
have selected the wrong fleet.
War plans are the primary guides to strategical and logistical
requirements because they have regard to the peculiar problems
of oceans, distances, and economic and psychological resources, as
well as existing fleets of possible enemies. But here, too, we must
have regard to a possible mistake in selecting the paramount war
plan.
Scientific progress is the active means of material advance. It
has two functions: one, to discover and develop naval applications
of technical advances, the other to develop technical solutions for
naval conceptive problems. It is the herald of those revolutionary
material changes which sometimes confer such marked advantage
on their initiators.
Money is the wherewithal for building ships. It equals the
product of quantity and quality. It is on the side of the cheap
weapon rather than the effective weapon; therefore it should be
regarded as a misleading and negative factor. Surrender to the
limitations of money is as dangerous a compromise as any.
The Agency for Determining Composition of the Fleet.—The
logical organization of the agency for determining composition of
the fleet is in accordance with the relations of the foregoing fac-
tors. That is, each group of factors should be represented by
competent personnel. There should be six groups, as follows:
1. The superior group, representing the tactical handling of
naval forces and strategy.
2. The weapons group, representing gunnery, bombing, tor-
pedo control, and mining.
3. The auxiliary functions group, representing ship propulsion,
ship control and communications.


  p. 1579 (#505)                      #

1925)
1579
Excellence of Naval Material
4. The elemental group, representing personnel, supplies, and
material maintenance.
5. The scientific or technical group, representing naval archi-
tecture, marine engineering, ordnance engineering, electrical en-
gineering, aeronautics, chemistry, optics, and perhaps the other
branches of science.
6. The financial group, representing productive and operational
costs, and available funds.
These groups would provide personnel properly fitted to con-
sider enemy fleets, war plans, and other factors not specifically
indicated. The personnel in each group should consist of special-
ists in the several subjects covered by it. By this is not meant
officers who “know it all,” but rather, trained officers who, through
having specialized, will know where to look for their information
and how to interpret it intelligently.
The superior group should constitute the primary motive element
of the agency. It would call on the other groups for information
and for assistance in working out problems of detail.
However, the minor groups should be motive in developing new
conceptions within their special spheres of activity. They should
present and support their respective ideas before the superior
group.
Conflicting Requirements.-Conflicting demands of the minor
groups for weight and space in ships, and even for special types
of ships, can readily be foreseen. Even more serious conflicts can
be foreseen between the rival requirements of tactics and strategy
in the superior group. As will be demonstrated, these tendencies
toward conflict are blessings in disguise if properly handled, and
prospects of serious danger if not.
Tendencies toward conflict produce opposition. This forces each
side to develop essentials and eliminate non-essentials in order to
strengthen its case. It is the method of handling opposition which
determines whether it shall help or harm, in its present application.
There are two methods, coordination and cooperation.
Coordination versus Cooperation.—Coordination is decision by
control. It enables a competent leader, after hearing all sides, to
point out their respective weaknesses, and after the proponents of
the conflicting views have remedied the weaknesses in their re-
spective propositions, the leader, by virtue of his control, can reach


  p. 1580 (#506)                      #

1580
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
a decision between them or prepare a composite solution. This
should result in well articulated and homogeneous plans because
they will have been developed by a single, fully informed mind.
Coordination, therefore, implies a recognized leader.
Cooperation is decision by mutual agreement. Thus, there is no
recognized leader, and the proponents of conflicting requirements
function as a committee. To reach an agreement the committee
members must mutually concede the points not imperative to their
respective necessities, or else one member must attain virtual,
though unrecognized, leadership.
Virtual leadership in a committee can result through several
causes, such as energy, ability, rank or dominance of personality.
The only correct one of these is ability. It is therefore evident
that virtual leadership of this sort is a gamble and is unsafe to
risk. One of its chief objections is that responsibility cannot be
attached to an unrecognized leader.
Nor can responsibility be effectively attached to a committee as
a whole, since no member can safely be held responsible for what
may have been put through against his objections.
Decision by mutual concessions lacks a central idea. The de-
terminants naturally tend to become weight, space, cost, and other
concrete considerations rather than the abstract and more impor-
tant ones of homogeneity and the intensification of primary qual-
ities at the expense of minor ones. Thus, brilliance of conception
generally will be lacking, the tendency being toward mediocrity.
This will be true even if the committee members are very able
men. In fact, intensifying their abilities tends to lower the quality
of their decisions, because increased imagination tends to project
farther ahead, begetting over-development of specialties. Thus,
decisions reached by an able committee tend to resemble the sum-
mation of several divergent forces to secure a resultant force which
may be less than the least of them.
Conception Both Brilliant and Sound.—Conception, obviously,
must be brilliant, if we are to secure excellence of naval material,
but also, it must be sound. For brilliance we require decision
through control, or, in other words, a leader as opposed to a com-
mittee. For soundness this solution does not appear so desirable.
It may quite properly be contended that the co-existence of imag-
ination and sound judgment in a single personality is exceptional.


  p. 1581 (#507)                      #

1925]
1581
Excellence of Naval Material
Perhaps the Navy is a too small organization to have always avail-
able an officer so exceptionally gifted and otherwise qualified that
he could be entrusted with conception without fear of unsoundness.
There is a fortunate solution: Whereas a committee is unsatis-
factory to initiate conception, it is eminently fitted to examine a
completed conception for soundness. Having several points of
view its members will naturally tend to interpret the conception
differently. By discussion these differences will be mutually con-
sidered and other possibilities will be brought to mind. Cooperative
application of imagination and intelligence now becomes highly
desirable in order that a brilliant conception may be appreciatively
considered and that criticisms may be constructively expressed.
The very faults previously found in a committee become positive
virtues when it is used as a board of review for conceptions.
The Serious Nature of Conceptive Mistakes.—The importance
of a correct solution of conceptive problems, especially major
conceptive problems, cannot be over-estimated. This importance
is due partly to the dangerous permanence of conceptive mistakes
and partly to the fact that their existence may not be realized.
Permanence of conceptive mistakes derives from the great cost
and long peace-time lives of ships, and the money and time re-
quired to rectify serious mistakes discovered in them.
Failure to realize the existence of such mistakes is due to the
fact that they may be relative rather than absolute. For instance,
mediocrity of conception, when opposed to brilliance, becomes a
relative mistake which may be revealed only in battle. The aston-
ishing destruction of British battle cruisers at Jutland is an excel-
lent example. Such mistakes are perhaps more deadly for being
less evident.
Relative mistakes result from avoidable compromises and from
failure to visualize battle conditions. Imagination and specialized
knowledge are required to combat the former and avoid the latter.
These are the attributes which are inherent in the conceptive
agency which has been outlined. Its board of review is the safe-
guard against absolute mistakes.
The Nature of the Conceptive Agency.—Thus, we may sum-
marize the logical conceptive agency as a leader with imaginative
specialized assistants and a board of review.


  p. 1582 (#508)                      #

1582
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
But once again we encounter opposition—that between the
leader and the board. Decision cannot be safely left to either,
because normally the leader would tend too much toward revolu-
tion and the board too much toward conservatism. Should they
be unable to agree, decision obviously should be referred to their
common superior, the Secretary of the Navy. But, as he is a
civilian, not competent alone to decide, he would naturally secure
advice from other competent sources, namely the feet, the Chief
of Naval Operations, and the Naval War College.
Deriving Composition of the Fleet.—With this ultimate safe-
guard established, we may now consider the process of deriving
composition of the fleet. The first step, naturally, should be re-
search. The representatives of all specialties should become
investigators in their respective lines, gathering, codifying, and
digesting information. They would study history, war plans,
Naval and Army War College analyses, intelligence reports of
foreign fleets, departmental manuals, fleet manuals and reports,
scientific information, and the like.
The next step should be the formulation, by all the minor
groups, of conceptive suggestions in their respective lines. The
members of the superior group could then use these suggestions in
preparing tentative general solutions of composition of the fleet
from the tactical standpoint and the strategic standpoint.
The leader would now be in a position to consider all three-the
digested data, the suggestions of the minor groups, and the con-
ceptions of the superior group. His decision would thus be well
based.
The superior group under the leader's direction should then de-
velop his plan, assigning detailed work to the appropriate minor
groups or requiring additional research or experimental work from
them when necessary.
When fully developed, the whole conception, with its explana-
tion and basic data, should be reviewed by the board, then revised
by the conceptive agency and again reviewed. This should con-
tinue until agreement be reached or decision by the Secretary be-
come necessary. In any case the Secretary would have to give final
approval.
When approved, the conception would be ready for further de-
velopment into the military, operational, and technical character-
istics of new ships and major alterations to old ones.


  p. 1583 (#509)                      #

1925)
1583
Excellence of Naval Material
A Continuous Process.-But, it should be obvious that com-
position of the fleet must change to keep abreast of progress and
to keep our Navy ahead of others in quality. Theoretically this
implies a state of continuous rather than intermittent change, be-
cause progress is continuous when viewed in all its aspects, but
in practice we cannot lay down new ships except at appreciable
intervals, or extensively alter old ones except occasionally.
If the intervals are long the relative change becomes corre-
spondingly greater. This has several bad effects. New types
vary too greatly from their predecessors for feet homogeneity,
and there would be a period of relative weakness just prior to
materialization of a change. Also, radical changes are less sound
when taken at a single step than when achieved through several
steps.
The lesson here is to make changes at frequent intervals and
in small quantities. Progressive change is growth; abrupt change
is chaos.
We see, then, that composition of the fleet should be fluid. Its
agency should be continuously employed. The steps previously
indicated as consecutive would all be going on practically con-
stantly, keeping pace with progress. Revision of conception of the
fleet would become automatic and practically continuous, yet grad-
ual. Characteristics of needed ships would always be on tap.
Personnel of the Agency.—We are prepared now to consider the
personnel of the agency. The leader is the most important ele-
ment because he is the active factor, whereas the board of review
is the factor of safety. Thus, the leader virtually controls con-
ception. He is given wide powers and a strong position. He is
fortified by possessing a well organized staff of specialized assist-
ants who, under his direction, can develop strong arguments sup-
porting his conceptions. These the board of review might
sometimes find it difficult to combat, even if unsound.
This is a considerable danger. Such a situation is not likely
to develop, but it might. The safeguard against it is responsi-
bility. The leader must accept personal responsibility for his
conceptions. Responsibility is probably the greatest deterrent
against the acceptance and materialization of radical ideas of un-
proved soundness, which is the danger to be most feared—such,
for example, as premature elevation of the aerial bomb to the
position of major weapon.


  p. 1584 (#510)                      #

1584
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
all
Radicalism Not Necessarily Brilliance. At this point it is well
to consider the relation between radicalism and what is meant in
this paper by brilliance of conception.
It might not prove to be a brilliant step to introduce a too radical
innovation even when it is perfectly sound in itself. It might do
more harm than good. The introduction of the dreadnaught is an
example. It invalidated the entire British pre-dreadnaught feet
and offered the Germans an opportunity to gain equality with
comparative ease. That the Germans did not accept this oppor-
tunity does not alter the fact.
A healthier form of brilliance is the avoidance of unnecessary
military compromises. There is a very wonderful example of this
in the development of the vertical echelon turret arrangement
whereby both broadside and end-on fire was secured for the same
guns.
Avoidance of unnecessary compromise depends on recognition
and accentuation of cardinal requisites, diminution or elimination
of nonessentials, and the incorporation of only well suited charac-
teristics in a type of ship. In other words, it results from imag-
inative and highly intelligent decision between:
a) The tactical requirement of few types to permit type versatil-
ity and few ships to promote coordination in battle ;
b) The strategical requirement of numerous ships to cover
large areas and special types for specialized functions, and
c) The previously described requirement that only well suited
characteristics should be incorporated in a type.
It is not suggested that we always should discourage new de-
partures, but for reasons indicated above, we should not favor
those which destroy existing values unless the need is imperative
and the gain certain.
The Leader.—Returning now to the leader, it is apparent with-
out further demonstration that he must be a line officer of wide
experience and demonstrated capacity.
His Active Assistants.—His assistants in the superior group
should be inferior to him only in experience. They should con-
sist of line officers of two classes—those who are especially quali-
fied in tactics and those equally qualified in strategy. Possibly one
of each type would suffice.


  p. 1585 (#511)                      #

1925]
1585
Excellence of Naval Material
The weapons group should consist of four groups of line special-
ists representing respectively, gunnery and the battleship, bombing
and the airplane carrier, torpedo control and the destroyer and
submarine, and mining and the mine layer.
The auxiliary functions group also should consist of line
specialists because their knowledge is desired as to operating re-
quirements, not as to design which would be supplied by the scien-
tific group.
The elemental group should consist of medical, supply, and line
officers. The medical representative should participate actively
to safeguard health as well as to provide for handling battle
casualties. The supply and line officers should have had extensive
experience in the duties of the feet train.
The scientific or technical group should consist of technical
specialists of the highest qualifications. The Navy would be best
served by them were they commissioned officers; therefore they
will be referred to hereafter as technical officers.
One of their important functions is to develop technical solutions
for conceptive problems. Being in touch with the trend of con-
ception they should be able to foresee these problems and so to
determine, before they become prominent, whether they can be
met. This necessitates that these officers shall have access to all
experimental facilities possessed by the Navy.
The financial group should consist of officers experienced in
cost estimating and accounting. They must be able to prepare
estimates for conceptive propositions. They obviously should be
officers of the supply corps experienced in this work.
The board of review should consist of line officers of wide gen-
eral experience. It should have at least six members in addition
to its secretary, for a reason which will develop later. The pur-
pose of this board is to ensure soundness of conceptions as regards
military and operational features rather than technical ones; there-
fore, technical personnel is not required.
Rotation of Line Personnel.—The bulk of the personnel is seen
to consist of line officers, and line officers must go regularly to sea.
Sea service is also necessary for the staff officers in the elemental
group to qualify them for this assignment.
Persistence of Policy.—However, these necessary line changes
tend to cause a serious evil which may be described as abrupt


  p. 1586 (#512)                      #

1586
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
changes in conceptive policy. This danger is most pronounced
when a change occurs in the leader because another mind thereby
takes over the control of major conception. Changes in the line
personnel of the groups under him are also dangerous because the
leader must depend upon his assistants to work out specialized
conceptive details in consistence with his major conceptions. Thus,
unless carefully broken in, new assistants might cause minor, yet
dangerous, alterations in policy.
Perhaps the most serious result of abrupt change in conceptive
policy would be disruption of homogeneity of the fleet. Such a
result would normally be possible only through an abrupt and
uncoordinated change of the conceptive leader. However, there
are other minor, though still very serious, results which might be
expected from similar changes among the personnel of the groups
of the conceptive agency.
One would be the tendency for a new specialized member to stop
developments initiated by his predecessor, the advantages of which
his unattuned mind might fail to see. This would waste time and
money, and might deprive the Navy of ultimately valuable de-
velopments.
The other would be the tendency for the new incumbent to start
premature developments of his own, induced by his sudden con-
tact with new and large problems and with so much imaginative
thought all around him. Being premature, such developments
often would be trivial and sometimes not truly relevant, tending
also to waste time and money.
A reasonable persistence of policy therefore becomes an im-
portant requirement.
Permanence of Personnel.—To secure it we require the greatest
possible permanence of personnel, consistent with sea duty, in both
the staff of the leader and in the board of review, with reasonable
overlaps in effecting changes.
This personnel permanence can be secured by a method sim-
ilar in principle to that employed in the U.S. Senate. In brief,
a third of the sea-going members of the staff of the leader, and a
third of the board of review, could be replaced each year by per-
sonnel from afloat. Such replacements should be made on a
schedule carefully worked out to prevent the simultaneous relief of
officers whose duties are closely allied.


  p. 1587 (#513)                      #

1925]
1587
Excellence of Naval Material
The leader should have a considerable overlap with his succes-
sor. It would also seem advisable that the leader should have a
two or four year assignment, so as to synchronize closely with
the incumbency of the Secretary of the Navy under whom he must
work.
This brings up the analogous point that the leader should select
the officers to come each year to his staff.
Personnel Changes in the Technical Group.—The members of
the technical group of the conceptive leader's staff are very favor-
ably situated. They are in touch with both the military problems
and the developments of science. As has already been suggested,
they therefore are competent to suggest military applications of
new technical developments as well as to find technical solutions
for problems of purely military and operational origin.
These technical officers also are situated, as will appear, to
assist actively in design and development work. This is because
their purely conceptive duties would not absorb much actual time,
and because to be eligible to perform these duties they should be
leaders in their respective lines. They therefore can be employed
with great advantage to the Navy to coordinate technical design
practices in their respective lines throughout all classes of naval
material.
Periodic changes among these officers, therefore, would be un-
desirable, as this would tend to alter the policy of technical design.
Also, when the proper technical man for a special job has been
found, the best results generally will be had if he be kept at it.
On the other hand, technical stagnation must be guarded
against. A logical solution is to allow the leader to replace mem-
bers of his technical staff, because they must work with him and
he should be sufficiently aware of their service reputations to make
a suitable choice. But, it is suggested that he should not change
more than one fourth of them in a year.
Characteristics of Ships.—The second phase of conception is
the development of ship characteristics from the military speci-
fications of composition of the fleet. That is, it marks the transi-
tion from the abstract to the concrete. In brief, it involves
preliminary ship design and includes operational as well as purely
military considerations.


  p. 1588 (#514)                      #

1588
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Development of Ship Design.--The process is about as follows:
The conceptive requirements are evolved into tentative character-
istics with the aid of general data from previous designs. Ship
designers then attempt to realize these requirements in a prelim-
inary design. This discloses possibilities and limitations. Neces-
sary readjustments are made and a modified design is developed.
The process of readjustment of requirements, with consequent
modification of design, continues until a satisfactory solution is
reached.
This solution is the general design of the ship. It is the graphic
expression of ship characteristics. The judge of its suitability
obviously should be the agency which developed the conceptive
requirements, namely, the agency which determined the com-
position of the fleet.
The conceptive agency, therefore, should be not only the judge
of final suitability but also of the necessary readjustments to meet
limitations disclosed in developing the design. Remembering that
the conceptive agency includes both technical and operative person-
nel of marked attainments, it will be evident that it is qualified to
judge these readjustments.
The process of development, as outlined above, is a series of
steps apparently taken consecutively, but there are excellent rea-
sons why they should, instead, form a continuous process. These
are as follows:
Continuous Supervision of Ship Design by Conception. If the
conceptive agency, after stating its initial requirements, should
continuously observe the development of the preliminary design
instead of waiting until it is completed to examine it, there would
result a meeting of conceptive problems as they develop. The
combined brains of the conceptive and design agencies would be
simultaneously applied to their solution. Solutions of problems
would, from the beginning, conform to the ideas of the conceptive
agency, which is the ultimate judge. Characteristics not satis-
factory to the conceptive agency would not creep unobserved into
the design.
The last mentioned tendency is due to the difficulty of conveying
to the mind of the designer exactly what the conceiver desires.
It is rendered dangerous where no continuous conceptive obser-
vation of design exists, because it is almost impossible for a person


  p. 1589 (#515)                      #

1925]
1589
Excellence of Naval Material
reviewing completed design work to realize the full significance
of some of its details.
Where the conceptive agency continuously observes design, the
preliminary design becomes a fully developed one so far as the
requirements of the conceptive agents are concerned. This would
cause a great saving of time over the trial-and-error method of
development where conception and design function consecutively
instead of together.
Checking Up on Changes. However, with this plan there is the
danger that in watching the growth of detailed design the con-
ceptive agents may fail to realize all aspects of the developments
which have been made, or of the readjustments from the original
conceptive specifications which have been found necessary. They
might "fail to see the woods for the trees.”
This danger would be met by requiring radical readjustments to
be considered by the conceptive agency as a whole, and by pre-
senting completed designs for examination to the board of review.
Consideration of readjustments by the whole conceptive agency
would prevent individual conceptive agents from tending to assume
unwarranted initiative or responsibility. This would safeguard
the relations between the conceptive agency and the design agency.
Examination of initial designs by the board of review probably
would disclose matters requiring attention; therefore initial de-
signs usually would be preliminary designs after all.
Participation by Conception in Design Work.—It is believed
that the principle has now been developed that agents of concep-
tion should continuously participate in ship design, to the extent
of watching and assisting the incorporation of military and opera-
tion features.
Conceptive Control of Ship Design.—Participation by concep-
tive agents in design developments raises the old question of co-
operation versus coordination. Should conception control design
or merely cooperate with it?
The writer believes that to this point in the analysis most of its
technical readers will have agreed with the conclusions which have
been indicated, but the suggestion of conceptive control—virtually,
line control-of technical designers may prove less acceptable.
Yet this control is really necessary for securing excellent naval
material. However, the nature of the advocated control should


  p. 1590 (#516)                      #

1590
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
not be misunderstood by either technical or line readers. There-
fore the necessity for the control will be demonstrated and its
nature carefully elaborated, trusting that the reader, in view of
this explanation, will make necessary allowances for the psycho-
logical limitations of the writer's style.
Conception must be satisfied with the product of design. Con-
ception accepts responsibility before the service for the military
and operational features of a design, and since these are the de-
terminants of naval excellence, conception must virtually accept
full responsibility for design. Therefore conception should be
able to guide and direct the activities of ship designers insofar as
military and operational matters are concerned. But this is
tantamount to control of design. Certainly it is not cooperation
with design.
There should be no question of the ability of properly selected
and trained line officers to work with technical officers to advantage
in developing designs. This is partly because line officers are the
only officers whose experience gives them first hand knowledge of
the battle and sea-going requirements of naval material. It is
partly because all line officers actually are technical officers in a
limited sense—that is, they are operative engineers, and unless
they are as good operative engineers as the technical officers are
designing engineers, the Navy will not be worthy of its purpose.
Line officers are not like automobile owners, who are always
being treated to surprises by the ingenuity of automotive designers.
They are, or at least those in conceptive positions should be,
analogous to the imaginative members of the automotive design
staff who concern themselves with studying the requirements of
the public and who direct technical designers in realizing these
requirements.
Many excellent examples of line control and supervision of de-
sign can be found in the history of fire control developments for
the Navy by the several commercial firms which specialize in this
sort of work. The designing engineers of these companies often,
through long experience, will have perhaps better ideas, in the
abstract, than will the individual line officers who supervise their
work. But, because the latter represent the controlling theory of
gunnery development, of the trend of which these civilian technical
men are necessarily somewhat uninformed, they not only defer to


  p. 1591 (#517)                      #

1925]
1591
Excellence of Naval Material
supervision by the line representatives but, in most cases, would re-
fuse to proceed without their supervision.
Technical Impracticability.-- Modifications in original. concep-
tions are often forced by technical impracticabilities which only
develop during design work. Where this impracticability is ob-
vious, modifications cannot be avoided, but where there is doubt
(of which the technical group of the conceptive agency should be a
competent judge) there will be seen an additional reason to favor
conceptive control of design. This is the fact that where imprac-
ticability is not readily admitted, the result often will be a brilliant
ultimate solution of the problem.
Conceptive Control of Technical Design.—The principle, there-
fore, appears to be established that conception should control tech-
nical design wherever conceptive requirements are involved with it.
Characteristics of Elements of Ships.—The third phase of con-
ception is the development of the characteristics of elements which
comprise ships-for example, the ordnance installation, or the
propulsive plant.
These are the component parts of ships. They represent the
great weights and volumes which must be fitted together into the
hull; but the design of these elements must be virtually completed
before a ship design can be composed of them, since the weights
and positions of their parts are required for stability calculations
and their dimensions are required for apportioning the available
space.
It will be seen, then, that it is these elements which constitute
the variables of ship design. It will be seen that most design im-
practicabilities will develop through inability to fit these elements
together in their hoped-for proportions.
Conceptive Control of Design of Elements. From this it fol-
lows that the participation of conceptive agents in ship design
necessarily involves their similar participation in the general design
of elements. All of the elements of ships have representatives in
the proposed conceptive agency, and the desired characteristics of
the ship would be compounded from the ideas of these officers as to
the form these elements should take.
Thus, conception should continuously supervise the general de-
sign of all elements of ships.


  p. 1592 (#518)                      #

1592
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Characteristics of Operational Devices.—By operational de-
vices is meant the minor operative units which comprise the ele-
ments of ships. As examples, there are gun mounts, torpedo
tubes, airplane catapults, and the steering gear.
Conceptive Control of Design of Minor Devices.- Just as de-
sign of its elements is involved in the design of the ship, so is
design of operational devices involved in the design of elements.
Conception, therefore, should extend its influence down to them,
and to the same extent.
It is in considering such details that the respective interests of
conception and technical design can be made most clear. Two
examples, of differing degree, will be given.
First consider a gun mount for a light cruiser. Conception de-
sires that the gun have a certain range, and for this it is found by
the technical designer that an angle of elevation is required of,
say, twenty degrees; but, conception knows that pointer fire may
become necessary for this gun. To secure the desired range with
pointer fire in a twenty-degree roll, an additional ten degrees of
elevation is needed. Also, if the ship is damaged a list may be
expected up to, say, five degrees. Conception, therefore, requires
that design endow the mount with an elevation up to thirty-five
degrees.
For the other example, consider arrangements for lubricating
the gun mount. After considering all the lubricating arrangements
known to design, conception selects the “alemite” or some other
system which involves the psychological principle of convenience.
This is because conception, represented by line officers, knows that
bluejackets can be driven to use grease cups but can be led to use
the "alemite” or a similar system.
We can now state a general principle affecting excellence of
naval material: namely, line officers should participate in the de-
velopment of all general designs as regards the incorporation of
military or operational features.
Line Officers Keep Out of Technical Design.-Conversely, they
should not participate as regards purely technical design matters,
because modern technical design has become so highly specialized
that in order to secure excellence the technical designer must give
his entire time to it. The alternative periods of sea duty required


  p. 1593 (#519)                      #

1925]
1593
Excellence of Naval Material
of line officers necessarily unfit them to become also technical de-
signers of the grade we require.
General Design versus Detailing.-Reference has heretofore
been to general design in order to differentiate it from detailing,
which is the final step whereby a design is prepared for production.
Thus, detailing is purely technical and marks the point at which
all conceptive line participation should stop.
Forms of Design.—We may now conveniently recognize the
existence of three forms of design: namely,
Functional design, which involves the inclusion of purely mili-
tary requisites. For example, turning radius of a hull, seaworth-
iness, protection, speed, elevation of guns, arcs of train, use of
center-line space, and the like.
Operational design, which involves the inclusion of non-military
operational requisites. For example, measures for economy of
operation or ease of upkeep, convenience or comfort of personnel,
ruggedness of equipment, and the like. Both line and technical
officers are qualified to participate in operational design, the for-
mer as to results, the latter as to their attainment and as to the
introduction of additional possibilities due to scientific progress of
which the line officer could not be aware.
Technical design, which involves matters of strength, weight,
shape, and kind of material (except where these may be affected by
legitimate functional or operational requirements) and detailing to
permit production.
Simultaneous Development of All General Designs. It has
been shown that it was better for the agents of conception and
technical design to work together in developing ship design than
for them to perform their respective functions in alternate con-
secutive steps. For identical reasons it is also better for the de-
velopment of all the general designs of a single ship to progress
more or less together under the supervision of the same conceptive
and technical personnel.
This would permit immediate adjustment all along the line to
changes found necessary at either end—that is, changes due to
technical difficulties in producing the elementary parts or to diffi-
culties encountered in getting the parts properly disposed in the
ship as a whole.


  p. 1594 (#520)                      #

1594
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Single Design Agency.—Also, this would bring all design into
a unified system coordinated and controlled by a relatively small
group of minds. The advantages of this should be apparent.
They will be fully brought out in the following section of the paper.
IV. DESIGN
Ship Design. From the viewpoint of ship design naval material
is classified as to types of ships. Aircraft would constitute two
special types in this classification.
Types of ships fall into three characteristic groups: namely,
surface ships, submarines, and aircraft. These will now be ex-
amined as to the problems they present.
Surface Ship Design.—The functional natures of the principal
elements of surface ships vary widely but the problems which
constitute technical ship design are similar. In other words, there
are wide variations in the special problems of hull, propulsive
plant, ordnance, and the like, but marked similarity in the general
calculations for stability, trim and displacement.
It follows that all surface ship design should be performed by
a single agency in order to have a centralized collection of technical
information and facilities, and to permit general application of
the available technical brains. Presumably, there would develop
subdivisions for the several distinctive types, but this would not
prevent temporary disposition of technical personnel and facilities
to the best advantage during intensified activity in certain types.
The foregoing advantages may be classified as reduction of
overhead cost, due to the ability to employ personnel and facilities
according to the distribution of the work load, and intensification
of technical excellence, due to gathering together, and applying
generally, the best brains and all of the available information.
Submarine Design. - Submarine design involves two technical
problems, one being the design for surface operation and the other
for submerged operation. The former is identical with surface
ship design.
In view of the fact that submarines must, therefore, be designed
also as surface vessels, there would be obvious advantages in add-
ing submarine design as a special section to the single agency for
surface ship design.


  p. 1595 (#521)                      #

1925)
1595
Excellence of Naval Material
Aircraft Design.—There is no direct relation between the tech-
nical problems of aircraft design and those of ship design except
the very minor problem of developing hulls of Aying boats. This
limited relation is non-essential.
But, there are obvious functional and operational design rela-
tions between heavier-than-air craft and their carriers. In order
to secure coordination rather than cooperation in these important
relations it is desirable to bring the design of heavier-than-air craft
into the same agency which designs their carriers, forming another
special section of the ship design agency.
Single Agency for All Ship Design.—Again, since lighter-than-
air craft use engines and fittings similar to those of heavier-
than-air craft, it follows that they, too, should be designed in a
special section of the centralized ship design agency. There should,
then, be a single centralized agency for all ship and aircraft design.
Design of Elements of Ships.—Elements of ships may logically
be classified in two ways. One is a combined functional and op-
erational classification and the other is technical.
The functional and operational classification consists of hull,
propulsive plant, ordnance, aeronautical equipment, fire control
equipment, ship control equipment, communications equipment,
personnel facilities, storage facilities, and “equipage." These
correspond fairly well with the operating departments of ships.
Each covers a wide range of devices which are related because
they are parts of the same system or of several systems operated
by the same branch of personnel.
The technical classification consists of naval architecture, steam
engineering, electrical engineering, mechanical engineering, hy-
draulics, ballistics, optics, aeronautics, chemistry, and perhaps
others. These are the branches of engineering science involved in
the technical development of naval materia.
There are obvious inter-relations between these classifications.
As examples, electric motors are used in ordnance and in pro-
pulsive and "equipage” devices; gear wheels, valves, and pipe
fittings are used in almost all operative classes of equipment; op-
tical devices are used for ship and fire control and for communi-
cations. Thus, these classifications inter-lock. .
Single Agency for Design of All Elements of Ships.--Applying
principles developed earlier, we remember that line representatives


  p. 1596 (#522)                      #

1596
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
from the conceptive agency should supervise functional and op-
erational design, and technical representatives should supervise
technical design. This means that simultaneous inter-locking super-
vision will be required, which can only be effective if all elements
are developed in a single agency so that coordination can replace
cooperation.
The agency can now be visualized. It would be subdivided
"vertically” into the functional and operational classes, and "hori-
zontally" into the technical classes. The line specialists of the con-
ceptive agency would supervise functional and operational design.
The actual work of design would be conducted by technical de-
signers who belong to the regular personnel of the design agency.
The technical specialists of the conceptive agency would sift
laterally through the organization, carrying out the supervision
and standardization of technical design previously described.
Benefits from this Arrangement.-We should then receive the
following benefits.
1. Coordination of functional and operational requirements of
mutually dependent devices would be effected by the line concep-
tive agents who supervise ship design as a whole. Reference is to
such matters as locating ammunition hoists, duplicating power
leads for safety on unarmored ships and routing them to the best
advantage, providing reserve sources of power, subordinating boat
stowages to gunnery requirements, safeguarding airplanes from
gun blast, and the like.
2. Similar and uniformly high grade technical characteristics
in all devices of the same technical nature would be ensured by the
technical conceptive agents. By this is meant that all electrical
equipment would be similar in the theory of its technical design,
and that mechanical appliances, such as pipe fittings, bolts and
nuts, gear wheels and the like, would be standardized very con-
siderably. Optical work would be standardized. So would many
other technical details.
The advantages would be felt in operating and maintaining the
equipment as well as in designing and producing it. Performance
would be high because the best available brains and knowledge
would be generally applied in design. Upkeep would be cheaper.
Spare parts would be generally applicable. Production would be
simplified.


  p. 1597 (#523)                      #

1925)
1597
Excellence of Naval Material
3. Flexibility of design resources would be secured. Personnel
and facilities could be allocated according to the work load. Rec-
ords would be complete and universally accessible. The best
brains would be generally available.
4. Design progress would be rapid and could be intelligently
controlled to suit the relative urgency of projects.
5. Experimental requirements could be accurately visualized,
their relative urgency determined, and the work controlled. As
has been indicated previously, the technical conceptive agents
should control experimental work.
Centralized Records.-Several references have been made to
centralized records.
Design records should include, among other things, the history
of all development and experimental work. The history of all
failures is an essential requirement. Such records would pre-
vent repetition of work. They sometimes would enable failures to
be turned into successes when scientific progress had overcome the
original obstacles. They often would permit useful applications
of principles incorporated in obsolete and forgotten devices.
These advantages represent savings of time and money as well
as intensification of knowledge, but in order to secure them the
records must be properly handled.
Handling of Records.—To prevent repetition of developments
it is necessary that all records of similar nature be brought to-
gether. They must be grouped and indexed under both functional
and operational subjects and technical ones. These requirements
can be met only through a single centralized records office with
especially qualified and trained personnel.
To permit useful application of old principles a system is neces-
sary to bring them to light at the proper time This system must
be superior to the memory of individuals.
In order that failures may become successes if still applicable,
the system must connect scientific advances with old obstacles, and
notify the personnel concerned.
Duties of Records Office.—The foregoing requirements would
be met if the personnel of the records agency include qualified
line, staff, and technical officers representing the several functional,
operational, and technical specialties, who perform the following
duties :


  p. 1598 (#524)                      #

1598
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
a) Research for the conceptive agency. This would keep them
aware of problems.
b) Records clerks for their several specialties. They would
index all intelligence reports, and reports from afloat and from
maintenance agencies, as well as reports of experiments and of de-
velopments by conceptive and design agencies. This would famil-
iarize them with new information.
c) Historians for their specialties. This requires them to relate
new developments with previous ones, studying the tendencies in-
dicated thereby. It is a continuous digestive process applied to
all data in the records, and would keep them familiar with appli-
cations of information on hand.
d) Active informative agents. They must see that the con-
ceptive and design agents are kept informed of potentially useful
matter disclosed by the records.
There would be required a permanent personnel for clerical
work which, through permanence, would serve as a link between
the necessarily changing officers described above. Line and staff
members should change at three-year intervals with considerable
overlaps. Technical members preferably should have longer
assignments. .
Experimental Work.-Experiments have also been referred to
repeatedly. Having demonstrated that all general design work
should be centralized and that development records should be cen-
tralized, it follows as a matter of common sense that experimental
work also should be centralized. This will not be completely
attainable from the physical standpoint because gun proving
ranges, which have experimental applications, cannot be close to
industrial centers, and torpedo testing ranges depend on water
conditions which must be used where found. But it is possible
• from the administrative standpoint, and many of the required ex-
perimental facilities can be centralized physically.
Shop Development of Trial Models.-Experimental work is
conception developed directly in material form. It is functional and
operational design without mandatory drafting assistance. Viewed
in the latter light, it will be clear that the technical designers actu-
ally conducting design development will often find it very advan-
tageous to work directly in experimental shops with the aid of high
class workmen. In this manner many working models of new


  p. 1599 (#525)                      #

1925]
1599
Excellence of Naval Material
devices can be fully developed without drafting assistance other
than making occasional sketches. Working drawings can be made
from the models, refining details, substituting castings for parts
hewn out of stock in producing the model, combining groups of
little parts into bigger single parts, and the like. Production can
immediately follow the detailing of these drawings, with safety.
Of course this practice is limited to small and moderate sized
developments. It is followed extensively in commercial engineer-
ing, but the necessary facilities must be immediately available to
the design agency to make it practicable. Its advantages are the
clarity with which the designer can see his problems and the re-
duction of cost. The latter would be lost unless the experi-
mental laboratory were located close to the central design agency.
Detailing.–Detailing is the process of preparing a design for
production. It is the final phase of design.
It is purely technical in character. Its primary object is to
facilitate production, and for this purpose it is necessary that the
needs of production shall be understood. The most practical and
efficient way to ascertain productive needs is to work directly with
the productive agents.
Decentralization of Detail Design.—If general designs are prop-
erly prepared they generally can be detailed without further direct
reference to the original designer, provided the detailing personnel
has been trained in the same school of design. In naval work this
would, of course, be the case.
From this it follows that detailing can safely be de-centralized.
In brief, detailing agencies should be located physically close to
the various productive agencies in order to permit efficient coor-
dination of detailing with production.
A very material additional advantage is that the centralized gen-
eral design agency can thereby be reduced very greatly in size.
This would facilitate its administration and coordination. It would
greatly promote the efficiency of simultaneous interlocking super-
vision of general design by the functional, operational and tech-
nical agents of conception.
The Design Agency as a Whole.-From what has been devel-
oped it will be apparent that there should exist a centralized design
agency for all naval material, with a few de-centralized branches.


  p. 1600 (#526)                      #

1600
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The centralized design agency should consist of a branch for
general design, a branch for experimental work, and a records
office. The first and last named elements should be situated in the
same building occupied by the conceptive agency.
The general design branch should consist of a major section for
ship design and a minor (even though more extensive) section
for the general design of elements of ships and their components.
Each of these sections should be subdivided appropriately. Each
subsection and section, and the branch as a whole, should be headed
by qualified technical officers of wide design experience.
The experimental branch should be headed by a technical offi-
cer of wide general experience. The branch should be subdivided
so as to serve the conceptive agency and the general design branch
to the best advantage. It also should assist in solving productive
problems, as will appear. The personnel should be technical.
The records office has been fully described already.
The decentralized branches would consist of the several design
detailing offices at the various productive plants, and of a partial
interest in gun proving grounds and torpedo testing ranges.
Proving grounds and torpedo ranges are not only experimental
in their use, but are largely testing stations for production. It
would be economically wasteful to have duplicate facilities because
of this mutual need, and therefore we see also a need for co-
ordination of design and production so that both can use the
same facilities of this nature.
Since production really would have the major interest in these
stations, for testing completed work, the officers commanding
them should be selected from the productive standpoint, as will be
demonstrated in the next chapter.
Design detailing offices should be headed by technical officers
representing the central design branch, from which they should
be administered, but they require coordination with production, in
a form which can be foreseen.
The design agency as a whole should be coordinated by a tech-
nical officer of wide general experience who may conveniently be
called the director of design.


  p. 1601 (#527)                      #

1925]
1601
Excellence of Naval Material
V. PRODUCTION
Production affects excellence of naval material chiefly through
quality of workmanship and economy of funds.
Quality of Il'orkmanship.-Quality of workmanship depends
only partly on the quality of the workmen and their tools. The
other factors are careful inspection and the use of the best meth-
ods of fabrication, assembly, erection, and test.
There is only one best method of accomplishing anything. It
can be recognized only by a person qualified to judge, and who is
in a position to know accurately the details of all the possible
methods.
To secure the desired results the best method must be used
wherever it applies. That is, it must be in general use. But, to
keep a method in general use, it is necessary to coordinate effec-
tively all agencies in which it is applicable.
As has been demonstrated previously, effective coordination re-
quires control, but also it depends to a considerable extent on the
ability to make control effective. The latter becomes difficult if
productive work is widely extended, and simple if it is condensed.
Therefore, as regards use of the best methods, it is essential
that all similar productive work be centrally controlled and that it
be condensed in territorial extent sufficiently to permit effective
supervision by the agents of control, that is, inspection.
For inspection, the essential requirements are intelligence and
thoroughness.
Intelligent inspection depends upon accurate and complete
knowledge by the inspector of what is required. Furthermore, it
often happens, during inspection work, that if the inspector also
knows why it is required and who requires it, he can greatly ex-
pedite and facilitate progress. In brief, the inspector (that is, the
supervising inspector) should be a trained specialist in the line of
work he inspects, and should be effectively controlled in his
activities. .
Inspection starts with selecting materials, progresses through
fabrication of parts, minor assemblies (such as electric motors
or torpedo gyros), major assemblies (such as ammunition hoists or
whole torpedoes), erections (such as installing propeller shafting
in a hull), and ends with testing for final acceptance. Its charac-
ter progresses gradually from purely technical to both operational


  p. 1602 (#528)                      #

1602
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
and technical. The whole process, therefore, requires both tech-
nical and operative (line) specialists.
Thorough inspection depends on adequate supervision, and
knowledge of requirements. As has been discussed above, ade-
quate supervision depends on an adequate force of supervisors
kept to the required standard by centralized control.
It will be apparent that with condensed production the number
of inspectors would be less and supervision and control of them
simpler.
Economy of Funds.--Economy in the use of funds for produc-
tion depends largely on reduction of overhead costs, effective shop
management, and the use of economical methods. It depends
also, in the last analysis, on reduction of incidental costs. For
instance, compare the cost of shipping both fuel and raw material
with the cost of shipping completed parts.
Overhead costs include not only administrative costs but those
due to duplication of power sources and other facilities.
With respect to administrative costs and to the previously de-
duced principle of physical concentration of similar processes, it is
important to note that naval material in general is classified in three
different ways during the process of production. The first classi-
fication is according to the trades or processes by which parts are
fabricated. The second is according to the technical units of minor
assemblies. The third is according to the operational and func-
tional units of major assemblies, erections, and final tests. These
classifications require some explanation.
Classification according to trades or fabricating processes can
be explained briefly by examples. The shops and workmen now
employed to fabricate the mechanical parts of torpedoes can equally
well fabricate those for optical instruments, fire-control instru-
ments, and any other equipment which requires high-grade, light
machining. Similarly, those now building guns can equally well
machine torpedo air flasks or propeller shafting.
Classification according to minor assemblies likewise involves
trades: for example, wiring of electrical devices, sheet metal
work, assembling of internal combustion engines, and blading
turbines. It involves other activities too specifically naval to be
classified as trades, such as assembling torpedo gyros and engines,
and assembling range finders. However, it is clear that naval


  p. 1603 (#529)                      #

1925)
1603
Excellence of Naval Material
material is very differently classified here than it is for fabrication.
Most minor assemblies will use parts fabricated by several quite
different processes.
Classification according to major assemblies is again quite dif-
ferent. Each major assembly usually includes several dissimilar
minor assemblies. For example, a turret mount includes electric
motors, guns, gun mounts, fire control devices, rammers, ammu-
nition hoists, electric lights and other units.
It has been explained that physical concentration of similar proc-
esses is essential for quality of workmanship. This refers not only
to fabricating processes, but equally to the processes of minor and
major assembling, as can readily be seen.
Single Agency for Production.—Then, since all naval material
during its process of development becomes subdivided successively
into three different classifications in each of which there should be
concentration of similar processes, it follows that all production
necessarily should be undertaken by a single agency for all naval
material. Only by this means can these successive subdivisions be
coordinated and inspection made effective under them.
Coming back now to administrative costs we see that one item
will be that of the whole productive organization—that is, the cost
of the central office. It is noteworthy, first, that the cost of a cen-
tral office should be less than that of several cooperative head
offices. The other point is that the cost of a central office would
be less, the greater the condensation of the units it coordinates.
The other item of administrative cost is that of the several offices
directly controlling the several fabricating, assembling, erecting,
and testing units. The fewer the total number of units, the less
the total cost. The fewer the separated shops under a unit, the
less the cost of that unit for administration.
With respect to duplication of power sources and other facilities,
it is hardly necessary to demonstrate that condensation in number
of establishments lessens both the initial cost of equipment and
the cost of operation.
Effective shop management depends largely on specialized train-
ing of technical managers, but it is greatly facilitated by con-
centration of similar activities because the utilization of resources
and personnel becomes more flexible. Also, concentration produces
intensification of technical knowledge, permitting all problems to be
met most intelligently.


  p. 1604 (#530)                      #

1604
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The use of economical methods is involved somewhat with use
of best methods, previously discussed. Sometimes expensive
methods must be used for the sake of quality of output, but there
are many cases where the development of a best method can be
advantageously simplified if economy of production is kept in
mind. The development of automatic machinery will indicate what
is meant.
This indicates that production also has a direct interest in the
use of experimental facilities to develop new methods.
The method by which work is handled is another case offering
opportunities for marked economy. A good illustration here is
the advantage which would result from grouping of fabricating
units to permit minor assembling without requiring distant trans-
porting of parts.
Incidental costs would be reduced by fabricating and effecting
minor assemblies at inland points close to the sources of fuel and
raw materials. It is less costly to transport minor assemblies and
parts than to transport the fuel and raw materials necessary to
make them.
There is also a strategical value in this plan. Fabricating plants
would be centrally located, able to ship minor assemblies in any
direction. They would be protected from enemy coastal raids.
The war time transportation problem would be simplified.
But it is not the purpose of this paper to discuss such applica-
tions of strategy. The question is too much bound up with the
Navy's peace-time requirement that coastal maintenance shops
shall be kept in operation so that they will be ready in the event
of war. It will be merely suggested that it might be well for the
Navy to survey properly located industrial plants in order to
identify appropriate ones so that advance arrangements could be
made with their owners for their direct war operation by the Navy.
Summary of Productive Requirements.—Thus, from the stand-
points of both quality of product and economy of funds, we should
have a single agency for producing all naval material. So far as
is commensurate with keeping maintenance yards ready for war
through keeping them busy, this agency should consolidate its
similar activities, and should group related activities to facilitate
minor assembling. Its active and supervisory work should be
handled by specialists.


  p. 1605 (#531)                      #

1925]
1605
Excellence of Naval Material
Functions Not Yet Discussed.—Certain incidental functions of
production remain for brief consideration. They are of interest
chiefly as regards personnel. These are planning, outside con-
tracts, procurement, storage, cost accounting and inspection. The
last named has been discussed, but only in some of its aspects.
* Planning splits up detailed designs into parts and assigns these
to the proper fabricating plants. It ascertains the relative urgency
of jobs and establishes precedence of work. It coordinates the
design requirements of production with the local agency of detail
design.
Its duties are both administrative and technical, but chiefly tech-
nical. It has no place for line or staff officers.
Outside contracts take care of the productive work done for the
Navy by commercial firms. The contract section would secure
specifications and plans from design, advertise for bids, investigate
the qualifications of bidders, award contracts, arrange for inspec-
tion, and, upon acceptance, make payments and arrange for trans-
portation, handling and storage.
These functions are administrative and fiscal. However, close
liaison with technical agencies in several of these functions would
be facilitated by including a limited technical personnel. The per-
sonnel, therefore, should consist of supply and technical officers.
Procurement secures raw materials and stock for production. It
differs from contracts for completed mechanisms only slightly.
The chief differences are the close touch it must keep with the
work loads of naval productive agencies in order to keep them
supplied, and the coordination it must have with storage facilities.
Procurement could be combined with the contract section to reduce
overhead.
Storage has regard to both raw materials and completed units.
Both require intelligent care. The care of raw materials requires
technical knowledge, but the case of completed units can best be
supervised by operative personnel because upkeep of units on
board ship is one of their special duties. Storage, therefore, re-
quires both technical and line officers. Storage should be closely
coordinated with both contracts and procurement, suggesting their
combination into a single office.
It is important to note that these three facilities are required for
maintenance work as well as for production. It would be un-


  p. 1606 (#532)                      #

1606
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
economical to have separate offices to handle them under each
function, but to combine them effectively to serve both production
and maintenance would necessitate effective coordination of pro-
duction and maintenance.
Cost accounting is required at each active productive agency to
enable its responsible head to watch the expenditure of his allot-
ment. It is a specialized fiscal process, to conduct which supply
officers are the logical choice.
A centralized cost accounting office for the entire naval estab-
lishment is necessary. This would necessarily contain subdivisions
to represent all naval activities which expend money, among which
production would be only one. However, the subdivision for pro-
duction presumably would be located in Washington where the cen-
tral office for controlling production would be located. Cooperation
here should be sufficient to keep the director of production in-
formed of the expenditure of his funds. He should not need a
special cost accounting agency of his own.
Inspection has already been discussed in its relation to selecting
materials and fabricating parts. Its final form is testing. Testing
minor assemblies would be technical in nature. Testing major
assemblies has operational aspects. Both erecting of devices in
ships and their final tests are chiefly operational in character.
First, as regards erecting : It is then that most piping and wiring
is installed, that working platforms and access ladders and aper-
tures are fitted, and that safety appliances are installed. By
having experienced operative (line) personnel to supervise these
matters much future trouble can be forestalled.
Testing determines acceptability. The ultimate customer is the
fleet; therefore final acceptance should lie with Operations. But,
to meet the requirements of the fleet, preliminary tests must be
made. Conception is the agency which has undertaken to produce
ships suitable to the needs of the fleet and therefore conception
should be the judge of preliminary tests.
Conception Dominatcs Inspection.—The logical inference is that
the inspectors of all tests should be direct agents of conception.
But all inspective acts are tests. Therefore the whole process of
inspection should be controlled directly by conception.
With this plan it will be seen that conceptive agents will secure,
by direct observation, the information about performances which


  p. 1607 (#533)                      #

1925]
1607
Excellence of Naval Material
is obviously of such immense conceptive and design value. Being
directly controlled by the conceptive agents, the inspectors will be
intelligently directed as to what information is wanted.
It will also be seen that the technical agents of conception would,
by this plan, be enabled to secure direct information as to the cor-
rectness of their design practices. They would get reports all
along the line, from selecting materials to lubrication, mechanical
freedom, lost motion, and interferences.
Proving Grounds and Torpedo Testing Ranges.—Coming now
to the previously mentioned gun proving grounds and torpedo
testing ranges, it will be at once apparent that they exist chiefly
as means of making tests. However, at no point in the system has
it appeared desirable that the function of inspection should be con-
fused with administration. Inspectors should not conduct tests,
but şimply observe them. Any other plan might lead to misunder-
standings with production in the event that equipment was rejected.
It therefore appears that proving grounds and ranges should
be commanded and operated by technical personnel and should
form elements of the single productive agency. Inspective per-
sonnel should be assigned to them merely to watch results.
The Productive Agency as a Whole.-As regards the productive
agency as a whole, a matter of interest is the type of officer who
should be its director. It is regarded as self-evident that he should
be a technical officer of wide general experience.
VI. MAINTENANCE
The effect of maintenance on excellence of naval material re-
sembles that of production as regards economy and quality of
work, but to a less extent. However, it has another effect, some-
what analogous to the benefits derived by conception and design
from inspection of production (but of greater value), due to the
fact that maintenance sees naval material after it has been sub-
jected to the test of service. This makes maintenance an impor-
tant source of information for conception and design.
Economy of Funds Difficult.-Economy of funds is difficult in
maintenance work because strategic considerations necessitate
having a number of widely separated and versatile maintenance
yards, and preparedness requires that they be kept operating so as
to be ready.


  p. 1608 (#534)                      #

1608
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The full war capacity of these yards exceeds the normal peace
time requirements of both maintenance and that part of produc-
tion performed directly by the Navy. This necessitates a partial
shutting down of facilities. By shutting down all facilities of cer-
tain types at one yard and those of a different type at another
yard, the yards could be specialized. In war the specialized per-
sonnel, being subject to draft, could be split up to make all yards
versatile.
Partial specialization appears consistent with fleet needs. All
heavy ships could be assigned to one yard on each coast, sub-
marines and aircraft, with their internal combustion engines, to
another, and light surface craft to a third.
The yard handling heavy ships could be the one also assigned
to do heavy productive work, and consistency should be sought
also as regards other combinations of maintenance and productive
work.
Quality of Workmanship.—The wide distribution of mainte-
nance yards renders it difficult to exercise effective centralized
supervision, necessary to keep all yards to the same high standard.
For this purpose the inspection force already discussed under
“Production” would be an excellent—in fact, necessary-agency.
Another means of maintaining high quality would be by very
thorough liaison between maintenance and production. For ex-
ample, bulletins describing productive experiences and methods
could be distributed to maintenance yards, and vice versa.
Maintenance Assisted by Production.—In preparing to make
alterations on a class of ships, maintenance often will need new
parts in sufficient quantity to justify having them made by pro-
duction. This would be economical and would also ensure quality
of workmanship. However, economy would be defeated if the
productive work load were thereby disturbed, and therefore, to
render this productive assistance beneficial, it would be necessary
to have, not cooperation, but coordination of production and
maintenance.
Effective coordination also would be necessary between concep-
tion and maintenance so that the need for parts could be foreseen
soon enough in advance, since productive work must take its turn
and therefore is relatively slow.


  p. 1609 (#535)                      #

1925]
1609
Excellence of Naval Material
There are, of course, other cases where single items of work
are too big for maintenance facilities. Here operational urgency
is the determinant of precedence and economy must sometimes be
disregarded.
Inforination for Conception and Design.—The agents of main-
tenance are like physicians and surgeons. They are told the symp-
toms of troubles, examine the affected parts, make diagnoses, and
then operate. This procedure enables them to get down to under-
lying causes.
These causes are the information desired by conception and ma-
terial, supported by the reasoning and evidence. They obviously
will be chiefly technical in nature, but some minor operational de-
sign information will also be secured. However, most operational
and functional design information should be secured through re-
ports from afloat.
Alterations.-Information of faulty performances, such as the
above, leads the conceptive and design agencies to develop altera-
tions. Since ships are often built in groups it follows that
alterations often affect several ships, and should be made in them
all. This would involve coordination of conception, design, main-
tenance, and operation, thus presenting a problem which will be
considered in Chapter VII-Coordination of the Functions.
Even where requests for alterations originate afloat the above
coordination is necessary.
Other Design Assistance.—Maintenance also requires design
assistance occasionally in effecting major repairs. This necessi-
tates coordination of design and maintenance because often the de-
mands of such work are imperative as to time and so would tend
to interfere with new design progress.
Cooperation With Operation.—Obviously, the liaison between
maintenance and operation should be perfect. Operation should
determine what is to be done and the priority of work; mainte-
nance does the work. But there are two possible causes of
discord. One is the availability of ships and the other the avail-
ability of funds.
Availability of ships is viewed by operation as to its effect on
the fleet schedule, but by maintenance as to its effect on the work
load. The latter determines whether maintenance can hold its
trained workmen.


  p. 1610 (#536)                      #

1610
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Availability of funds determines where maintenance must draw
the line through the work list of operation.
These points can best be settled by coordination.
Maintenance Facilities Afloat.—Repair ships of the fleet differ
from maintenance yards only in capacity and in the employment
of enlisted mechanics. Thus, there are no logical objections to
putting their repair departments under the control of technical
officers and operating them on the same basis as maintenance
agencies ashore. On the other hand, there are numerous ad-
vantages which would result, as will now be indicated.
The enlisted mechanics would be trained under technical special-
ists, which would make them more valuable when reassigned to
combatant ships.
The character of work would be as good as that done at main-
tenance yards. These ships would receive the bulletins issued by
production for the information of maintenance agencies. The
controlling personnel would be similarly trained and experienced.
The information of value to conception and design would be in-
cluded with that forwarded by the other maintenance agencies for
the use of the conceptive and design agencies.
Operating conditions would be observed at first hand by tech-
nical officers.
Liaison between maintenance and operation would be aided.
Advance reports on work to be done at shore maintenance yards
could be made by the technical personnel of repair ships.
The last advantage is by far the most important. Detailed and
efficient reports obviously could be made by these trained repair
officers who themselves should have come originally from the very
agencies to which their reports go. Such advance information as
to required material and estimated cost should be adequate for pre-
paratory work, so that maintenance yards could start actual work
very quickly after the ship arrived.
Repair ships with technical officers in their repair departments
should be commanded and operated by line personnel in the man-
ner now followed for hospital ships.
Cooperation With Ships Under Repair.—Line officers should
be detailed to maintenance yards and to the repair departments of
repair ships in order that the removal of equipment from ships
under repair, and work actually performed on board the ships, may


  p. 1611 (#537)                      #

1925]
16
Excellence of Naval Material
be coordinated with the operating necessities of the ships. For in-
stance, line officers could most intelligently arrange for heating,
lighting, or water where the regular ship's services have been neces-
sarily interrupted. They also can grasp most readily the nature of
the troubles which the ship's officers want corrected. In brief, they
are essential for liaison.
Maintenance a Single Agency.-Since conception, design, and
production, each should be conducted by single centralized agencies,
so also should maintenance, which has inter-relations with all of
them. Any other maintenance organization could not be adminis-
tered efficiently under the circumstances. The director of main-
tenance obviously should be a technical officer.
VII. COORDINATION OF THE FUNCTIONS
Another Application of Coordination versus Cooperation.-
Coordination versus cooperation has been discussed as regards
conception, but since then coordination has been used several times
with regard to the mutual action of virtually independent agencies.
This new application requires consideration.
Coordination of agencies, as in other cases of coordination, in-
volves control—that is, the agencies must be controlled by a
superior authority.
The implication here, assuming that the coordinator is qualified
for his job, is that he will know or else find out the respective
needs of the agencies, will consider them in the light of his general
plan, will eliminate non-essential considerations, and will promul-
gate instructions covering his decisions. Furthermore, he will
watch results, seeing that his desires are correctly realized and
applied.
Cooperation between agencies, on the other hand, lacks a general
plan, and decisions will depend on mutual agreement. Other than
the good intentions of the necessarily biased heads of the cooperat-
ing agencies, no means is included for eliminating non-essential
considerations and arranging the others in order of importance.
The decisions, therefore, are very apt to be based on the points of
view of the respective agencies instead of on the higher point of
view of ultimate advantage to the Navy.
Cooperation is not susceptible of effective supervision because
there is no superior to watch both sides. Supervision by either


  p. 1612 (#538)                      #

1612
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
side naturally is biased. Even where cooperation is natural
and easy, its extent will depend on the energy and personality of
the mutually concerned agents. Where it is difficult the natural
tendency would be toward friction and ill feeling.
Thus we see that coordination tends toward logical and efficient
interaction; cooperation tends the other way and can be made effi-
cient only through the fortunate accident of a similar viewpoint
by the cooperators.
The Mutual Dependence of the Functions. As the analysis has
progressed we have seen the dependence of design on conception,
of production on design, and of maintenance on both design and
production. We have seen also the dependence of conception and
design on maintenance. Chart I shows these interrelations
graphically.
Single Agency for Developing All Material.-All of these de-
pendencies clearly require coordination rather than cooperation.
From this it follows that we should have a single agency for the
development of all naval material. For convenience, we shall refer
to it as the division of naval material.
The chief of naval material then would be the natural leader of
the conceptive agency because as such he would directly dominate
all these functions except maintenance. Through the inspection of
maintenance work by the inspection force which forms an adjunct
of the conceptive agency, he would, in fact, also dominate main-
tenance.
Coordination of Maintenance With Operation.—It was pointed
out in discussing maintenance that the only two questions re-
quiring adjustment between operation and maintenance were the
navy yard work load versus the fleet operating schedule, and the
point at which lack of funds would interfere with completing
maintenance work on ships. The Secretary of the Navy, obviously,
is the superior authority who must settle the first of these ques-
tions. Funds are the determinant of the other question.
The Use of Funds.—The use of funds can be one of the chief
determinants of excellence of naval material. By economy of pro-
duction and maintenance, money should become available for de-
velopment work and for more maintenance work. But these are
too narrow restrictions. A more general use of surplus funds
would also permit more extensive operating by the fleet, thereby


  p. 1613 (#539)                      #

1925]
1613
Excellence of Naval Material
securing more information for the use of the conceptive agency.
This general use of surplus funds is possible only where Congress
appropriates a lump sum to the Navy. The Secretary of the Navy
should be responsible for its use. The necessary restrictions will
be discussed later, in Chapter X.
Centralized Accounting. In order to use surplus funds to ad-
vantage the Secretary would require a centralized accounting office
to keep him advised of expenditures. He would require, also, a
planning agency to ascertain the proposed activities of all branches
of the naval establishment, estimate their cost, scale them down
to the limitations of the budget, and prepare a composite time-
expenditure curve. Comparing actual expenditures with this
curve he would know the state of his balance and so could use his
surplus for the purposes deemed most necessary.
Budget Agency.—The above described planning agency, when
operating as indicated, would really be a budget bureau. It should
include line, staff, and technical officers so that the problems of all
agencies which spend money could be intelligently and sympa-
thetically grasped. It would require a director who, by virtue of
his influence in the vital matter of funds, would exert a very
powerful influence over naval affairs.
Of course the Secretary would not act on his advice alone, but,
presumably, would secure advice from the General Board before
approving proposals. The budget director would be in direct and
constant association with the Secretary.
Because the primary purpose of the Navy always must be
preparation for or the conduct of war, it is essential that the di-
rector of the budget should be a line officer.
VIII. PERSONNEL TRAINING AND SPECIALIZATION
An important determinant of quality of naval material is the
quality of the officer personnel. This obvious truth has already
been inferentially indicated by the constant references to line and
technical specialists during the discussion of conception and de-
sign. There are other less apparent applications as regards the
upkeep and use of equipment at sea. These require discussion in
order to establish the relation between excellence of material and
the training and specialization of personnel.


  p. 1614 (#540)                      #

1614
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Use of Equipment.—The upkeep of equipment by its operating
personnel is the elementary form of maintenance. Barring un-
avoidable accidents and design oversights, the extent of work to
be done by repair ships and navy yards will vary inversely with the
excellence of operational upkeep.
Excellence of operational upkeep requires knowledge as well as
attention. This knowledge should come from training supple-
mented by experience, and not from experience alone, because
upkeep knowledge derived solely from experience is normally the
result of making mistakes. It is acquired by trial and error. The
unfortunate effect on the equipment is obvious.
In using equipment its performance will depend on the knowl-
edge of the operating personnel as well as on their energy and in-
telligence. And again, this knowledge should come from training
supplemented by experience instead of from experience alone, but
for somewhat different reasons, which follow.
The lessons of experience are taught by happenings and self-
instruction. Happenings related to the subject may occur infre-
quently-perhaps only at wide intervals during peace. For
example, periods of torpedo firing occur only two or three times
a year during quite short periods. Thus, experience requires a
long time to complete its course.of instruction.
The significance of a happening is not always apparent, and
knowledge is required to understand it. For example, a curved
torpedo run may actually be due to unequal rudder throws, but a
torpedo officer lacking training would incline to suspect the more
obvious gyro, perhaps overhauling it to no purpose.
But, if knowledge is necessary to interpret happenings, it fol-
lows that a person in the process of learning by experience will
often be led to false conclusions. In other words, experience will
lead different persons in different paths before bringing them to-
gether, finally, at knowledge, and at intermediate points of the
journey they may be headed in opposite directions.
Self-instruction, on the other hand, is inclined to hew closer to
the line, but generally is impeded by waste motion due to improper
sequence, and ignorance of proper sources of information.
Thus, we see that experience is a slow and illogical teacher,
very apt to lead its untrained pupils astray, but, the teachings of
experience serve merely to enrich the knowledge of those who
have been trained.


  p. 1615 (#541)                      #

1925)
1615
Excellence of Naval Material
The Nature of Training.-By inference from what has pre-
ceded it will be seen that training is imparting the digested er-
perience of many people.
Digesting the experience of many people consists in collecting
their experiences, comparing them, investigating discrepancies,
and drawing up logical conclusions.
Imparting the resultant information requires, first, that it be
arranged in a natural sequence so that the mind of the student will
be prepared to grasp a new idea through having already assimilated
others upon which it depends.
The next requirement is that it shall be stated generally, and
in such form that the student will be able to apply it to specific in-
stances. Briefly, this requires that the information be stated as a
series of general principles, utilizing specific instances only to
illustrate their application.
The Need for Training.—The need for operative training
should therefore be apparent. Trained officers would make few
mistakes at the expense of equipment. They would get high per-
formance from it. They also would be able to draw intelligent
conclusions from occurrences, which would render their reports
and recommendations correspondingly valuable to the agencies of
conception and design.
But, these benefits derive only if officers receive training before
they become involved with the upkeep and use of naval material.
Thus, training is for the good of the Navy rather than that of the
individual, and should be mandatory.
Operational Specialization.—-Training of line officers in the use
and care of equipment is virtually synonymous with operational
specialization. This is because training must be specific. An
officer about to perform gunnery duties would find propulsive en-
gineering training of slight help. As an addition to his gunnery
training it would be a burden. In the course of his career in the
lower and middle grades he can receive training and gain experi-
ence in several operational lines, but only consecutively.
The test of soundness of operational specialization is its relation
to tactics because all line officers as they gain command rank must
be qualified in tactics. The functional line specializations are gun-
nery (including fire control), torpedo control, bombing, mine lay-
ing, communications, ship control, and ship propulsion. It is a


  p. 1616 (#542)                      #

1616
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
notable fact that each one of these except ship propulsion has direct
tactical implications for its controlling personnel.
Consecutive specialization in three of these lines should be suffi-
cient basic preparation for tactics and command, provided that ship
control and communications are two of them. The third should be
consistent with the principal weapon of the class of ship in which
the officer is to serve.
Propulsive engineering is in a class apart, and so utterly un-
related to the other battle functions that the way in which it is
handled by the British does not seem without merit. But, like the
others, it is a function in which special training would produce
commensurate benefits.
Specialization in Types of Ships.—The reference to service in
a class of ships brings up another form of line specialization. The
essential classes are battleships (including cruisers), airplane car-
riers, destroyers and submarines, and mine craft. The grouping is
according to the principal weapon. Continuous service in a class
is desirable rather than the contrary. Each class leads its personnel
into fleet tactics, and in the minor classes the induction is earlier
and lasts longer.
It is no more necessary that an officer shall command a battle-
ship to be qualified to command a fleet than that he should also
command a mine layer. This is because no officer is really quali-
fied to command in war until he has had general tactical train-
ing. Correct tactical training is based on fleet tactics, so that the
student learns the mutual relations of all types in battle, regard-
less of the type of ship in which he specializes. Tactical training,
therefore, should precede assignment to command.
Technical Specialisation.—The remaining form of specializa-
tion is technical. Its necessity can be judged from civil practice.
Modern scientific development has become so diversified, and at
the same time so intensified, that no individual can become a really
high grade technical engineer except through training and con-
tinuous application in a special line.
Postgraduate technical study is a recognized essential for tech-
nical specialization. Continuous application is no less essential for
being less clearly perceived in the Navy. Scientific progress is so
continuous and so frequently revolutionary that an officer could not
remain a real technical specialist at least, not of the grade required
by the Navy—without continuous practice.


  p. 1617 (#543)                      #

1925]
1617
Excellence of Naval Material
The need for this is also apparent when it is realized that to
qualify as a real technical expert it is necessary to have not only
postgraduate training but also extensive experience in inspection,
production, maintenance, and design.
Separation of Line Officers fron Technical Work.—Early in
the paper it was demonstrated that line officers should parti-
cipate directly in functional and operational design. This par-
ticipation was shown to be entirely consistent with their line
duties, and is consistent with the line specializations described just
above.
On the other hand, it was also demonstrated that line officers
should not participate in technical design. This conclusion is con-
firmed by the discussion which has just taken place regarding tech-
nical specialization.
Engineer or Technical Corps.—The inevitable and only sound
conclusion is that the Navy should have a distinct corps of tech-
nical specialists. This corps might be called the engineer corps
or the technical corps. The latter probably is preferable. It should
contain specialized groups for naval architecture, marine engineer-
ing, electrical engineering and the other branches which have been
indicated heretofore.
IX. OUR PRESENT MATERIAL SYSTEM
It is proposed now to examine our present system for develop-
ing naval material in the light of what has preceded. The informed
reader will have noted many differences between what has been
developed in the analysis and what now exists, but it is proposed
to discuss only those differences which are believed to be of the
greatest importance. This will serve to bring them into sharper
focus. The following comments will refer to the existing system
unless otherwise specifically indicated.
CONCEPTION.—It is believed that our present methods of con-
ception are wrong in the following respects :
1. Composition of the fleet and the military and major opera-
tional characteristics of ships are now determined by a committee.
This is a serious fault. The committee is the General Board,
which would be an admirable board of review for major concep-
tions. It has other important duties, not concerned with concep-
tion, to which this comment in no way refers.


  p. 1618 (#544)                      #

1618
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
2. Specialists do not now participate directly in major concep-
tive developments. Both line and technical specialists appear as
witnesses before the General Board which is composed normally
of generalists.
Our technical specialists usually are trained and tend to think
alike, and technical work also is more scientific and therefore less
controversial than line work; but, our line specialists, being at
present untrained operationally, tend to think differently. This
forces the General Board to judge between divergent views
upon many subjects in which the board members often do
not have detailed knowledge. The General Board is further
handicapped because the witnesses cannot easily be given a clear
idea of the board's point of view, due to insufficient opportunity.
Finally, each witness normally has a specialized view of his own
which he cannot avoid stressing.
3. Minor conception also is frequently handled by boards. The
Fire Control Board and Ship Control Board are examples. They
convene intermittently, which is also bad. They are very hurried.
Temporary boards also frequently are convened to consider special
conceptive subjects when circumstances render them prominent.
4. Conceptions are not coordinated directly with composition of
the fleet. They cannot be, with five independent cooperative ma-
terial agencies: namely, the material bureaus.
5. There is no individual responsibility for major, and many
minor, conceptions.
6. There is no continuous conceptive supervision of ship design.
This is obvious, since the General Board, which is the present
major conceptive agency, has neither time, nor personnel with the
requisite specialized knowledge, to conduct supervision of this
nature.
7. Minor conceptive policy is unstable in several bureaus where
material is handled by classes instead of by functions. Such sub-
division forces decentralization of conception, with the result that
periodic changes in personnel within a bureau tend to cause
changes in conceptive policy of the affected classes of the bureau's
material.
8. Minor conception is impaired, in bureaus so organized, be-
cause distribution of their insufficient personnel to handle a number
of classes makes it necessary for individuals to combine their con-


  p. 1619 (#545)                      #

1925)
1619
Excellence of Naval Material
ceptive function with administrative and other duties. In this con-
nection the reader is referred to The Cult of Incompetence by
Emil Faguet in which the decentralization of functions is ad-
mirably discussed.
9. Minor conceptions are not coordinated between bureaus.
Refer to No. 4. This is a serious impediment to sound general
development.
DESIGN.—The following faults are believed to exist in our de-
sign procedure. To facilitate reference, the sequence of numbers
will be continued.
10. Ship design is virtually controlled by technical officers—
naval constructors. This is because of Nos. 6 and 11.
II. Naval constructors perform functional and operational, as
well as technical, design functions for ships as a whole and also
for their hulls and "equipage." It is believed that the dangerous
and unnecessary “line-construction corps feud,” which obviously
does exist to some extent in the service, is caused by this fact,
coupled with lack of continuous conceptive supervision of design
(See No. 6) and the lack of any generally accepted line opinion on
any line subject of importance. The latter can be traced to lack
of line specialization and training. In brief, the causes of the
feud probably are a bad system and perhaps bad line officers
rather than bad naval architects.
12. Line officers now perform technical design. This they can-
not do properly. Also, it is harmful to the line to let them try,
because technical training is necessary, and takes considerable time,
during which the line officers being trained are removed from their
legitimate work. They are removed from it, also, whenever they
do technical designing. Since those now so employed are espe-
cially selected for their ability, it follows that the line, in them,
loses the use of some of its best minds during extensive periods.
Line problems are of themselves sufficiently difficult, and also
pressing, to require for their solution all the brains and energy
that the service can muster.
13. Design of elements of ships is not coordinated.' The five
bureaus cooperate instead. See Nos. 4 and 9.
14. Overlapping cognizances result from the bureau system,
whereby material is handed by classes instead of by functions.
For example, fire control instruments are handled by Ordnance,


  p. 1620 (#546)                      #

1620
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
gyro compasses (essential for fire control) by Navigation, voice
tubes (also essential) by Engineering and Construction and Re-
pair, and all electric wiring and power sources by Engineering.
All of these things require centralized coordination, whereas all
that is not possible is cooperation.
15. Technical and operational considerations tend to dominat e
military ones, due to Nos. 6, 10 and 11. The reverse must be the
case, to secure functional brilliance and soundness of design.
A few guarded examples can be given : Destroyer body designs
have been architected for speed with economy of power, with the
result that these vessels have battleship turning circles (poor anti-
submarine screening vessels.) They and our light cruisers have
four funnels for reasons of propulsive economy, or perhaps to
facilitate smoke control. This wastes precious center-line space
for guns and, in the case of cruisers, for an airplane catapult in a
sheltered and versatile position.
Smoke control can be handled readily in a multiple-flue funnel
by raising forward flues relatively to those abaft them, in a reverse
vertical echelon.
Finally, our torpedoes for years have been designed with tur-
bine engines for reasons of operational ruggedness, but at the ex-
pense of the very great tactical advantage of a wide speed range.
Only very recently has it been found possible to develop the latter
feature in a turbine torpedo.
In general, results such as the above are due to:
a) Lack of a centralized development of all conception.
b) Failure to develop minor conceptions directly from a single
theory of composition of the fleet. This is a corollary of (a).
c) Direct development of some phases of military conception
and design by technical officers. See Nos. 10 and 11.
d) Direct development by line officers of some phases of tech-
nical conception and design. See No. 12. The bad effect here
results really from causes (a) and (b). The fact that a line officer
cannot also be a good technical designer (See No. 12) is incidental.
16. Technical design is not standardized. For example, elec-
trical standards and practices are considerably different among the
bureaus. So are mechanical tones. The worst result is the confu-
sion afloat, but the failure to profit generally from developments
by each bureau is another bad result.


  p. 1621 (#547)                      #

1925)
1621
Excellence of Naval Material
17. There is no central design records office. Its benefits are
absent.
18. Design policy is unstable in some bureaus. Same as for
No. 7.
19. Design overhead costs are greater than necessary, due to
lack of concentration of personnel and facilities.
20. Design progress is slow due partly to No. 6 and partly to a
considerable tendency among the bureaus to produce complete gen-
eral designs before operating models are built and tested. This
probably is due to absence of convenient experimental facilities.
21. Design work is often too expensive, for reasons given in
No. 20.
PRODUCTION.—The discussion of faults continues.
22. Fabrication is not sufficiently condensed according to proc-
esses or trades. This is due chiefly to having five independent
bureaus. The advantages previously indicated are lost, especially
economy.
23. Minor assemblies are not condensed. Reasons and results
similar to those of No. 22.
24. Technical productive work is done by line officers. This
wastes their time. See No. 12.
25. One bureau's plans depend on another's funds, in cases of
the sort indicated in No. 14. The objections are too apparent to
require statement.
MAINTENANCE.-
26. Navy Yard work on ships is not effectively coordinated.
This is partly because under the existing system it is not possible
for maintenance representatives to inspect proposed work ahead
of time.
27. Some technical maintenance work is done by line officers.
See No. 24.
28. Funds for maintenance are not centrally coordinated. This
is because specific appropriations are now made by Congress direct
to the several bureaus. Transfers of surplus funds are not per-
mitted. The Secretary cannot apply the naval appropriations to
the best advantage.
MISCELLANEOUS CONSIDERATIONS.—There are several faults
which do not come directly under any of the foregoing heads,
as follow:


  p. 1622 (#548)                      #

1622
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
29. Line officers are not trained in their operative duties before
assignment, except for aviation and submarines. Aviation and
submarines are specialties in types of ships rather than functional
specialties, although they include instruction in associated func-
tions.
The only other functional instruction now given to line officers
is in torpedoes, optical equipment, gas protection, and at the Naval
War College. None of these courses necessarily precedes related
assignments to duty. All of them except the War College deal
more with upkeep than with functional use of equipment, except,
of course, the instruction in gas protection.
30. Line specialties are not recognized. In fact, they are offi-
cially discouraged, although they actually exist, both as to func-
tions and classes of ships. They obviously have to exist, but
official disapproval of them naturally makes officers unwilling to
specialize effectively, thus preventing the Navy from securing the
full benefits from this specialization.
GENERAL SUMMARY.—The foregoing faults may be summarized
as improper conception, cooperation where coordination is
necessary, improper use of line and technical officers, uneconomical
use of funds, and failure to train line officers for line functions.
These serious faults are bound to lead to commensurate faults
in our naval material. Informed readers will be aware of suffi-
ciently numerous and serious material faults to substantiate the
criticisms which appear in this paper. It is, of course, inexpedient
to enumerate such cases here.
X. A PROPOSED SYSTEM
Modifications to Existing System.—Except for improper major
conception, the faults in our present system are direct or indirect
products of the splitting up of naval material among five inde-
pendent bureaus. Those which are direct products will be obvious
from what has preceded. The indirect ones chiefly result from the
use of line officers for technical work and technical officers for
line work.
It does not appear possible to secure a satisfactory systent
by temporizing with the classified subdivision of material which
the present bureaus represent. Placing them under a chief of
naval material would not solve the problem because his power could


  p. 1623 (#549)                      #

1925)
1623
Excellence of Naval Material
then be only nominal; that is, he could not render it effective. The
changes he would have to make in order to centralize design, con-
dense productive facilities, apply maintenance funds to the best ad-
vantage, and enable his centralized conceptive agency to exercise
general supervision and coordination would actually result in the
creation of a functional system similar to that outlined in this paper.
It is therefore proposed that we should attack the situation
boldly, establishing a single division of naval material organ-
ized on functional lines essentially as has been indicated. This
single agency should perform the material functions of the present
Bureaus of Construction and Repair, Ordnance, Engineering,
Navigation, and Aeronautics.
Growth of the Present System.—The proposed change does
not appear so startling if we realize that the present system is a
haphazard growth, not a logical development. It started in sailing
ship days when hull and ordnance were the two major classes of
equipment. There were no conflicts between them—no interlock-
ing requirements. The guns were rolled about on wheels and
the hull merely provided apertures for their muzzles and ring
bolts for their breechings.
Another bureau resulted when steam propulsion developed,
but since hulls were still wood and guns did not require power,
there were still no interlocks; but when metals and power became
generally necessary in all departments of ships the bureau system
automatically became illogical.
Other Material Bureaus.—No direct reference has yet been
made to the present Bureaus of Yards and Docks, Supplies and
Accounts, and Medicine and Surgery. These all handle material
to some extent, but in general it does not come under the definition
of naval material.
However, the Bureau of Yards and Docks handles facilities
which are utilized very largely by the productive and maintenance
agencies. There are relatively few naval stations which are used
for administrative or operational work not connected with the
development of naval material, and these are ordinarily com-
manded by line officers or supply officers. It therefore would
appear quite proper to include this bureau in the division of
naval material, as well as very desirable. It could be administered
to advantage as an element of the agency of maintenance.


  p. 1624 (#550)                      #

1624
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The Bureau of Supplies and Accounts at present performs
three functions. Of these, accounting should be centralized for
the entire Navy, as has been indicated; therefore it should be done
by an agency coming directly under the office of the Secretary
of the Navy.
The second function consists of handling contracts for pro-
ductive work, and sometimes for maintenance work, by civilian
firms. This has been discussed, and clearly should be performed
within the division of naval material in a single agency serving
both production and maintenance.
The third function consists of procurement and storage of raw
materials and stock. These include food, clothing, and operational
supplies for ships. In this function, as in the second, the bureau
is merely an agent, but it serves two masters (the division of
naval material and the division of operations of the fleet) whose re-
quirements are quite dissimilar. Nothing essential is gained by
combining these dissimilar duties in a single independent agency
and much would be lost if thereby the division of naval material
were to lose control of those functions which rightly belong to it.
Thus, it appears logical to subdivide procurement and storage be-
tween the two divisions of naval material and naval operations. In
the division of naval material a single agency should perform
this work together with contracts) for the agencies of both pro-
duction and maintenance.
The Naval Organization as a Whole.—The condensations so far
suggested would result in two main subdivisions of the Navy
Department with certain agencies coming directly under the Secre-
tary's office and two others not yet assigned.
The two latter are the personnel functions of the Bureau of
Navigation, and the Bureau of Medicine and Surgery which is
essentially a personnel agency. On the grounds of coordination
and to reduce overhead, it would seem logical either to combine
them into a division of personnel or to add them, as sections, to
the present Office of Naval Operations. The latter is much
preferable because it automatically would solve certain contro-
versial matters such as training and distribution of personnel.
The importance of these considerations to the development of
naval material, which has been indicated, justifies their discussion
in this paper.


  p. 1625 (#551)                      #

1925]
1625
Excellence of Naval Material
The Secretary's Office should include the accounting office,
the budget office, and the General Board.
The budget office supplies the Secretary with his most effective
coordinative machinery.
The General Board should be, as it now is, the Secretary's ad-
visory committee. It is qualified to examine any naval plan for
soundness. It is not qualified to originate plans. With the pro-
posed organization there would be in continuous existence agencies
properly designed to originate all plans required by the Navy, thus
relieving the General Board of work of this nature.
The Proposed System in Detail.-In examining the following
concrete proposals the reader is requested to refer to the diagram
of organization on Chart II.
1. The Navy Department should consist of the Secretary's
Office and the two major divisions of naval operations and naval
material.
2. The Secretary's office should consist of his staff and the
General Board.
3. The Secretary's staff should consist of the budget section
and the accounting section. The chief of staff should be a line
officer.
4. The General Board should advise the Secretary relative to
proposed naval activities. It should be the board of review for
major conceptions. It should not initiate conceptive work as re-
gards either material or operation.
5. The division of naval operations should consist of the present
agency of that name plus the present Bureau of Medicine and
Surgery, the personnel branch of the present Bureau of Naviga-
tion, and that section of the present Bureau of Supplies and Ac-
counts which deals with personnel and operative supplies.
6. The division of naval material should comprise all material
functions now performed by the present Bureaus of Navigation,
Construction and Repair, Ordnance, Engineering, Aeronautics,
Yards and Docks, and Supplies and Accounts. The duties of
these agencies should be rearranged and combined to the best ad-
vantage, essentially as hereafter indicated..
7. The division of naval material should consist of a con-
ceptive agency, bureaus to perform the functions of design, pro-


  p. 1626 (#552)                      #

1626
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
duction, and maintenance, and offices or agencies for inspection,
experiments, testing, records, contracts, and procurement and
storage. The five last mentioned offices or agencies are each aux-
iliaries to two or more of the proposed functional bureaus, there-
fore they should be administered directly under the chief of naval
material who would coordinate their activities with the require-
ments of the bureaus. The other agency, inspection, should be an
instrument of the conceptive agency.
8. The conceptive agency should constitute the staff of the
chief of naval material. It has the functions of gathering informa-
tion, digesting it, presenting it for consideration of the chief of
naval material, working out conceptions under his direction, and
supervising and coordinating their application through all the
bureaus.
9. The staff of the chief of naval material should consist of
a chief of staff, a superior division, a general division of four
sections, and a financial division. The chief of staff should be a
line officer.
10. The superior division should consist of two or more senior
line officers representing tactics and strategy. Their functions are
outlined elsewhere.
II. The general division would consist of sections as follows:
a) The weapons section, consisting of line officers.
b) The auxiliary functions section, also consisting of line of-
ficers.
c) The elemental section, consisting of line and staff officers.
d) The technical section, consisting entirely of technical officers.
12. The financial division would consist of supply officers.
13. The bureau of design would have the functions of prepar-
ing all general designs, and the preparation of all detail designs in
coordination with the bureau of production. It would work also
with the bureau of maintenance when that bureau requires design
assistance. This coordination would be effected by the chief of
naval material through the chiefs of bureaus.
14. The bureau of design should consist of a ship design
division, a general design division and a number of decentralized
detail design agencies located at productive plants. The chief
of bureau should be a technical officer.


  p. 1627 (#553)                      #

1925]
1627
Excellence of Naval Material
15. The ship design division should consist of sections for
the essentially different types of ships. Its personnel should all be
technical.
16. The general design division should consist of sections for
the essential function and operational classes of material. Its
personnel should be technical.
17. The detail design agencies are described elsewhere.
Their personnel should be technical.
18. The bureau of production has the functions of coordinat-
ing with the bureau of design as to its detail design requirements,
and of fabricating, assembling, erecting, and conducting the tests
of all new naval material. It also aids the bureau of maintenance
when necessary. The chief of bureau should be a technical officer.
19. The bureau of production should consist of divisions for
planning, fabrication, minor assembling and major assembling and
of centralized administrative offices and centralized plants for con-
ducting the work.
The divisions will not be described in detail. Their personnel
should be technical, except that the divisions for erecting and
conducting tests should include line officers.
20. The bureau of maintenance has the functions of perform-
ing repairs and alterations to ships and their equipment, and of
reporting to the conceptive agency and the bureau of design all
information thereby secured which can be applied to improve naval
material. The chief of bureau should be a technical officer. He
should have a senior line assistant to assist him to cooperate ef-
fectively with the division of naval operations. Conflicting con-
siderations would be coordinated by the office of the Secretary via
the chiefs of divisions of naval material and naval operations.
21. The bureau of maintenance should consist of a centralized
administrative office directing the maintenance work of repair ships
and navy yards and arranging for coordination with other bureaus
where necessary. The personnel should be chiefly technical but re-
quires some line officers.
The nature of the separate maintenance agencies of naval sta-
tions and repair ships will not be discussed in detail.
22. The inspection agency has the functions of testing ma-
terials, inspecting fabricated parts, testing minor assemblies and


  p. 1628 (#554)                      #

1628
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings.
major assemblies, and making preliminary tests on erections. It
is the direct agent of the conceptive agency. It therefore should
inform that agency of conceptive and technical applications which
develop from its work. It should have the power to reject, in
the name of the chief of naval material, all work found unsatis-
factory. It should apply its functions to production and mainte-
nance work. Its personnel should be chiefly technical but should
include line officers for the final tests. Since these are the most
important, the director of inspection should be a line officer.
23. The experimental agency has the functions of conducting
development work required by the agency of conception and the
bureaus. It supplies facilities and workmen, allowing the repre-
sentatives of the primary agencies to direct the work. It must
adjust their requirements to its facilities, priority being decided
by the chief of naval material. The director of experiments
should be a technical officer and his personnel should be technical.
24. The testing agency has the functions of conducting tests
for the bureaus of production and maintenance. It should provide
personnel and facilities, permitting the bureau personnel to direct
the tests. It should conduct only tests which by their nature re-
quire special facilities, such as ranging torpedoes, proving guns,
proving armor, and conducting trials of ships. Its director should
be a technical officer but he requires line assistants as well as tech-
nical ones.
25. The records office has been fully described.
26. Contracts, procurement, and storage have been quite fully
considered. They can well be combined into a single supply
agency for the division of naval material, of which the director
should be a supply officer. The personnel should consist of supply,
technical and line officers.
27. Funds should be appropriated in a single budget, for the
expenditure of which the Secretary of the Navy should be directly
responsible. That officer should be free to utilize operative and
maintenance funds, and savings from productive economies, to
the general advantage of the naval service. The rights of Congress
can be safeguarded by requiring an annual statement of the ex-
penditure of funds in detail. Such a statement would be prepared,
in any case, by the accounting section of the Secretary's office.


  p. 1629 (#555)                      #

1925]
1629
Excellence of Naval Material
28. A technical corps should be established, consisting of
specialized branches for naval architecture, steam engineering,
electrical engineering, ordnance engineering (guns, projectiles,
armor, and explosives), aeronautics, optics, civil engineering, and
other necessary lines.
The personnel should consist of commissioned officers, prefer-
ably graduates of the Naval Academy. Their training as such
should initiate with sea service to enable their proclivities to be
decided, then specialized postgraduate technical instruction, junior
experience in inspection, production, maintenance, and design, sub-
sequent special courses of instruction and, finally, higher assign-
ments depending on their special abilities.
The selection, development, and assignments of these officers
should be a special function in the central personnel office of the
Navy. This work should be performed by technical officers nomi-
nated by the chief of naval material. It should be handled in ac-
cordance with his requirements.
29. Line officers should perform no purely technical duties
whatsoever.
30. Line officers should specialize in line functions according
to two classifications : namely, types of ships and battle functions.
31. Specialization in types of ships should consist of:
a) Battleship and cruiser duty.
b) Aviation duty.
c) Destroyer duty.
d) Submarine duty.
e) Mine duty.
Specialization of this sort means constant sea assignment to
vessels of a single type. There would be no serious objection to
temporary diversions where necessitated by the general personnel
situation, or to permanent changes when they appear desirable.
Duty on auxiliaries should be regarded as detached duty, un-
related to any of these, and therefore should not be specialized in,
that is, no competent officer should be assigned to it continuously.
It is believed that line officers should not be assigned to classes
(b) to (e) immediately upon graduation from the Naval Acad-
emy. Duty in vessels of class (a) is highly desirable for recent
Naval Academy graduates to break them in to active service con-
ditions.


  p. 1630 (#556)                      #

1630
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
32. Specialization in battle functions should consist of:
a) Gunnery, including fire control.
b) Torpedo control.
c) Bombing
d) Ship propulsion.
e) Communications.
f) Ship control, including navigation.
g) Tactics.
h) Strategy and major tactics.
These are named in the sequence in which they should be taken up.
All line officers should specialize, first in any one of (a) to (c),
then in each of the others in the order named, except (d). The
latter is additional.
Specialization should not begin until after several years service
as a junior officer on a battleship or cruiser. During this period
the young officer should be shifted about until his bent is in-
dicated. He then should receive a course of operational training
in the line of his inclination, of which the usual duration should not
exceed six months. Specialization in (a) to (c) or in (d) should
be the longest in his career, though some young officers should, of
course, go rather quickly into (e).
Before undertaking any new specialty the officer should receive
an appropriate course of operational training.
33. There should be operational schools for all battle function
specialties. That for (g) would be the junior war college course,
shortened to six months, if necessary in order to secure enough
graduates per year. That for (h) would be the senior war col-
lege course, of at least a year.
The other schools can be conducted to the best advantage on
school ships because this will permit instruction by demonstration.
It also will enable the division of naval material to secure prompt
and intelligent service tests of new devices by sending them to the
appropriate school ships.
34. Assignment to duty. In order to permit putting these es-
sential line proposals into effect it will be necessary to adopt the
following policies for assignments to duty:
a) For the first few years all Naval Academy graduates
should be sent to battleships and cruisers for general assignment.
They should serve in several departments. At the end of that
time selections should be made for line and technical specialization.


  p. 1631 (#557)                      #

1925]
1631
Excellence of Naval Material
b) Line officers should specialize continuously in classes
of ships.
c) Line officers should specialize successively in battle func-
tions.
d) Battle functional specialization should always start with
operational training at a school.
e) Line officers should serve alternately afloat and ashore,
approximately in the proportion of three and two years at first,
and two and two years toward the end, but the time spent at
school should not be counted as either one or the other.
The latter requirement removes the present disadvantage which
adheres to the junior war college course. Officers who now start
their shore duty with this course cannot expect good assignments
for their one remaining year of shore duty under the present policy.
Those about to go to sea duty often cannot get assigned to the
course unless their previous shore assignment has been curtailed.
If all operational training school courses are of six months dura-
tion there will be two periods per year at which changes on ships
would be made. These periods can be fitted in readily with the
normal operating schedule of the fleet.
It is realized that the existing number of line officers in the
Navy might prevent the full development of the necessary system
of operational instruction prior to assignment. This simply would
indicate an essential need for more officers. Congress must be
brought to see the necessity for having them, should this be the
case. It would seem that in presenting this and other essential
requirements the necessity for which can be logically demonstrated,
the compelling argument should be this: A navy known to be
inefficient is not only an unjustified public expense but is the basis
for an unwarranted public confidence in the national defense.
Service Agreement.—To make possible many of these changes
Congressional action is necessary. This is difficult to obtain unless
service opinion is practically unanimous for the change. It also
is very dangerous unless the proposed change is unqualifiedly
sound and fully worked out.
For these reasons it is earnestly requested that wide and thor-
ough service consideration be given to the proposals in this
paper and the logic which attempts to support them. The de-
partment of the Naval INSTITUTE PROCEEDINGS devoted to dis-
cussion provides an excellent medium for debate.


  p. 1632 (#558)                      #

AVIATION AT THE NAVAL ACADEMY
By CAPTAIN H. A. BALDRIDGE, U. S. NAVY
Head of Department of Seamanship and Flight Tactics,
U.S. Naval Academy
- UCH interest has been aroused in many quarters concern-
VI ing the course in aviation and aeronautics recently in-
augurated at the Naval Academy. The following brief
account is prepared with a view of acquainting the service at large
with the present relative position of aviation in the curriculum.
It is common knowledge to the service that ever since its founda-
tion the Academy has made changes in the curriculum from time
to time in order to keep abreast or ahead of advancement in naval
science.
In the last quarter century the curriculum has made room for
new subjects, such as water tube boilers, radio, turbines, internal
combustion engines, and communications; in addition it has greatly
expanded in the fields of electrical engineering, marine engineer-
ing, naval construction, and modern ordnance and gunnery.
For example, last fall the Academic Board authorized additional
time to aviation subjects already included in the curriculum and a
specially prepared textbook, Naval Aviation, was adopted for the
Seamanship Department and studied last winter by the first class
(1925). This book covers the following ground: history and
mission of naval aviation, elementary aerodynamics, aircraft
engines, aircraft navigational instruments, aviation bases, scouting,
aircraft action after contact, fighting, formation attack, aerial
gunnery, observation, torpedoing and bombing, future of avia-
tion in war, types of aircraft and nomenclature of the National
Advisory Committee for Aeronautics.
The Academy, the same as other professional schools, has always
met the ever-increasing demands made upon its curriculum by the
careful pruning and deleting of certain subjects as soon as it
becomes evident that they are tending to become obsolete. In


  p. 1633 (#559)                      #


Bureau of Aeronautics Photo
SEA PLANE TYPE "F-5-L” USED AT U. S. Naval ACADEMY IN THE TRAINING OF MIDSHIPMEN


  p. 1634 (#560)                      #

1634
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
cases where it is evident that the service demands more time than
the four-year course at the Academy can give, the postgraduate
courses pursued several years after graduation have been found to
meet such contingencies. It seems to be well recognized that the
line officer's profession is one of those in which it is absolutely
necessary for the young man to be on his way by the time he is
twenty-one to twenty-five years of age; else he is hopelessly handi-
capped in developing those decisive traits of character so necessary
for active leadership.
Aviation has been, is, and will be accorded the position in the
curriculum that its importance demands.
The mission of the Naval Academy, to all intents and purposes,
may be said to have always remained the same; recently it has been
officially stated as “To mould the material received into . ...;
with a ground work of educational fundamentals upon which ex-
perience afloat may build the finished naval officer. ...."
What, then, may be fairly asked, has the Naval Academy been
doing for aviation? What is it doing now? Of what does the
new course consist, and how is it being administered ?
AVIATION IN THE REGULAR CURRICULUM
That the service may better understand what the Academy is
doing now, it is perhaps interesting to know what it was previously
doing. The current annual Naval Academy Register (1924-25)
shows that the regular four-year course consists of 5,880 hours of
study, recitations, and examinations in theoretical subjects and 748
hours of drills, not counting the fourth class (plebe) summer or the
time spent on three summer practice cruises.
Of the above, 672 hours deal directly or indirectly with aviation
and aeronautics, approximately II per cent of the total time given
to the theoretical subjects at the Academy.
The above instruction covers in an elementary manner the funda-
mentals of aviation strategy and tactics, laws of storms and weather
maps, communications, aviation history, scouting, seamanship of
aircraft on the surface, aerial navigation, gas engines, aerial guns,
physics, mechanics, theory of flight and radio instruments.


  p. 1635 (#561)                      #

1925]
1635
Aviation at the Naval Academy
AVIATION AT PRESENT
On May 5, 1925, the Navy Department approved recommenda-
tions which were essentially as follows:
a) That the study of aeronautics will be an integral part of the
Naval Academy course and is to be gradually expanded.
b) That in addition to the studies in (a), during the regular
four-year course, all future graduates will be given three months
of special intensive instruction in ground and flight work, so that
all graduates, according to their physical qualifications, may later
become qualified either as naval observers or naval aviators.
c) That the additional flight work necessary to qualify as naval
observers or naval aviators will be undertaken during the first two
years after graduation, which period is classed as the instructional
period of junior officers.
d) That to initiate the above instruction, 150 midshipmen, mem-
bers of the class of 1926 (first class), were to remain at the
Academy this summer and take the three months' special intensive
course and also be given the "flight (medical) examination" to
determine their physical qualifications for flying.
e) That during the summer of 1926 the remaining members of
the class of 1926 (approximately 300 ensigns then) will be given
the three months' course; that subsequent classes will be given this
course immediately following their graduation.
f) That the Department of Seamanship, and the Department of
Marine Engineering and Naval Construction will hereafter be
known, respectively, as Seamanship and Flight Tactics, and Engi-
neering and Aeronautics.
It is observed here that under the plan outlined above, two
years hence, approximately 1,000 ensigns will have completed this
special three months' course before joining their ships for their
first commissioned service.
MISSION
MISSION OF THE COURSE
The mission of this course has already been outlined, but it
must be particularly borne in mind that no attempt is being made
to turn out a finished flyer before leaving the Academy. It will
be found that this course even stops short of solo flying, although
it includes sixteen hours actually in the air for each midshipman,
while the ground work includes twelve weeks of instruction, total-


  p. 1636 (#562)                      #

1636
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
ling some 405 hours. However, it is only fair to the Academy to
add that some of the most influential aviation magazines are now
carrying advertisements of what are reputed to be the leading
civilian flying schools, which offer courses in ground work of
from four to six weeks, with from six to ten hours in the air, and
guarantee to teach “even the most stubborn cases" to fly.
It will be recalled that after this three months' course the gradu-
ate is to complete his flight work in the first two years of com-
missioned service—his ultimate qualification as naval aviator or
naval observer to depend upon physical limitations as determined
by the flight examination.
The percentage of rejections for physical reasons in the service
at large is quite high, running around 70 per cent; the percentage
of rejections of midshipmen will not be made known as it is de-
sired to keep this confidential in order that each may pursue his
work as conscientiously as possible up to the time he may expect
to be ordered for the advanced work.
The Academy no more expects the graduate to be a finished
flyer upon the completion of the special course here than it ex-
pects him to be 100 per cent proficient as an engineer officer,
gunnery officer, navigator, or captain of a dreadnaught upon the
completion of his regular four-year course in engineering, gunnery,
navigation, and seamanship. The surgeon needs practice and ex-
perience upon leaving his school; so do the lawyer and the
engineer.
With the above clearly kept in mind there can be no confusion
as to what the Academy is actually attempting to accomplish.
PREPARATION FOR THE COURSE
Immediately following the publicly announced policy of the
Department, the academic authorities, with the assistance of two
naval aviators—one in charge of the Pensacola course of instruc-
tion and the other as a representative of the Bureau of Aero-
nautics—began to do the planning of the new course with the
results as follows.
Personnel.—There were ordered to report to the Superintendent
for duty as instructors in the ground work seven qualified aviation
instructors all of whom had taken the Pensacola course. In


  p. 1637 (#563)                      #


Bureau of Aeronautics Photo
SEA PLANE TYPE "H-16" USED IN INSTRUCTION OF MIDSHIPMEN AT U. S. NAVAL ACADEMY


  p. 1638 (#564)                      #

1638
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
addition, there were ordered as assistant drill instructors twenty-
eight enlisted men of aviation ratings for duties in connection with
drills in “structure and rigging,” “gas engines,” and “radio code
practice.”
There was further ordered to report to the Superintendent one
(VS) scouting division of six seaplanes (4 H-10s and 2 F-5 Ls).
The operating personnel came fresh from the scouting fleet for
this special and important duty. Its personnel consisted of nine
officers (all qualified naval aviators) and eighteen enlisted men
in the proper aviation ratings. The mission of this flight division
was to give the midshipmen their practical Aight instruction in the
air-approximately sixteen hours per midshipman—four hours in
each of the duties of (a) second pilot, (b) navigator, (c)
gunner and mechanic, and (d) radio man. The six planes were
moored in the Severn and attached temporarily to the Naval
Academy command. Their mere presence and their operations
exclusive of flights with the midshipmen were of great benefit to
every one connected with the course. Two spare seaplanes were
subsequently received as well as an additional pilot.
Material and Equipment. In addition to the eight seaplanes
there were provided :
a) Radio sending keys and telephone head receiving sets for
classroom instruction in radio code practice;
b) Six airplanes for practical work in disassembly and assembly
to supplement the theoretical course in “structure and rigging";
c) Twelve engines for practical work in disassembly and as-
sembly to supplement the theoretical course in “gas engines”;
d) An engine testing plant with six engine test stands. This
had to be constructed and was located near the Experimental
Station across the river but closer to the Academy than the rifle
range. It was here that the midshipmen encountered "trouble
shooting”—and they were required to locate the troubles and
correct them.
e) Navigational instruments consisting of: three bubble
sextants, three drift angle meters, three torpedo watches, two
clocks, three large compasses, three small compasses, one chart
board, three Bygrave's slide rules, three bearing plates, three
course and distance indicators.


  p. 1639 (#565)                      #


Naval Academy Photo
MIDSHIPMEN LOCATING AND CORRECTING ENGINE TROUBLE


  p. 1640 (#566)                      #

1640
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
f) Gunnery equipment as follows: one Vought V E-7 seaplane
with synchronized gun installation for practical work, fifty Lewis
machine guns (aircraft and other various types for instructional
purposes and range gunnery), complete sets of synchronizing gear
installations, eight camera guns and equipment, bomb equipment
and bombs of various types, bomb sights of latest types, torpedo
directors and equipment, deflection gauges, various and miscel-
laneous other equipment.
g) Numerous and various spare parts, supplies, and stores
necessary for plane and practical work of the course.
h) One Huff Daland seaplane.
THE COURSE
General.—The course began on June 8 and ended on August 28.
One hundred fifty first classmen remained at the Academy and
took the course, which included two full working days in a super-
vised visit of inspection to the aircraft factory at Philadelphia. In
general, the course established is the same as that given in the
“Ground School Course” and “Ground Gunnery" at Pensacola, the
chief differences being that:
a) There are less radio practices; and
b) There is no instruction in radio instruments as this is given
in regular instruction during the academic year.
Organization.—The regular academic heads of departments
supervised the work in their various departments. No additional
department was created although the Superintendent issued
orders making the head of the Department of Seamanship and
Flight Tactics his aide for aviation with the title of Director of
Aviation—the latter's duties being to coordinate all summer
activities in connection with aviation. He was assisted in these
duties by an experienced naval aviator. All told, the aviation
details to assist the regular academy officers numbered eighteen
officers and forty-six enlisted men including a flight surgeon.
The ground instruction was carried out by recitations and
lectures under the supervision of the respective heads of depart-
ments. There are six especially qualified aviation instructors who
do duty in all departments closely following the Pensacola practice,
changing it where necessary to conform to the Academy's methods.
The regular academy officers follow and study the lesson assign-


  p. 1641 (#567)                      #


Naval Academy Photo
ENGINE TESTING PLANT AND A SECTION OF CLASS OF 1926


  p. 1642 (#568)                      #

1642
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
ments in their respective departments and are required to be ready
at any call to carry on the instruction in the ground subjects.
Written examinations are held upon the completion of each subject.
The class was divided into four companies of three sections
each for administrative and classroom purposes, the number in the
sections being from twelve to thirteen.
The officers of the Flight Division previously referred to, gave
the practical flight instruction.
Textbooks.—These are the so-called Pensacola manuals (three
volumes) revised to date, being the same books that are to be used
by the next aviation class to be assembled at Pensacola. These
books cover the following: aerial navigation, aviation engines,
aerology, aviation history, aerial gunnery, bombing, scouting,
aircraft communications, theory of flight, and structure and
rigging. (Practical flying and water handling of seaplanes is
no longer in these manuals but is given from another text and
in connection with practical work.)
Assignment of Time.—The daily assignment of time (Sunday
and the afternoons of Wednesday and Saturday excepted) is as
follows:
8:00 A.M.
to 8:40 A.M. First period
8:50 A.M.
to 9:50 A.M. Second period
10:00 A.M.
to 11:00 A.M.
Third period
II:10 A.M.
12:10 P.M.
Fourth period
1:30 P.M.
2:10 P.M.
Fifth period
2:20 P.M.
3:20 P.M.
Sixth period
7:45 P.M.
9:30 P.M. Study period
The first and fifth periods during the first two months are
assigned to radio code practice, forty minutes twice daily. This
is approximately one-third less than at Pensacola but it is designed
to give a reception of from fifteen to sixteen code words per
minute and several have already exceeded this (written July 13).
The class is divided into four groups according to progress, the
keys being manned by expert enlisted instructor-operators. There
was no radio code practice in August except (from 4:00 P.m. to
4:30 P.M.) for those who are not up to the required standard.
The radio code practice is under the Department of Electrical
Engineering and Physics.
to
9.9°


  p. 1643 (#569)                      #

1925)
1643
Aviation at the Naval Academy
All study and preparation of lesson assignments is done between
7:45 P.M. and 9:30 P.M. and outside of the time allotted to recita-
tions and lectures.
To save time the entire class marches off at 8:00 A.M. to radio
code practice—ten minutes allowed to march directly to the section
rooms for the second period, and so forth, so no return is made to
Bancroft Hall until after 12.10 P.M. and then for the midday meal.
The same procedure obtains at 1:30 P.M.
The time from 3:10 P.M. to supper formation is for recreational
exercise and necessary additional study.
The first two academic months (June and July) are devoted to
theoretical subjects supplemented by practical work (and to radio
code practice). The practical work carried on in conjunction with
the text consists of eighteen hours in "structure and rigging” (eight
hours theory), and of twenty-four hours in “engines” (ten hours
theory). The practical work is in disassembly and assembly of
planes and engines.
Theoretical Subjects.—The following table shows the assign-
ment of subjects by hours to departments :
Total
Hours
Departments
Seamanship and Flight
Tactics
Subjects
Aviation History
Hours
3
Navigation
Aircraft Communications 4
Aerology
Scouting
Examinations
........35
Navigational Instruments
Aerial Navigation
Examinations
4........
Structure and Rigging
Engines
Examinations
........24
Theory of Flight
Engineering and Aeronautics
Electrical Engineering and
Physics
.......
Ordnance and Gunnery
Examination
Ground Gunnery
Bombing
Examinations
......
·36
Total
121


  p. 1644 (#570)                      #

1644
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The third academic month (August) is made up of twenty-four
forenoon periods of four hours and ten minutes each, devoted to
practical work in the Departments of Seamanship and Flight
Tactics, Navigation, and Ordnance and Gunnery. This work,
all purely aviation, together with the practical work in the first
two months is shown in the following table.
Seamanship and Flight Tactics
Hours per Midshipman
624 flying hours for 150 midshipmen
(4 to a seaplane) as passenger observers in duties of second
pilot, radio man, gunner and mechanic, and navigator. In-
struction in rules of the road; controls, water handling, but
short of solo flying ; sending and receiving radio messages;
target practice; taking sights; plotting positions and intercept
problems. (Four hours in each position.).........
Electrical Engineering and Physics
Radio code practice and examinations .....
Ordnance and gunnery
Range gunnery ...........
Engineering and aeronautics
Structure and rigging ......
Engines
Total hours 126
The afternoon periods in August from 1:30 P.M. to 3:20 P.M.
are of a practical nature—drills held by the Departments of Sea-
manship and Flight Tactics (ten hours), Ordnance and Gunnery
(six hours), Electrical Engineering and Physics (six hours), and
by the Executive Department (ten hours). While some of these
drills bear indirectly on aviation they are not so classified in the
summarizing table to follow. They are designed to bring out,
test, and classify the essential qualities of aptitude of the midship-
men and to make up for certain essentials missed by them on
first-class cruise. This is particularly true of the thirty-two hours
of practical work in navigation given during eight forenoons in
August. One forenoon each to navigation and radio code practice
(examinations) during August completes the practical work not
solely connected with aviation.
During the night-study periods in August twelve one-hour
lectures were delivered on aviation subjects.


  p. 1645 (#571)                      #

1925)
1645
Aviation at the Naval Academy
A Summary of the Course as regards the division of time is
shown in the following table:
Hours
(a) Recitations, lectures, and practical work in purely aviation
subjects
(b) Assigned study periods
(c) Lectures in August (nights) ..
...........
343
Total
(d) Drills not solely connected with aviation but for tests in
aptitude
.......
72
Grand Total 415
This, with the 6,628 hours in the four-year course, makes a
total of 7,043 hours of theoretical and practical instruction which
is given to each graduate at the Academy before he joins the fleet
for his first commissioned service. Of the 7,043 hours, 1,087
hours are now given directly or indirectly to aviation, or 15
per cent.
It seems fairly certain, judging from the past, that more and
more aviation will be added to the four-year curriculum and that
the more advanced ground school and fight work will be taken
up each succeeding summer for the graduating class.
In conclusion, it may be said that the midshipmen have displayed
the keenest interest in this course and to date not a single complaint
has reached the authorities from any source as to the actual flying
involved.
Author's Note.-Since above was written the time of flight instruction in
the air was reduced from sixteen to eight hours.


  p. 1646 (#572)                      #

NAVAL AVIATION TRAINING
CAPTAIN JAMES J. RABY, U. S. N.
T HE Navy has its only station for training heavier-than-air
aviators at Pensacola, having converted to this use, at con-
siderable expense, the old-time navy yard. The beautiful
harbor and the favorable weather conditions make it an excellent
place for seaplane training, and a small field on the naval reserva-
tion, together with the much larger ground seven miles away
known as Corry Field-provided by the Pensacola Chamber of
Commerce give fair facilities for landplane training.
Classes of aviation students are ordered here twice yearly, about
the first of January and of July. The candidates are selected from
young line officers and marine officers who volunteer for the duty,
and to be eligible a line officer must have had at least two years in
the feet after receiving his commission. Perhaps 40 per cent
of the volunteers fail on the physical requirements before being
sent to Pensacola. The classes, about 40 per cent of which are
officers of the Marine Corps, vary in number from forty to
seventy. The course is nine months, the first month being devoted
to ground school, the next five to seaplane training and ground
school combined, when the successful student is designated a naval
aviator, and then three months to landplane training and advanced
seaplane work. About 30 per cent of the students, because of
physical defects, failure in ground school, or inaptitude for flying,
fail to qualify as naval aviators, and are detached as soon as dis-
qualified. In addition to the classes for officers, about once in two
years a class of enlisted men is put through the first six months'
course, and those successfully completing it are designated naval
aviation pilots. Upon completion of the course the aviators and
pilots are assigned duty at different air stations ashore and afloat,
where they continue their training.
To produce a naval aviator is a problem of some complexity.
In both the selection of candidates and their training there must
be employed the precepts that experience dictates, and, in addition,


  p. 1647 (#573)                      #

19251
1647
Naval Aviation Training
all thať ingenuity can devise, for aviation, with all its dash and
thrills, is a serious, sober business.
To be fit material for aviation training, a man must be peculiarly
adapted to the work, the requirements falling under three head-
ings, mental, physical, psychological. In the selection of officer-
students it is unnecessary to be concerned with the first of these,
since anyone holding a commission in the service has demonstrated
his mental competency. At the same time the rather rigid physical
requirements for the line of the Navy and Marine Corps are not
sufficient for aviation. Flight duty requires a sense of balance,
acute hearing and vision, ability to carry on in rarefied atmosphere,
excellent judgment of depth, freedom from vertigo, and immunity,
as shown by his health record, to many common diseases. Then
comes the psychological make-up. What are a man's reactions,
his complex? What does he worry about? Has he a normal out-
look on life? Why does he want to fly—for the extra pay, for
professional advancement, for the sheer joy of flying? Is he
reckless or conservative, timid or over-cautious? Is he wide
awake, alert, on the job, lazy, lackadaisical? What are his morals,
and what his personal habits. All these things must be determined
before a man is designated for aviation training, and all through his
period of training the student is carefully watched by instructors,
the flight surgeons, and the air station staff.
The training course begins with a session during which the com-
mandant welcomes the class with a fatherly talk on safety first,
temperance, morale, and a few kindred subjects. The captain of
the yard follows with a short discourse on the observance of
station orders and yard regulations and the desirability of keeping
fit by engaging in athletics, and then the superintendent of training
schools lectures on the training syllabus. The students are given
one flight each to give them “the feel of the air”—and, incidentally,
to begin their flight pay.
The next four weeks are devoted to ground school, which is a
most strenuous time for the students, for in addition to a half
hour's exercise each morning in calisthenics designed to develop
a student's reactions when he takes to flying, and to train him not
to get dizzy in spins, loops, and other aerial maneuvers, he spends
many hours each day and well into the night studying aviation
indoctrination, theory of flight, description, structure, rigging, and


  p. 1648 (#574)                      #

1648
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
inspection of aircraft, aviation engines, signals and communica-
tions, aerology, navigation, scouting, spotting, radio, and practical
flying. In addition to the lectures and textbook study, he also
devotes considerable time to models of planes, motors, and other
equipment. The students practice radio code work over an hour
each day. Frequent examinations are held to grade the students.
Naval aviators must be good radio operators, so that a great
deal of time is spent in receiving and sending messages. Before
qualifying as an aviator, a student must be able to receive twenty
words a minute in English, code, or foreign languages.
After a month of ground school, Aight training begins, though
ground work continues for about two months longer. The class
is divided into sections, one section flying in the morning and
taking ground school in the afternoon, while the other section has
ground school in the morning and flying in the afternoon. Each
flight instructor has about four students.
The first training a student receives is in a seaplane known as
the N-9, a double-seater dual-control plane that flies comparatively
slowly, and is as safe as an airplane can be. In this he flies hori-
zontally at a speed under fifty miles an hour. He wears a Gosport
helmet so fitted that by means of a flexible tube the instructor
can at all times speak to him. The student, however, cannot talk
back, a necessary arrangement here as elsewhere. After ten hours
of dual instruction, during which time the student is taught to
control the plane under all conditions, he is given a check hop by
the chief instructor to determine if the student is qualified to solo,
that is, fly by himself. If competent to fly alone, he is turned
loose to solo. If not he is given three hours' further instruction,
after which he must prove himself proficient, or find himself a
finished aviator—absolutely finished.
After a successful check, the student solos for thirty hours, and
at the end of each five hours is given a check hop by his instructor.
On the final check, the student is required to do two loops in suc-
cession, reverse turns, falling leaf, right and left spins, one hour
of formation flying, and a precision landing test that consists of
climbing to 6,000 feet, spiraling to 3,000 feet, cutting the switch
to the magneto so that gravity is the only force acting on the plane,
then making two complete turns in a spiral, and effecting a normal


  p. 1649 (#575)                      #

1925]
1649
Naval Aviation Training
landing within 200 feet of a set mark. About this time in the
course, advantage of a full moon is taken to practice night Aying.
After passing the thirty hour check, the student is now ready
for instruction in the intermediate single-engine boat-typed sea-
plane called the HS boat. After five to seven hours dual instruc-
tion he solos this boat ten hours and then passes on to the advanced
boat seaplane training conducted in a large twin-motored seaplane
called the F-5-L, in which he receives six hours dual instruction
and solos for ten hours.
Though now qualified to fly, the student must take up gunnery
and bombing and make certain aerial navigation flights before he
becomes a naval aviator. After instruction in the machine gun
and firing on a shore range, he fires from his plane at a stationary
target and at a target towed by another aircraft. From this work
he proceeds with his bombing instruction, after which he drops
miniature bombs at stationary targets from various heights and
then at a moving target towed by a surface vessel ; finally he drops
service bombs. His course now takes him to aerial navigation,
where he solves three problems: first, coast piloting; second, sea-
ward patrol; third, a flight to intercept a surface craft. The stu-
dent solves each problem in three capacities: first as pilot; second
as observer or navigator, and third as radio operator, so that he
gets nine navigation flights. The successful student now, after six
strenuous months, becomes a qualified naval aviator and is per-
mitted to wear his much-coveted wings.
The class next proceeds with landplane training, which includes
some cross-country work, and the students are divided, some being
assigned to an advanced course in scouting, others to combat work,
while the rest take up spotting or torpedo-plane flying. This part
of the training being completed in about three months, the officers
are detached and ordered to duty with the aircraft squadrons of
the fleet or assigned to other air stations on shore.
To train its students the station overhauls, maintains, and
operates ninety airplanes of twelve different types, a seagoing tug,
a sub-chaser, five forty-knot seasleds, and a number of smaller
craft.
Occasionally there are accidents, especially during the period
when students are getting in their first twenty hours in the air.
There is at Pensacola an excellent system of taking care of crashes


  p. 1650 (#576)                      #

1650
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
in the bay. A steel tower 180 feet high has been erected at a
point overlooking all parts of the flying courses. Four men, in
charge of a petty officer, are on watch in this tower at all times
while planes are in the air, each man constantly scanning a quarter
of the horizon. Since no plane is permitted to get out of range of
vision from the tower, when a crash occurs it is sighted almost
before the plane strikes the water. Instantly the crash bell rings
in the dispensary and at the dock. Doctors and hospital corpsmen
rush to the dock where a forty-knot seasled is waiting with engine
running. Within a minute after the crash, the seasled, with doctor
and attendants on board, is speeding across the bay to the scene of
the accident, followed by the “Mary Ann," a floating crane, to pick
up the wreckage. Boats are stationed at different points in the
bay to render assistance. When students are flying at Corry Field,
an ambulance and an ambulance plane are stationed there. The
plane has a stretcher and a doctor's seat in it behind the pilot's
cockpit. In a recent crash the patient arrived at the dispensary
seven miles from the scene of the accident before the news of the
crash could be telephoned to the Air Station. The plane made the
trip in four minutes.
When the large seaplanes take long flights along the coast or
into the gulf, radio communication is maintained and their bearing
is kept track of from the radio compass station. Such planes
always carry homing pigeons for exercise or use in case of neces-
sity. The station has ninety trained pigeons. A seagoing tug is
always available to proceed immediately if a plane makes a forced
landing and requires assistance. .
As weather information is very important in aviation, there is
an aerological school at the Air Station, where enlisted men study
all phases of meteorology. The officer in charge of this school, a
naval aviator, in addition to conducting the school and giving
lectures to the student aviators, is also the aerologist of the station.
Much dependence is placed on his forecasts in carrying out the
daily flight routine and in authorizing cross-country flights. He
keeps in close touch with the Weather Bureau, but, in addition,
makes frequent flights to high altitudes in a powerful plane to
examine cloud formations at close range and to make a compre-
hensive survey of the surrounding weather conditions; meanwhile,
his various instruments are automatically recording the pressure,


  p. 1651 (#577)                      #

1925)
1651
Naval Aviation Training
temperature, and humidity of the atmosphere through which he
passes. Further, he sends from the laboratory at regular intervals
during the day into the air small rubber balloons inflated with
hydrogen, which are followed to great heights by means of theodo-
lites, and their courses through the free air are plotted later. From
all these data his weather map is drawn and his forecasts are made
with a high degree of accuracy.
There is also a photographic school where enlisted men and
officers are trained, not only in ordinary photographic work, but in
aerial photography, and the making of mosaic maps. An officer,
a qualified naval aviator, has charge of this school.
The morale of the station is excellent and the spirit of the
personnel is all that could be desired. The interest of the students
is maintained with enthusiasm. All forms of athletics are en-
couraged and the teams are excellent.
When the students leave Pensacola as qualified naval aviators,
they still lack experience but their training is continued after they
join the fleet or report at other stations, and every added ex-
perience makes them better and more conservative flyers. Navy
and marine corps aviators are really a wonderful lot of men, and
the service needs more of them.


  p. 1652 (#578)                      #

AVIATION IN COAST DEFENSE
BY CAPTAIN A. W. JOHNSON, U. S. NAVY
VIATION has furnished a powerful weapon for coast de-
fense. It also has made more difficult the problem of coast
defense by introducing the possibility of hostile air raids.
Everybody knows that aircraft can fly over land and water, and
that they can carry bombs that can sink surface craft. This has
created an impression that air forces acting alone, without support
of the other elements of the Army or Navy, can effectively defend
our coasts and protect shipping along our coasts. Some persons
have gone so far as to propose that the duty of patrolling the
coastal sea lanes be taken away from the Navy and turned over
entirely to the Army Air Service. It is unimportant to the people
of the United States who does this work so long as it is done
well. Herein is the crux of the whole question.
I. CONTROL OF SEA AREAS
In considering the subject of coast defense it is necessary to
visualize the conditions we shall find in actual warfare at sea. To
conduct and to control mercantile and military transportation by
sea in time of war requires naval power. As long as men and
merchandise are transported in ships in the sea—and there is no
likelihood that this mode of transportation ever will be superseded
—navies will be required to safeguard overseas interests. The
great bulk of the world's maritime trade must always be carried
in surface ships, for submarines and aircraft are inherently un-
economical as freight carriers and never can compete successfully
with surface ships in oversea commerce. Therefore, the principal
task of naval forces—whether submarine, surface, or aerial—is
to control the highways on the surface of the sea.
Unless supported by seacraft, aircraft probably never will be
able to exercise uninterrupted control over large or remote sea
areas. Aircraft and seacraft are both limited as to the time and
the distance that they can operate away from a base, but the time


  p. 1653 (#579)                      #

1925)
1653
Aviation in Coast Defense
that aircraft can remain in the air compared to the time that ships
can remain at sea is so short that ships probably will always be
the controlling factor in the larger sea areas, with aircraft acting
to assist them.
II. Mission of Coast DEFENSE
Coast defense is defense not only against invasion in force from
overseas, but against all other forms of hostile coastal activities..
It involves protection of shipping, of cities, and of vital communi-
cations against attack by sea craft, aircraft, and landing parties.
Against all these forms of attack every force that can contribute to
the enemy's defeat should be utilized. Naval forces alone may be
sufficient in some cases, army forces alone in other cases, and
sometimes it may be necessary to combine both forces to defeat the
enemy.
Attacks against coastal areas are of two kinds: major attacks by
large forces, and minor attacks or raids by small forces.
It is the duty of the U. S. fleet to intercept on the high seas any
large expedition contemplating a descent in force on the coasts,
and to engage it before any actual damage can be effected or
landing made. If the fleet is defeated the task of repelling inva-
sion falls to the Army. Major attacks of this character will not be
discussed, as we are here concerned with the forces established
for the specific duty of coast defense.
Minor attacks or raids in the coastal areas by small enemy
forces, such as submarines, destroyers, cruisers, and aircraft
carriers, cannot always be met by the main fleets and armies, and
it is to provide for such contingencies that coast defense forces
are required.
The main fleet should not be confined to the duty of defending
particular sections of the coast against minor attacks. It should
be free to carry out its greater mission of gaining and maintaining
control of the sea, which is most effectively accomplished by
destroying, neutralizing, or bottling up the enemy's naval forces.
Control of the sea will of itself forestall any invasion in force
from overseas and free the mobile army to engage in other
missions.


  p. 1654 (#580)                      #

1654
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
III. INFLUENCE OF SEA POWER
In our last three wars the Navy controlled the seas, and the
Army fought in Europe, in Cuba, and in the Philippines. In the
Civil War, and the war with Mexico, we had little opposition at
sea. The Army was not needed for coast defense, and was able to
win the war by defeating the enemy's armies on their own soil.
The Navy prevented supplies reaching the enemy by sea, and was
able to transport troops and supplies by sea to the enemy's ports.
But, in the War of 1812, when England was "Mistress of the
Seas," our little Navy and our merchant ships were bottled up at
home, save the few ships that escaped the British blockading
forces and reached the high sea. Some of these ships succeeded
in raids on British shipping. In this war a British squadron
landed sailors and soldiers on American soil, marched to Wash-
ington, and destroyed the Capitol, White House, and other build-
ings. The deciding battle of the Revolution, at Yorktown, was
won because the French fleet in Chesapeake Bay cut off Cornwallis
from the British fleet outside. The daring exploits of Paul Jones
in this war illustrate a type of raiding operations which must be
guarded against, and the Navy is obligated to take defensive
measures against such attacks as well as against the threats of a
major force.
IV. Coast DEFENSE FORCES
What forces are available for coast defense ? Leaving out the
main fleet and main army, the forces available for defense are
the local defense forces of the Army and Navy. The local coast
defense forces of the Navy include surface craft, submarines, and
naval aircraft, armed with guns, mines, bombs, and torpedoes.
The surface craft include destroyers, mine sweepers, tugs, salvage
vessels, sub-chasers, and small patrol craft. Other elements of
the Navy in coastal areas are: the industrial establishments for the
maintenance, repair and supply of the naval forces; the communi-
cation system including radio and radio compass stations; the
intelligence system, including the life saving and lighthouse
services, and detachments of marines.
The army coast defense forces are composed of the various
arms of the Army, the fixed and mobile artillery, including rail-
way and tractor-drawn heavy artillery, searchlights, anti-aircraft


  p. 1655 (#581)                      #

1925]
1655
Aviation in Coast Defense
guns, army aircraft, the mine planters for laying observation mine
fields, and fixed obstructions.
V. CAPABILITIES OF NAVAL TYPES IN Coast DEFENSE
Let us now examine the capabilities of the various types of
naval craft for coast defense.
Aircraft.—The development of bombing has given to aircraft
great offensive qualities against sea and land forces. Aircraft
provide the best defense against other aircraft. The high speed
and great range of vision of aircraft make them particularly
valuable for scouting. They are superior to seacraft for searching
out a given area in a minimum time. Seacraft are better adapted
for maintaining a continuous patrol in areas distant from a base,
because they can patrol day and night, in fair and foul weather,
for a long time without returning to their base for fuel. Airplanes
cannot do this unless based on sea craft; they must fly from their
shore bases out to the scouting area, and return to their shore
bases daily for fuel. Flying back and forth from the base con-
sumes a large amount of fuel and reduces the number of hours
available for scouting and patrolling the area. The wear and tear
on engines and planes is considerable, and if the patrol is to be
maintained indefinitely over an extensive line, large reserves of
planes and engines for replacement are required.
Carriers. By using aircraft carriers as bases, the scouting area
for airplanes can be extended seaward, but it must be remembered
that aviators will experience greater difficulties in operating con-
tinuously from carriers at sea, and locating them when returning
from a scouting mission than when returning from a scouting
mission to an air base ashore. An aircraft carrier while on her
station in a patrol area would be subject to submarine and possibly
surface attacks.
Submarines. Submarines are especially valuable for patrol and
scouting duty, and are excellent either for offensive or defensive
work. They can operate independently and continuously in distant
areas without supporting forces, for long periods of time, and they
are less liable to be seen or destroyed by hostile forces than any
other type of patrol craft, but they have the disadvantage of slow
speed, and limited vision.


  p. 1656 (#582)                      #

1656
(Sept.
U.S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Airships.-Rigid airships possess some, though not all, of the
advantages of aircraft and seacraft for scouting and patrol duty.
Like airplanes, they have extensive vision and great speed. Like
ships, they can slow down, stop, and even back, and have an exten-
sive operating range. But, though vulnerable to gunfire they may,
by keeping out of gun range, pierce a screen of hostile surface
vessels which surface scouts themselves might be unable to pierce.
Although they can easily keep out of range of surface craft, they
cannot outrun or outclimb the airplane, but may carry airplanes to
a limited extent for protection. They have no great offensive
value in sea warfare, and are less reliable as operating units than
seacraft. Under favorable conditions they can cover larger areas
in a given time than seacraft, and can supplement light cruisers to
a certain extent for scouting, but not for screening duty.
VI. COORDINATION OF TYPES
Each type, submarine, surface vessels, airplane, aircraft carrier,
and airship, has advantages and disadvantages peculiar to itself.
A skillful naval commander will carefully consider every available
type of craft in organizing his forces and in planning their work.
He will use each type to the best advantage, assigning each unit
to the task that it is best fitted to perform and coordinating the
efforts of all to accomplish most effectively the mission of the
whole organization. Such an organization composed of different
units is like the human body which is composed of different mem-
bers, each performing its allotted task, all directed by one mind.
In a scouting or patrol force each unit is an eye that watches over
its allotted sector, and instantly communicates by radio—the
Navy's nerve system—what it sees to the mind of the organization,
and, at the direction of this mind, force is applied most effectively.
Only such an organization can effectively perform the manifold
duties connected with high sea scouting and coastal patrol.
VII. CHARACTER OF COASTAL OPERATIONS
The operations necessary for coast defense are of two kinds :
precautionary measures and counter attacks. Precautionary meas-
ures include scouting and patrolling, escorting and convoying,
mine sweeping and mine laying, and operations of the intelligence
and communication systems. Counter attacks are those operations


  p. 1657 (#583)                      #

1925]
1657
Aviation in Coast Defense
designed to repulse the enemy attack when it is developed by the
precautionary measures. Both functions require combination of
forces to accomplish best results.
VIII. SCOUTING AND PATROLLING
An enenıy's best chance of success lies in surprise attacks. To
prevent surprise by the enemy he must be discovered far enough
away from our coast to give sufficient time to our forces to con-
centrate, intercept, and attack him. The farther away the enemy
is discovered the greater time our forces will have to concentrate
and attack him. The Navy's far flung scouting forces at sea
afford the best means of locating him at the earliest moment.
After locating him they should maintain contact with him and
continually report the position, strength, and disposition of his
forces. While the enemy approaches the coast our forces can con-
centrate and advance to meet him under the most favorable con-
ditions. For scouting and patrolling in the coastal areas the Navy
uses aircraft, both lighter-than-air and heavier-than-air, surface
craft and submarines. They are based on naval coastal shore
bases, which are also used for fitting out, repair, replacement,
supply, and mobilization of material and personnel, and on mobile
tenders operating along the coast. They are disposed in such
manner as to cover given areas most effectively and permit the
maximum concentration of force on the enemy in minimum time.
The nationality and character of shipping encountered in the
coastal areas must be ascertained by patrol craft. To do this they
must exercise the right of search, and therefore must be surface
vessels. How can the duty of visiting and searching vessels for
contraband be performed by aircraft unassisted by surface vessels ?
A seaplane may land on the water in fair weather close to the
vessel and send a man on board. The Germans, in the last war,
tried this with their submarines. It worked well at first. But
later, when guns were mounted on merchant ships, and were
turned with deadly effect on the submarines, they were forced to
abandon the practice of searching vessels at sea. The submarines
retaliated by firing torpedoes and sinking ships on sight, remaining
submerged without danger to themselves until the ships had been
sunk. This violated international law and practice. A seaplane
on the water would be helpless if exposed to gunfire from a ship.


  p. 1658 (#584)                      #

1658
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
To avoid danger to themselves pilots of airplanes, if they wished
to do so, could bomb merchant vessels on sight, whether prohibited
by international law or not. Such practices by any country would
force it into the same situation with respect to neutrals in which
Germany found herself when her submarines began sinking
neutral ships without warning. An airplane could drop a note on
the ship or give her radio or visual signal instructions to proceed
to a designated port for examination, but it would be impracticable
for the airplane to escort the ship into port to insure that the
instructions were carried out.
For detecting the presence of submarines certain classes of
vessels of the coast defense forces are equipped with listening
devices. These “hear” the sounds made by submarines running
submerged and it is possible to locate the submarines when the
"hunting squadrons” equipped with these devices are skillfully
handled. Submarines also use listening devices in their work
against surface craft and other submarines. Combination of all
types of naval forces is necessary for the most effective scouting
and patrolling of sea areas.
IX. ESCORTING AND CONVOYING
If we are to safeguard our own shipping where it is subject to
repeated attack we must protect it with escorts. Consider a twelve
knot convoy escorted by airplanes. These have a cruising speed
of say ninety miles an hour and a flying radius of a thousand
miles. Assume that they can remain in the air twelve hours.
They will have to leave the convoy after about ten hours of escort
duty in order to return to their bases before running out of fuel.
This would furnish a twelve knot convoy with an airplane escort
for about 120 miles beyond the shore line. To escort further by
airplanes would require a relief escort. In thick weather, the air-
plane might lose sight of the convoy and would then fail to afford
it protection. At night when the convoy was running without
lights, as would be necessary in time of war, the same thing might
happen. If one of the ships of the convoy were torpedoed she
could not be salvaged or towed back to port by airplanes. She
might sink, as often happened in the last war, but airplanes could
not rescue the passengers.


  p. 1659 (#585)                      #

1925]
1659
Aviation in Coast Defense
This all means that surface ships are absolutely essential for the
efficient performance of patrol and convoy duty at sea both inshore
and offshore, and that means a navy—a navy like the United
States Navy with its own aircraft. The need for the latter in
addition to ships, is shown below.
We know that during the World War the Navy, in cooperation
with the allied navies, kept open our sea communications and
effectually intercepted the sea communications of the enemy
powers. During this period, while the Navy was escorting and
convoying over two million army troops and all of their supplies
overseas, the Navy played a most important part in "winning the
war.” The air forces of the United States Navy flew over two
and one half million miles, patrolling the seas from the various
coastal air stations in the United States, England, Ireland, France,
Italy, and Canada. Four hundred of our naval airplanes were
engaged in this work abroad while the army air forces were being
carried overseas or fighting on the western front. Thirty-seven
enemy submarines were attacked by naval aircraft. These naval
aircraft were working in cooperation with hundreds of surface
ships and submarines, all of which were commanded by and
operated under the immediate orders of naval officers in accordance
with a definite joint plan. Aircraft surface vessels, and sub-
marines were mutually helpful, and the best results were obtained
by a combination of all types.
Let us see how these operations were carried out. Take a
convoy assembling in one of our great harbors, and suppose that
enemy submarines and raiders may be actively operating in that
vicinity.
The naval commander of the coastal areas is the officer ap-
pointed to direct and coordinate the work of the naval coastal
defense forces, which include all types of naval craft, surface, sub-
marine, and air. He is charged with the responsibility of assem-
bling the convoy. He must furnish it with radio and signal
instructions and sailing directions, must provide the necessary
naval escorts, including naval aircraft, and must assure himself
that the coastal waters through which the convoy is to pass are
clear of mines and enemy craft.
The convoy is assembled; the orders to the commanding officers
have been given; the course, speed, formations to be taken within


  p. 1660 (#586)                      #

1660
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
and without the coastal areas have been made known to the com-
manders of all units, merchant and naval, engaged in the operation.
All is secure inside the anchorage. The convoy and escorting
vessels are ready to sail. Outside the anchorage naval aircraft
and other naval units have been scouting over the area through
which the convoy will pass to drive clear any hostile surface craft
or submarines. Other naval aircraft are flying over the channel
to see if they can locate any enemy mines, and the mine sweepers
are at work in the channel. The naval district commandant, in
touch by radio and telephone with all of his units, knows exactly
what is going on outside of the harbor. He receives reports as to
when the channels have been swept clear, and knows when it is
safe to move the convoy.
The harbor defense net is opened to permit the convoy to pass
out, and the convoy gets underway. The van of the coastal escort,
consisting of sub-chasers and other vessels, precedes the convoy
out of the harbor and takes station ahead and on the flanks of the
convoy column as the ships in pre-determined order pass down the
swept channel. They steam out to sea, and as they reach the open
water they deploy to their designated positions in the formation to
be maintained during the voyage and commence zigzagging as pre-
scribed in their instructions. The smaller vessels and aircraft of
the escort that have been safeguarding the convoy through the
narrow waters now begin to leave the convoy to return to their
base, while the destroyers and larger vessels of the escort continue
with the convoy until relieved by the high sea escort.
The responsibility of the naval district commandant, who has
been in charge of all these arrangements, ends only when the
coastal escort has safely turned over the convoy to the commander
of the high sea escort, who becomes responsible for insuring the
safe passage of the convoy over the sea. The fleet will have dis-
posed units strategically to safeguard further this and other con-
voys in their transoceanic voyages.
Meantime, other convoys, and shipping, are approaching the
coast. Their movements are made known to the naval head-
quarters in the district through the naval communications service,
and the same provision must be made for the safety of incoming
vessels as was made for the safety of the outgoing convoy just


  p. 1661 (#587)                      #

1925]
1661
Aviation in Coast Defense
described. These great arteries of sea commerce must be protected
by the Navy day and night throughout the war.
During the last war, when the submarine campaign was so
active along the coasts of our allies, the allied convoys on approach-
ing the war zone were met far out at sea by properly organized
and instructed escorts of naval vessels, which automatically carried
the convoy on to the coastal areas, all under the control of naval
officers. As they approached the coast they were met by other
types of naval craft, including naval aircraft, .which continued to
safeguard the convoy through the narrow submarine-infested
waters. These convoys were made up of ships from all parts of
the world, flying the flags of the allied nations. There were fast
troop convoys bound for the coast of France. There were convoys
of food and munition ships, of moderate speed, supplying the feet
in the north of Scotland and the armies on the western front.
There was a continuous flow of small and large convoys bound for
the channel ports and the Mediterranean, carrying valuable cargoes
of food stuffs and merchandise for the millions toiling in the
factories behind the allied lines. Provision had to be made by the
Navy for continually safeguarding this incessant flow of shipping,
outbound and inbound, from shore line to shore line. The elaborate
organization to maintain the necessary escorts of the proper type,
to provide them at the proper time and place, and to collect and
disseminate the information necessary to coordinate all work was
completely under the control of the naval service. The success
with which the Navy carried out these duties during the last war
was due solely to the fact that the Navy is organized, trained and
equipped for this kind of work. It can be said, without exaggera-
tion, that the organization and discipline of the convoys and escorts
was as nearly perfect as it is humanly possible for any organization
to be. Here, again, we see the combination of air and sea forces.
X. MINE LAYING AND Mine SWEEPING
Mining operations are important in coast defense because all
classes of ships are vulnerable to mines. Many vessels, including
battleships, submarines and merchant vessels, were destroyed by
them in the last war. Channels must be swept clear of mines in
the shipping lanes to insure the safe passage of vessels. Mine
layers acting on the offensive lay mines off the enemy's coast, and


  p. 1662 (#588)                      #

1662
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
when on the defensive lay mines to protect given areas off our
own coast. An American mine squadron laid a mine barrage of
over 50,000 mines in the North Sea during the last war, and
cleared the barrage by sweeping up the mines at the end of the
war. Mines may be laid by surface craft and by submarines
equipped for the purpose. It would be possible for an airplane
to lay a mine, but neither submarines nor aircraft are capable of
sweeping up mines. All this work must be under the direction of
the naval commander who must coordinate all activities of the
coast defense forces to insure the safety of shipping.
XI. INTELLIGENCE AND COMMUNICATION SYSTEM
In all military operations, in every theater of action on the
land, at sea, and in the air—accurate and timely information con-
cerning enemy movements is essential to success. The service of
information at sea is maintained by the naval scouting and patrol
forces which are inseparable from the organization they serve
the Navy. The contacts of all these forces with the naval com-
mander-in-chief must be direct, accurate, and swift. The informa-
tion must be guarded and flow uninterruptedly to the directing
centers of operations ashore and afloat where it is analyzed, acted
upon and despatched to all forces having need of it. All units of
the fleet and naval coast defense forces are integral parts of the
naval communication organization. This organization includes
also the naval radio stations on shore, the radio direction finders
for locating enemy vessels, and the coastal signal service.
XII. COUNTER ATTACKS
If an attack develops after the precautionary measures have
been taken, it should be met by counter attack. The strong arm
for counter attack at sea is the main fleet, but to meet attacks by
seacraft or by aircraft within gun range or within flying range of
the coast, there are available the naval coast defense forces, and the
aircraft and artillery of the Army. Beyond Aying range of the
coast, only naval forces would be available. For counter attacks
against surface vessels, guns, torpedoes, mines, and aerial bombs
may be used. In addition, the depth bomb would be used against
submarines, but for counter attacks against aircraft the machine
gun carried in aircraft is the most effective weapon.


  p. 1663 (#589)                      #

1925]
1663
Aviation in Coast Defense
Picture a situation in which an overseas enemy plans an air-
craft attack upon one of our principal cities. He must transport
his aircraft across the sea in ships to some point within flying
range of the objective before he can launch the attack. The
attacking airplanes will have to operate from aircraft carriers or
from suitable shore bases in his possession. While the enemy is
at sea, and until his ships have reached the point of attack, the
problem is distinctly a naval one.
The Navy may prevent the enemy from bringing his aircraft
carriers to a favorable point, or may prevent him from establishing
a shore base within flying range of the coast. But, once the enemy
aircraft have taken the air to attack our cities, only our own air-
craft can intercept and defeat them. Fast combat planes are
necessary to intercept and defeat the enemy bombers and combat
planes accompanying them. The attacking aircraft have an initial
advantage difficult to overcome because they can choose their time
and their objective, take advantage of weather or darkness to
insure surprise, and reach the desired ceiling before the defending
planes ca ndo so. Naval aircraft of the coast defense forces con-
sist principally of patrolling, scouting, torpedo and bombing planes,
designed principally for use against aircraft, and are not intended
primarily for use against air attacks. Against air attacks of this
kind, which by whatever means have avoided our fleet, we rely
entirely upon the army pursuit planes which are provided for this
purpose. The Navy does not maintain pursuit planes on shore
bases or stations other than for training purposes. The Army
Air Service has the responsibility of meeting attacks of this kind
and should be adequately equipped for the purpose. Our main
reliance against air attacks of this kind is in the greater number of
army pursuit planes available.
XIII. UNITY OF COMMAND
For coast defense the Navy is the first line, and the Army is the
second line. If the first line falls back upon the coast the two lines
merge into one. It is generally recognized that when these lines
merge, or whenever there is joint action between the Army and
Navy, there should be unity of command, but it is not always
clear exactly what is meant by unity of command. Some persons
unfamiliar with the many activities connected with coast defense


  p. 1664 (#590)                      #

1664
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
believe that all coast defense should be placed under control of
the Army. Others believe that all such activities should be placed
under the Navy, because coast defense activities are mostly naval.
History abounds in striking illustrations where violation of the
principle of unity of command has resulted disastrously. The
difficulties of coordinating operations of joint forces—particularly
in coast defense—would be greatly increased if, instead of having
to coordinate the two existing organizations of the Army and
Navy, it were necessary to coordinate with them a third inde-
pendent organization, as would be the case if there were a separate
air force.
Unity of command of joint forces should be directed com-
mand which is only general in character. The commander states
in general what is to be done, but does not say how it is to be done.
The commands of the separate task forces are absolute, the com-
manders specifying in detail both what is to be done, and how it
is to be done. There should be no conflict between the two kinds
of command. There will be none if the primary functions of the
army and navy forces are adhered to. When forces are joined for
a combined operation to accomplish a definite objective, maximum
results can be secured only by cooperation and coordination. The
Joint Army and Navy Board has laid down the guiding principles
to be followed by the Army and Navy to provide unity of com-
mand in joint operations in coast defense. Under ordinary circum-
stances, if the operation is primarily naval the supreme command
should be naval. If the operation is primarily military, the Army
should command. The same principle should apply to the lesser
commands in minor or local operations in which the objectives are
subordinate to the main objective.
In the United States both the Army and Navy have functions
in coast defense, but the control is not wholly in the hands of
either. In Europe the system differs from ours. The coast de-
fense of France is entirely under the Navy until the actual landing
of hostile forces takes place. In England it has been a naval
function heretofore, all under the control of the naval officer com-
manding the coast defense forces. Since the formation of the
Royal Air Force, where naval aviation and army aviation have
been consolidated into an independent organization, the exact
status of the Army, Navy and the Air Force with respect to coast


  p. 1665 (#591)                      #

1925]
1665
Aviation in Coast Defense
defense seems to be indefinite. In Germany coast defense was all
under the Navy.
Operations in coastal areas are primarily naval, but the com-
mander of naval coast defense forces should always keep the com-
mander of the army forces advised regarding the development of
any situation at sea in which the Army subsequently may be called
upon to take part, directly or indirectly.
Should the naval commander request the assistance of the army
forces to repel an attack he should advise the army commander as
to the situation. He should specify what forces are desired, when
and where they will be needed, and the objective. The forces
should be furnished if available, and should be directed to report
to the naval commander for operation under his direction in co-
operation with the naval forces. If an enemy force is greatly
superior to the naval foặce available for use against it, and the
· naval force is unable to cope with the situation, the naval com-
mander should so notify the army commander. The Army would
then have the paramount interest. The naval forces should be
turned over to the Army and the joint forces should operate under
the lirection of the army commander.
XIV. CONCLUSIONS
until airplanes, loaded with bombs, can Ay back and forth with
impunity across the Atlantic or Pacific Oceans, as they can now do
across the English Channel and other inland seas, the problem of
defense against hostile air raids will remain a much simpler
ogle for the United States than it is for European powers.
A strong navy, composed of all types of craft—submarine, air
and surface craft, balanced in numbers, and coordinated in action
to insure mutual support, provides the most effective means of re-
pelling overseas attacks and of protecting shipping on the seas.
Anavy that is strong enough to protect shipping on the high seas
certainly can, effectively control it along the home coast lines.
If we were to assign exclusively to the Army Air Service the
dity of protecting the coastal sea lanes within flying radius of the
shore bases, it would still be necessary for the Navy to protect the
sed lanes beyond the range of aircraft. There would have to be an
imaginary boundary line on the surface of the sea, on one side of
which the Army, and on the other side of which the Navy would


  p. 1666 (#592)                      #

1666
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
be responsible. The bordering area would probably develop into
a “no man's sea” over which neither service would claim responsi-
bility. Aircraft, unsupported by seacraft, could never perform
efficiently the work required of a naval coast defense force in time
of war, no matter how great their flying range. The natural line
of demarkation is the shore line, and the natural service for work
beyond this line is the Navy. Our Navy, with its aircraft, its sub-
marines and surface vessels of all types, and its complete intelli-
gence and communication system, is amalgamated into an efficient
and well balanced organization to do all work from shore line to
shore line. The Army Air Service is by nature incapable of doing
the Navy's work.
When submarines were first introduced in our Navy there was a
some discussion as to whether they should be placed under the
Army or under the Navy. Now aviation has become an important
and integral arm of the Army and of the Navy. It has supple u
mented other weapons of both services, but has not supplanted
any of them. It has not changed the relation between the Arms
and the Navy. The Navy has its duties in connection with coast
defense which are naval in character, and the Army has its to
characteristic duties.
To restrict the Navy in the choice of its weapons or in
facilities for operating them would deprive the Navy of the
play of its power to meet all of its responsibilities. To turno
coastal patrol, or the control of shipping in our coastal sea la..
now a responsibility of the Navy, to the Army Air Service WON
duplicate existing functions of the Navy, would confuse the
problem of coast defense, and would weaken army aviation
diverting it from other important missions.


  p. 1666 (#593)                      #



  p. 1666 (#594)                      #



  p. 1667 (#595)                      #

STAR IDENTIFICATION DIAGRAM
BY MIDSHIPMAN (now Ensign) L. H. BURKHEAD AND MIDSHIP-
MAN (now Ensign) W. H. BENSON, U. S. Navy!
AY a straightedge from the point on AB numbered (in black)
below the line AB, corresponding to the azimuth measured
from the elevated pole, to a point laid off on the outer
circle on the opposite side of the vertical line CD and above AB
an amount equal to the altitude measured in degrees.
Note where the straightedge intersects the black arc whose
number (in red) above the line AB corresponds to the azimuth
measured from the elevated pole.
Using the red circles as guides rotate the point thus found
through 90 - L degrees clockwise about center of chart.
Lay a straightedge from the point revolved to the point on AB
whose black number corresponds to the red number on the black
arc upon which the revolved point fell.
The number of degrees from AB to the intersection of the
straightedge with the outer circle on the same side of the vertical
line CD, upon which the revolved point fell, is the declination. It
is the same name as the latitude if it is above AB and different
name if below.
Lay a straightedge from C to the intersection of line AB with
the black arc upon which the revolved point fell. The amount in
hours and minutes from B to where the straightedge intersects the
outer circle is the hour angle.
EXAMPLE:
Latitude 24-00 N. h 25-00. Z 116-00 (from elevated pole E or
W) lay straightedge from (1) to (2) and obtain point (3).
Rotate (3) 90 - 24 equals 66 degrees clockwise to obtain (4). Lay
straightedge (4) to (5) and get (6) Declination 11-00S. Lay
straightedge C to (7) and get hour angle 3h. 44m. H.A. combined
with L.S.T. gives right ascension.
* See page 1723 Discussion by G. W. Littlehales.


  p. 1668 (#596)                      #

1668
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
APPROXIMATE ALTITUDE AND AZIMUTHS
Lay a straightedge from C to the point on the outer circle whose
distance below B in hours and minutes equals the hour angle.
Note black arc where the straightedge intersects AB.
Lay a straightedge from the point on AB whose black number
corresponds to the red number of the black arc found above to
a point on opposite side of line CD whose distance in degrees
above AB equals the declination, if the declination is the same
name as the latitude; below AB if different name.
Note the point where the straightedge intersects the black arc
found above. By use of the red circles revolve this point counter-
clockwise 90 - L degrees about the center of chart.
Lay a straightedge from the revolved point to a point on AB
whose black number corresponds to the red number of the black
arc upon which the revolved point fell.
The number of degrees from AB to the intersection of the
straightedge with the outer circle is the altitude.
The red number of the black arc upon which the revolved point
fell is the azimuth.
EXAMPLE:
Declination 11-00S. Latitude 24-00N. Hour Angle 3h 44m.
Lay a straightedge from C to the point (8) and get (7).
Lay a straightedge from (5) to (6) and get (4).
Rotate (4) 90 - 24 equals 66 degrees counter-clockwise and get
(3).
Lay a straightedge from (1) to (3) and get (2) equals 25-00
(altitude).
Red number corresponding to (3) equals azimuth equals 116
degrees.


  p. 1669 (#597)                      #

THE BRIDGE ACROSS THE ATLANTIC
CAPTAIN YATES STIRLING, JR., U. S. Navy
THE creation of a huge Naval Transport Force was one of
I the most unique naval achievements of the war. In retro- .
spect, it seems even to those who grew up in it, almost a
miracle of accomplishment. It began from nearly nothing and
ended with much over one hundred great transport ships within
the space of sixteen months.
The Army, prior to the World War, maintained a transport
service. These vessels carried troops between the United States
and our island possessions. They were small, slow in speed and
few in number; the officers and crew of the merchantmen type.
War Department authority on board was vested in an army
quartermaster, captain or lieutenant, to whom the master of the
vessel was responsible. The troops were, by army regulations,
under the direct command of the senior army officer of the troops
on board, who by virtue of his rank also commanded the ship
considered as a military force.
The first of our Army to go to France as an expeditionary
force consisted of men drawn from certain regular divisions, about
10,000 strong. The ships to carry this force were assembled by
the War Department, loaded and made ready to sail by June 14,
1917.
Rear Admiral Albert Gleaves, U. S. Navy, in command of the
cruiser force of the Atlantic fleet, was assigned the duty of escort-
ing this, the greatest single convoy of United States troops that had
up to that time put to sea. The convoy consisted of fourteen
merchant ships converted to army transports. These merchant
vessels were chartered from American mercantile companies.
They were armed by the Navy with guns and furnished naval
officers and armed guard crews to serve them. The escort of the
convoy included one armored cruiser, three first-class cruisers, two
converted yachts, one auxiliary cruiser, and twelve destroyers. A
navy collier and a naval transport formed part of the convoy. The


  p. 1670 (#598)                      #

1670
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
convoy was divided into four separate groups and each proceeded
by slightly different routes to the same port of debarkation-
St. Nazaire, France.
The experience gained in this expedition by Admiral Gleaves
made his appointment as the commander of the naval transport
force, in addition to his duties in command of the cruiser force,
a most logical and happy one.
One feature of the first convoy has been generally overlooked--
oiling destroyers at sea, common enough now, but unique then.
Just previous to our entry into the war, the commander of the
destroyer force (Admiral Gleaves, as it happened) had made
special efforts to develop this important phase of logistics. Lieu-
tenant, now Commander, A. L. Bristol, U. S. Navy, and the late
Lieutenant Commander F. M. Perkins, U. S. Navy, developed a
scheme which was so successful that 70,000 gallons of oil per hour
could be delivered by a tanker to a destroyer at sea on one side,
or twice this amount, if fueling on both sides. Under particularly
good conditions, three destroyers might be fueled at sea at the
same time. Before the first expedition sailed, the tanker Miami
was sent out to take a selected position in the Atlantic on the route
of the convoy and as the various groups passed, the destroyers
(mostly short-legged ones) filled up their tanks from this tanker
at sea. Otherwise, the destroyers in the convoy would have had
to be towed more than half way across the ocean, thus prolonging
the passage and increasing the danger of submarine attack.
The first convoy demonstrated the imperative necessity for the
Navy to take over the army transport service insofar as concerned
the manning and sailing of the ships; and the Army to a man
among those who had crossed the ocean enthusiastically approved
this solution. However, to man all vessels chartered by the Army
for troop ships without depleting the fighting ships of the fleet was
a most difficult undertaking. The Bureau of Navigation of the
Navy Department, under the direction of Admiral L. C. Palmer,
succeeded admirably in accomplishing this task.
The safe passage of our troops through the submarine-infested
zone about England and France was so very serious a considera-
tion that no question of personal preference or service jealousy
could stand against the common sense opinion that the responsi-
bility was one to be intrusted to men who had been trained to the


  p. 1671 (#599)                      #

1925]
1671
The Bridge Across the Atlantic
sea. The army transport system, as operated in time of peace,
was known to be fundamentally bad for war. To insure the
greatest immunity from attack and safety to the troops in case of
casualty to the ships, the factor most important was disciplined
crews for the vessels. This only could be assured by placing the
transports under naval control. The appropriation of money for
the purpose was administered by the Army. This was unfortunate
because it frequently gave rise to misunderstandings, but was of
minor consequence.
Army officials, especially at first, often failed to appreciate the
changed status of the transports, and looked upon them as army
chattels instead of naval ships of war. The admiral and his naval
captains with patience, courtesy and good humor endeavored to
correct this false impression. Many army men to the end con-
sidered a naval transport a mere carrier of live freight and
entirely overlooked the military side of the undertaking: that the
conduct of convoys across an ocean where an enemy might any-
where be met was a distinctly naval duty. Many naval transport
captains, in addition to commanding their individual vessels, also
commanded an entire convoy.of from six to over a dozen ships
carrying in the aggregate as many as 40,000 men.
In the ports of the United States at the outbreak of our war
were eighteen German merchantmen, admirably appropriate to
become troopships. The one hindrance was the complete disable-
ment of their machinery by the German crews upon order of their
government. This sabotage, the German High Command con-
sidered would require two years to repair, inasmuch as there were
no spare parts of machinery in the United States and no plans
of the disabled parts of machinery available in this country to
permit spares to be made.
These vessels had been seized by the United States Government
immediately upon our declaration of war, but too late to prevent
this carefully planned destruction of machinery. The vessels had
been turned over to the United States Shipping Board, and that
newly created power began at once to endeavor to solve the vital
question of putting the machinery in condition for service while
at the same time converting the vessels for the important purpose
of carrying our troops to France.


  p. 1672 (#600)                      #

1672
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
These eighteen ex-German vessels were under repairs in the
larger commercial ports of the country. Table I shows their
capabilities as troopships. Other ex-German ships were after-
wards converted to troopships but those shown in the table were
the pioneers of the naval transport service.
These eighteen ships could be counted upon to land in France
nearly 700,000 men in one year, provided no vessels were lost or
seriously damaged by enemy action. The Von Steuben and De
Kalb in addition to being fitted to carry troops, were supplied with
a formidable battery of 5-inch guns and were used also as escorting
vessels. All naval transports were armed with not less than four
6-inch or 5-inch guns.
To each of the transport ships was assigned a regular officer,
of the Navy of the rank of captain or commander, and the principal
officers for the ships were of the regular Navy. The importance
of transport duty was emphasized and the Navy Department made
every conceivable effort to provide the ships with the best personnel
available, even to robbing the older battleships of their experienced
officers and enlisted men.
It is not difficult to understand that the naval personnel received
a distinct mental shock upon viewing their new ships for the first
time. These vessels had been laid up since August, 1914, three
whole years, without turning a wheel. The engines were complete
wrecks and the shipyard workmen had not improved the dis-
ordered appearance of the ships in their two months' labor in tear-
ing out the insides throughout to fit the crude standard army
troopship layout, including wooden standee bunks for the troops
and the necessary sanitary arrangements and feeding facilities for
many thousands of men.
The naval officers, accustomed to the familiar if not direct
methods of the naval establishment, found a condition much
complicated. The ships were partially manned by the Shipping
Board. The guards to protect the material from further enemy
sabotage were supplied by the Army. The repairs and the work
of conversion was being done under the direction of the Shipping
Board and the Army jointly. The Army paid the bills. Thus the
Navy introduced a new factor in this agglomerate control. The
Army was interested mostly in obtaining the maximum troop
capacity commensurate with the necessary but minimum comfort


  p. 1673 (#601)                      #

1925)
1673
.
The Bridge Across the Atlantic
for the troops. The Navy became interested more particularly in
safety for the ships and for the troops in case of torpedoing.
In spite of the thoroughness of the German wreckers, the daring
adoption of the electric welding introduced by Captain Jessop,
U. S. Navy, reduced a two years' task to one of five months.
Admiral Gleaves early realized that his responsibility was to
get these necessary ships ready in a minimum of time. Tri-party
control was slow and not business like. The knot was cut, there-
fore, and the Navy took the step to control completely the progress
of work in placing all eighteen vessels in regular commission, as
men-of-war. The Shipping Board crew and army guard marched
ashore and the naval captain became supreme and his word law.
For months during the fitting-out process the ships were un-
inhabitable. Meanwhile, crews were collected for each. The
personnel boarded in the neighborhood of the shipyards, none too
pleasant an environment for the type of recruit that had rushed
to enlist, impressed with the idea that the Navy would be the
first to do battle with the enemy on the seas. Fortunately, the
season of the year was favorable and the morale of the crews
was not seriously impaired by the many discomforts, borne by all
with great good humor.
The officers and enlisted men forming the crews of these vessels,
by their loyalty and skill, in a great measure forced the hand of
the contractors to make haste the work of conversion in performing
themselves services outside of their regular duties where dockyard
help was incompetent or impossible to obtain, due to shortage of
men of skill and experience.
Admiral Gleaves on board his flagship in the North River
held weekly conferences with his captains. Upon the admiral's
shoulders rested a heavy burden, the task of almost, if not quite,
creating something from nothing. He bore it with great fortitude
and dignity. On one side he was importuned by the anxious
Army with the insistent question: "When will you have these
big ex-German ships ready for us to send troops?” This question
the admiral as frequently put to the eighteen captains who came
to the conference. Most of them shook their heads. They could
not see daylight ahead. The uncertain factor was the engine re-
pairs. Would electric welding make the broken castings as good
and as sound as before the Germans had broken them asunder?


  p. 1674 (#602)                      #

1674
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
That was a question no one could answer until the thing was ac-
complished and the engines tried out.
Meanwhile, there were many material things to occupy the
admiral and his staff. Among the most important were: the
feeding arrangement, including storerooms, cold storage, galleys,
(kitchens); sanitary arrangements—water closets, lavatories, and
berthing arrangement. Besides, the safety of the personnel had
to be carefully studied and means provided to insure each man a
fighting chance to get on deck from his bunk before the ship sank
if torpedoed. Then there were the questions of life preservers,
life rafts and boats, and the question of keeping all lights required
at night on the inside of the ship from showing outside. Further-
more, the naval transport service was a new experience for both
the Army and the Navy—one they must understand in order that
there would be no friction when the Army marched on board.
Admiral Gleaves worked up in his conferences standard methods
and then appointed a committee of his captains to draw up ad-
ministrative regulations for the new naval transport force. This
little pamphlet was printed and served as a guide in representing
the best epitomized thoughts of all upon the many new and per-
plexing questions. It underwent only minor changes subsequently.
Admiral Gleaves, his work outgrowing the small space provided
on board his flagship, moved first to a specially constructed build-
ing on the dock at Ninety-sixth Street, North River. The ground
was loaned for ninety-nine years by the city of New York at the
instance of the indefatigable R. A. C. Smith, Esq., former dock
commissioner. The Navy Department allowed the Admiral
$60,000 for the construction. Later, it became necessary to es-
tablish offices on shore and for this purpose the Steneck Building,
at Hoboken, was selected. Here he was in closer touch with the
army embarkation authorities at the Hoboken piers and his own
ships which loaded troops and cargo at that locality literally under
the windows of his offices. On the roof a signal station was es-
tablished which commanded a view of North River and the upper
bay.
There were some heart-breaking delays and breakdowns, even
after the ex-German vessels were finished, but, as a whole, the
work was done well if not cheaply, and lasted out.


  p. 1675 (#603)                      #

1925)
1675
The Bridge Across the Atlantic
While the ex-German ships were being fitted out, submarine
sinkings were mounting high and German propaganda in this
country was working at fever heat and haste to break down the
nation's morale in order that our troops might not be rushed to
save the Allies.
Much of this propaganda stuck. The transport personnel knew
they had been selected as martyrs. They might run the gauntlet
once, twice, or even three trips, but sooner or later they were sure
that there would be a day of reckoning, for it was inconceivable
to them that the German High Command would not eventually
concentrate every available submarine on the American troop con-
voys in order to cut off a vast reservoir of fighting men from the
battlefields of Europe. All hoped that if their ship was to be
torpedoed it would take place on the way back, empty of troops.
At the conferences as the weeks went by, the admiral became
more insistent that each captain give a date for the loading of
troops and cargo. It was hourly becoming more important to
know something definite, for the Army's plans for concentration
of troops at the ports of embarkation naturally depended upon the
Navy's readiness to sail the troopships.
During this interval, the army transports, mostly chartered and
manned with their original merchant crews, were sailing as fast
as they could be turned around. These ships had been placed
under Admiral Gleaves, and several naval officers, including a naval
captain or commander, had been assigned to each. These naval
officers had the responsibility for the safety of the ships when they
left port and until arrival in France, but were not actually in com-
mand of the ships. This arrangement was quite unsatisfactory
and Admiral Gleaves was straining every effort regularly to com-
mission with a naval complement every ship engaged in carrying
troops. The first sailing of an ex-German troopship was in the
latter part of September, 1917, but the great bulk of them were not
ready until after the first week in October. One convoy sailed from
New York about October 14, taking the Rainbow (Forty-second)
Division. It included the three big liners President Grant, Presi-
dent Lincoln, and the Covington. The latter two were sunk on
returning from their fifth trip, without troops. The other vessels
were the Tenadores, Passadores, Mallory, and DeKalb, with the
Seattle and two destroyers escorting.


  p. 1676 (#604)                      #

1676
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
TABLE I
Speed
American Name Knots
Est.
Troop
Cap.
Gross
Tonnage
German Name
Port
Fitted
Out
17
I
do
do
do
do
Vaterland........... Leviathan........
Amerika............ America.........
George Washington. ... George Washington.
President Lincoln..... President Lincoln*.
President Grani....... President Grant...
Kaiser Wilhelm II.... 4gamemnon......
Kronprinzessin Cecile Mount Vernon. ...
Cincinnati.......... Covington*
Rhein............... Susquehanna...
Neckar.
Antigone. .....
Grosser Kurfurst..... 1eolus........
Hamburg. .......... Powhatan....
Prinzess Irene........ Pocahontas.....
Frederich der Grosse...] Puron........
Koenig Wilhelm II.... Madawaska...
Barbarossa .......... Mercury.......
Kronprinz Wilhelm .. Von Steuben...
Prinz Eitel Friederich JDe Kalb.
10,000
5,000
5,000
5,000
5,000
4,500
4,500
4,000
3,000
3,000
3,000
3,000
2,800
2,800
2,500
2,500
2,000
1,000
54, 282 New York
22,622
25, 570
18,072
18,072
19,360
19,503
Boston
17,500 do
10,058 Norfolk
9,835 do
13, 102 New York
10,532
10,893
10,771 do
9,410
10,983
Phila.
8,797 do
Go
do
do
14,908
* Sunk by submarine.
Total Tonnage. ............304,270
Total Troops.............. 68,600
Tons per trooper. .....
The experiences with the Leviathan as a transport deserve
mention. In the first place, she was the biggest ship (54,000 tons
displacement) and attracted the most attention from both the Navy
and War Departments, and special efforts were made to get her
ready for sea. The repairs and conversion to a troopship were
completed in record time and she sailed on December 15, 1917,
for Liverpool, carrying 7,250 troops. On this trip, much to the
chagrin of both army and navy authorities, she remained at Liver-
pool fifty days. The reason for this delay was that the Leviathan
could dock and undock at Liverpool only on full-moon tides,
which, of course, was most unsatisfactory, and it therefore was
seen to be necessary to send her to Brest to disembark. Admiral


  p. 1677 (#605)                      #

1925]
1677
The Bridge Across the Atlantic
Gleaves insisted upon this change despite powerful protests from
all sides. In fact, her great size making it difficult to find a suita-
ble harbor for debarking troops, actually caused an effort to be
made to convert her into a hospital ship. Imagine the great loss
entailed if this suggestion had been accepted by Admiral Gleaves
and the Department! Her troop capacity was increased fifty per
cent after the first trip and in all she carried to Europe nearly one
tenth of all the troops transported across the Atlantic.
On one occasion, while returning from Europe, it was estimated
by the ship that fourteen days for overhaul and repair would be
necessary—yet in five days after her arrival at the Hoboken piers
she sailed on her return trip, repairs completed, carrying more than
10,000 troops of all arms. This was accomplished because of the
fact of an efficient and capable repair force available to the
admiral, who had unlimited authority in making repairs to his
ships at the port of New York. Every other consideration was
subordinated to the one of prompt turn-arounds. During these
five days in port the rain fell continuously and the Italian contract
laborers refused to coal the Leviathan in the rain. This in no way
disturbed Admiral Gleaves for he had the power to circumvent this
annoyance. On his own initiative the admiral commandeered the
entire coaling plant of this contractor, substituted sailors from
three armored cruisers that happened to be in port, and finished
the coaling of the Leviathan within schedule.
The embarking of the troops at Hoboken was a very drab
business. The ships were ready but neither the material nor the
personnel had been given a trial in feeding and housing such an
enormous number of men. In fact, in all of the ships many dock-
yard workmen were on board until the last gangway was put
ashore. The commissary department, led by the most experienced
naval paymasters, but padded out with many raw recruits, could
only imagine how it was to be done. The troops embarked in
silence, sad-eyed, heartsick, and in that state of nervous tension
described by some blunt writers as a polite term for fear. Fear,
not for a known danger, but for an unknown danger, on an ele-
ment, the sea, with which few of them were familiar. In fact,
many were to catch sight of the ocean for the first time. German
propaganda had insinuated the subconscious belief, not at all borne
out by conscious reasoning, that the ocean was as thickly strewn


  p. 1678 (#606)                      #

1678
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
with submarines and mines as Fifth Avenue with automobiles, or
Broadway with chorus girls. One could hear the troops talking
in low tones at night, fearing to raise their voices above a whisper
-actually men walked on tip-toes so that the submarines would
not hear.
The convoy sailed at night. No white lights of any kind were
lighted except in the engine and fire rooms, and below decks
where it was sure lights could not be seen from outside. In
other localities where it was necessary for some illumination, in
order to regulate troop traffic, pale blue lights were used which
gave a gruesome and none too cheerful aspect to the moist and
hot berthing spaces below decks, crowded to the ceiling with men.
The ships were untried. The personnel were in great part com-
posed of men who knew but little of life at sea. Even the old
timers were unfamiliar with the present conditions made neces-
sary by war. It was imperative immediately upon leaving port to
form the convoy. Big ships maneuvered at close distance to each
other and at almost full speed. The captains and the principal
officers were familiar with cruising in formation, but many of the
watch officers engaged in this difficult maneuver for the first time.
Captains remained on or near the navigating bridge at all times.
The safety of their ships lay heavy on their minds.
Once on the ocean and in the broad white light of day much
of the unreasoned fears passed. It was a long way to longitude
20 W, where the submarines began their piratical work and the
convoy would require eight days at least to arrive within the
danger zone.
There were many things to be done. The organization so care-
fully worked over by the executive officers for taking care of the
troops had to be frequently tested, amended, and again tried until
everything was as good as could be made. One important change
was made in the abandon ship method. An attempt had been made
in the organization to assign specified men to definitely located
rafts or boats. This was all thrown out and the troops under
their officers were formed instead on the upper open decks in
groups of seventy-five or one hundred and merely told when the
order to abandon ship was given to use the nearest jacob ladders
and life lines plentifully provided and just "step into the water,"
where life rafts would be plentifully provided. The temperature


  p. 1679 (#607)                      #

1925]
1679
The Bridge Across the Atlantic
of the water at that time was about 45° Fahrenheit; however, later,
off the coast of France, it was only about 50°.
The navy crews were made as large as berthing facilities allowed,
but there was so much work to be done that many additional
details were given to the Army; guards at boat drills, magazine
guards, and so forth. Of course, all troop spaces were policed and
guarded by the Army.
The commanding officer of troops on one of the big transports
was a brigadier general, commanding an artillery brigade. His one
idea seemed to be to help the Navy in their new work. He ap-
preciated the shortage of skilled men and said to the commanding
officer, “Captain, in our outfit, we have every known trade; we've
even got sailors if you need them.” That ship used soldiers freely
and the contact of Army and Navy working together made a last-
ing impression on both. The Army learned the Navy's job and
when they got to France they all said in appreciation: “Buddie,
I enjoyed the trip—I'd sure like to be going back with you to
God's Country, but I ain't going back till all these here submarines
have been tamed.”
The convoy sailed in line-abreast formation and, at night, with
no lights showing. When the moon was obscured the next ship
abreast could be seen as a deeper shadow in the gloom unless by
chance she edged in too close and then to the captain and officer of
the deck she loomed like a mountain too near for comfort. On the
other hand, if the end ships were kept too wide they were liable
to lose touch entirely during darkness and at daylight be miles
ahead or miles astern of the formation. In the beginning careful
routing of convoys was difficult, especially as the ocean was fairly
full of neutral shipping. Often a tramp steamer would find itself
heading through a convoy at night. Its actions would at once
reflect the coolness of the man on the tramp's bridge. It might be
expected to charge down one way, then change its mind and come
charging back another way. It went without saying that troop-
ships took no chances; they discounted brains on the bridge of the
tramp and gave him a wide berth. Then there was the danger of
running pell-mell into a big merchant convoy on a converging
course, especially nearing the coast of France. Then quick action
by the convoy commander of the fast troopships was required to
avoid a mishap.


  p. 1680 (#608)                      #

1680
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
When our destroyer building plan began to produce, these
vessels were despatched one or two at a time with the convoy.
They did not carry sufficient oil in their tanks to permit them to
steam at the convoy's speed of about fourteen knots all the way
across the ocean, so they were oiled in mid-ocean before entering
the danger zone. This was accomplished at first by stationing a
fuel ship at a selected point and trusting that the enemy sub-
marines would not discover the rendezvous. There was also the
fear that the weather might be too rough when the convoy arrived
to carry out refueling. However, luck, the sixth sense of all
Americans, stood by the Navy, and no mishaps on that score were
encountered. Later, after oil burning troopships existed in con-
voys, the destroyers were refueled from these ships most expedi-
tiously and with little loss of time.
Every man of the artillery brigade carried by the President
Lincoln will doubtlessly not soon forget, even after his hazardous
service at the front in France, the two hours that vessel was
stopped in the war zone, east of longitude 20°, to repair a disabled
air pump. The troops were all at their abandon ship stations with
life preservers adjusted. The gun crews were alert, and all look-
outs on their toes to discover a periscope. The rest of the convoy
swept on and quickly disappeared beyond the horizon. A lone
destroyer remained, circling about the huge vessel at high speed.
The two hours seemed an eternity to those in authority. Possibly
there was not a submarine within a hundred miles, yet one might
have been near enough to make an attack and, if so, 6,000-odd
men would have been set adrift five hundred miles from land,
mostly on life rafts to which they could only cling, and with the
water temperature 50°. There were six destroyers altogether
guarding the convoy. If all six performed rescue work they could
not accommodate with standing room all of the shipwrecked men
on this one big ship, and to perform this act of mercy, they must
desert the remainder of the convoy they were guarding and seek
port at full speed.
Just before this convoy arrived at St. Nazaire, the entrance to
the River Loire was mined by an enemy submarine, so the convoy
was conducted by a circuitous route, through tortuous channels and
between menacing rocks to a point inside of the mined area.


  p. 1681 (#609)                      #

1925]
1681
The Bridge Across the Atlantic
The little French pilot boarded the ship and received a cordial
welcome from the happy troops. The atmosphere of constraint
suddenly disappeared as the big convoy entered the sheltered
waters of Quiberon Bay and they were anxious to let off steam
that had been bottled up for two weeks. The regimental bands
played with a renewed vigor. Everybody was happy. The sub-
marines had been fooled.
At the entrance to the river a thick blanket of fog was en-
countered. To the westward was the open sea and only a short
distance away the mine field. The pilot said, shrugging expressive
shoulders, “I cannot see the buoy, therefore we must stop and
anchor.” Six loaded transports awaited the finding of that buoy.
Meanwhile, worse luck, the guarding destroyers considering their
duty completed had all turned northward and had disappeared in
the fog. They had other convoys to protect.
It is not a pleasant feeling to poke the big blunt bow of a
20,000-ton liner into a fog to find a tiny buoy surrounded on all
sides by treacherous rocks, shoals, and enemy mines, and amidst
the strongest known currents; but, on the other hand, there was the
necessity to anchor in that dangerous locality six ships carrying
20,000 men. One submarine might, by some evil streak of devil's
luck, sink all of them and on the threshhold of France.
"There's the buoy!” Everyone seemed to understand the im-
portance of keeping that buoy in sight. Night was fast falling but
once within the headlands of the river, the fog melted. Up the
river the convoy steamed and the biggest turned in toward the
locks in order to enter at the top of the tide. "How long are you?”
asked the pilot of the captain of the biggest ship, while that ship
was entering the lock. When told, the pilot looked serious for a
few minutes, apparently calculating. “It's all right,” he finally
announced; "there's ten feet to spare.” It was the largest ship
that had ever entered that locked harbor. The captain was confi-
dent all the time that the all-knowing ones at home had made sure
of the fit-yet it was none too much to spare.
Sunny France was in tears on the arrival of the convoy but the
populace were out in full force to welcome the troops. There
was no more soul-stirring sight than those six huge ships loaded
down with khaki-clad men, their white faces gleaming in the flood
of great cargo and illuminating lights on the docks, passing each


  p. 1682 (#610)                      #

1682
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
other close aboard as one after another was locked into the small
harbor and berthed alongside the piers. Bands were playing
“Over There," "It's a Long Long Trail," "Keep the Home Fires
Burning,” and so forth. Each ship, as it entered the harbor,
cheered those it passed, until there was a continuous roar of young
American voices mingled with stirring music and song. The rain,
an insidious French drizzle, could not dampen the soldiers' spirits.
They were "over there."
Later, when the nation got into its stride, the port of New York
was found too small as an embarkation center and a secondary
port, that of Newport News, Virginia, was used. Troopships
sailed simultaneously from the ports of New York and Newport
News, meeting at sea, and forming the convoy. The largest
convoy of American troopships sailed June 30, 1918; it con-
tained fifteen troopships and carried about 45,000 troops. This
convoy made good our President's promise to send by July 1,
1918, 1,000,000 men to join the Allies in their war for democracy.
The casualties and accidents during the carrying over of troops
were nearly negligible. There occurred, in addition to the sinking
of the navy transports President Lincoln and Covington and the
torpedoing of the Mount Vernon, which successfully reached port,
two collisions between troopships. In neither case were the ships
badly damaged, nor were there any casualties to personnel. In one
case the troopships having a collision continued to France with
only repairs effected by the ship’s mechanics. In the other case,
the damaged ships returned to the United States.
In the June 30, 1918, convoy, one ship caught fire. Her 1,600
troops were transferred at sea to another ship of the convoy, and
the burning vessel returned in safety to the United States. At
least two transports were attacked by submarines, one by gun fire
and one by torpedo. The one attacked by gun fire speeded up and
escaped. The one attacked with torpedo discovered the approach-
ing torpedo in time to maneuver, and avoided it by a very small
margin. A troopship was considered by standing orders issued by
the commander-in-chief of our fleet, in a class of vessels that
must not risk itself in an attack upon a submarine. The principle
underlying this order was that a submarine brought astern was a
submarine defeated, for as a rule all of the transports were faster
than the submarines, and to escape was a victory in such a one-


  p. 1683 (#611)                      #

1925]
1683
The Bridge Across the Atlantic
sided action. A transport could not stop in mid-ocean to rescue
survivors of torpedoed ships set adrift in boats and rafts until it
could be assured that a submarine was not submerged in the
vicinity, possibly using the wrecked ship's boats as a decoy.
The policy for troopships to avoid submarines was a most logical
one. The troopship was at a distinct handicap for it could not
locate the enemy, while the enemy with its periscope, an invisible
eye above the water, too small to detect, could always keep the
troopship in sight, and the transport, due to its great length, seven
hundred feet and upwards, and draft, could not hope to avoid a
torpedo fired suddenly from an unknown direction at a distance so
close that the sighting of the torpedo in the water preceded by only
a matter of fifty-odd seconds its explosion against the ship's iron
side.
The British Admiralty, followed tardily by our own Navy De-
partment, issued special rules in regard to the rescue of ship-
wrecked seamen. Only anti-submarine vessels of small tonnage,
light draft, and high speed were to undertake rescue work.
The shrinkage of ocean tonnage became so critical that means of
preserving ships were imperative, even though temporarily the
"traditions of the sea" were held in abeyance.
The personnel of the United States Navy was disappointed that
there was but little fighting on the sea but it can always point to the
accomplishment of its transport work with satisfaction. It was
a task well performed and to its unqualified success the nation owes
the fact of its large hard-hitting Army in France.


  p. 1684 (#612)                      #

THE NATION IN ARMS AND NATIONAL
DOCTRINE
BY MAJOR J. M. SCAMMELL, INF. 0. R. C.
F LATE there has been a great deal of attention directed in
the military and naval services toward publicity. The press
bureaus in the Navy Department and War Department
have been active, military and naval officers have written articles
for the press and addressed clubs and societies. These efforts are
commendable and necessary; they have produced favorable, but
not altogether satisfactory, results, as is indicated by the articles
on the need and methods of publicity which have recently appeared
in the military and naval magazines. To be sure, allowances must
be made for the fact that these are but beginnings; and they are,
moreover, beginnings by a class which is not especially trained
along these lines. Anatole France declares that the reason why
the military generally find difficulties in ex position lies in the
nature of their profession: they are not accustomed in their daily
life to use the arts of persuasion as the lawyers are, but instead,
like the centurion in the Bible, are men in authority having men
under them, and they say to this man, “Go," and he goeth; and to
that man, “Come," and he cometh; and to the other, "Do this,"
and he doeth it. It may be that there is much truth in this
criticism.
There is, perhaps, another reason. For a long time the military
have been a class separated from the bosom of the family politic.
Alfred de Vigny has sympathetically and beautifully compared
the military life of his time to that of a monastic order. It was,
probably, because of this almost complete divorce from the life
of the day that there arose the legend of the stupidity of the
military so charmingly described by Anatole France in Les
Opinions de M. Jerôme Coignard. In that delightful book the
Abbé Coignard tells the following anecdote of military life in the
late Seventeenth Century: The abbé one night accompanied a
bluff old captain who was taking his company out to instruct it
in how to find its way at night by the stars. In a belligerent tone


  p. 1685 (#613)                      #

1925)
1685
The Nation in Arms
he read the regulations of M. Louvois, the Minister of War, on
the subject. He then turned to his friend and in a hoarse whisper
demanded, "M. l'Abbé, where in hell is that damned Polar Star?"
The abbé obligingly pointed it out. "O-ho!" said the blunt old
soldier, “that bird roosts high. You can't see it without getting
a crick in your neck.” So in a loud and authoritative voice he
ordered the company to move back fifty paces in order the more
comfortably to see the North Star.
Now this old tradition of the stupidity of the military and its
twin, the excessive conservatism of that profession, while they
have less to feed on to-day, still thrive, as may be seen in the type
of critical war book which appeared in every country after the
Armistice, and of which the cleverest by far were those of Jean
de Pierrefeu. The success of these books may be said to be about
equally due to the degree to which the military have been out of
touch with civil life and the degree to which the civilians are
ignorant of military technique—to say nothing of the fact that
conservatism is less a vice in the military profession than a strict
necessity in view of the unalterable character of raw human nature
with which it deals, and the awful stakes with which it gambles.
That this is true we have the following evidence: that when
professional armies were at their height was a time when class
and professional distinctions of all kinds were excessive; and it
has been precisely at the time when civil scholarship has made the
most progress that the greatest military revolutions have taken
place. An illustration will show what is meant.
It is well known that from the time of Gustavus Adolphus and
Maurice of Nassau, who set the example, military art in Europe
was based upon the study of antiquity, but in Prussia both civil
and military scholarship were at a low ebb. There was in the early.
days of Frederick the Great a certain Colonel Guichard in the
service of the Dutch who wrote a learned work on the military
institutions of the Greeks. This book came to the notice of the
King of Prussia who summoned the colonel into his service and
gave him a regiment to command. The Prussian officers ridiculed
this “man of theory," and exalted the ideal of "the practical
soldier.” But, one day Colonel Guichard, being in command of a
large detachment, produced a brilliant and flexible maneuver the
like of which the King had never seen. The King was struck with


  p. 1686 (#614)                      #

1686
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
admiration and sent for the colonel. He questioned him at length
concerning the reasons for and the uses of that maneuver. Colonel
Guichard replied that he had adapted it from one used on a similar
occasion by a Roman general, Quintus Icilius. Frederick was de-
lighted, and as a mark of his satisfaction bestowed upon the colonel
the title of “Quintus Icilius" which he bore to the end of his days.
Now it was as a result of such studies that the Prussian Army
of Frederick became the model of all Europe, for the King of
Prussia developed a new system of tactics skilfully adapted from
those of the Greeks and Romans. Moreover, it is worthy of note
that immediately following the scientific discoveries of the
Eighteenth Century in France, the greatest military revolution took
place. The divisional system was developed in France and became
the basis of peace time army administration; a general staff and a
staff college were founded; the armament and tactics used through-
out the wars of the French Revolution and of Napoleon were
developed, and “The Nation in Arms" was proposed and actually
came into being during the French Revolution.
Because these facts are not widely known, and because it seems
worth while to demonstrate how close is the relationship between
the changes in society at large and the military profession, the
writer feels that it may be worth while to go into details. To
show how great was the growth of industry in France in the
Eighteenth Century, the following table is given:
Exports in millions of livres
1720
1735
1748
1755
1776 ...........
309
1778 ....... ..................... 354
This industrial development made possible the equipment and
maintenance of great masses of men in the field. Under Louis XV
6,000 leagues of roads were built. This enabled large armies to
move and be supplied in the field. The discoveries in physics and
mathematics led to studies in ballistics with the result that artillery-
men were able with reduced charges to gain in range and accuracy
of fire, which, in turn, led to the building of lighter and more
mobile guns able to maneuver with an army. The discoveries in
106
....


  p. 1687 (#615)                      #

1925)
1687
The Nation in Arms
geography led to better cartography and improved staff work.
Bourcet was the chief-of-staff to Marshal de Broglie, one of the
general officers who did the most to develop the divisional system.
Bourcet taught modern staff work to the officers who fought with
Washington in the American Revolution, and it was in the staff
college which he founded that Napoleon's chief-of-staff, Berthier,
was trained. These changes meant that the Nation in Arms, urged
years before by Marshal Saxe, was now a practical possibility; and
we find it strongly advocated by Guibert, who, later, during the era
of reform up to 1789, was secretary of the war council. In March
of that year he was succeeded by Mathieu Dumas, a trained staff
officer who had served in America, and like his predecessor, a deep
student of war.
In December, 1789, Dubois de Crancé, a scholar, a trained staff
officer and a legislator, read in the Assembly a minority report
directed against the anti-universal service report of M. de la Tour
du Pin, the minister of war. In his report de Crancé said, “I take
as an axiom that in France every citizen should be a soldier and
every a soldier a citizen.” A year later the reporter of the military
committee, M. Rabaut, said, “The French should . ... con-
sider themselves an army while they constitute a nation." But
it was not until the stirring events of 1793 made it a necessity that
the Nation in Arms actually came. Then Barrère made his famous
speech beginning, “The Republic is but one great besieged city;
France must be only one armed camp. Men of every age are
called by their native land to defend Liberty."
The Nation in Arms, therefore, was a compound of the industrial
revolution which provided the economic basis, the growth of
science which provided the economic tools, and the develop-
ment of democracy which provided the political and social back-
ground. It is to be noted that these influences were early reflected
in the military service, and that it was military scholarship which
first appreciated the significance of the new trend. In this instance
the conservatism was more on the civil than on the military side,
as it was in the United States from 1914 to 1917; and it was
political reaction, in the Congress of Vienna, that put back the
hands of the clock, diverted and distorted the normal growth of
the Nation in Arms and gave all of its greatest benefits, not to


  p. 1688 (#616)                      #

1688
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
democracy with which the system is and ought to be identified, but
to autocracy.
So much attention has been given here to the development of
the Nation in Arms for the reason that in a modified form it is
the system now adopted in the United States, where the necessary
consequences of such a system are not clearly understood. It is
known among the military, but less widely among the general
public, that the object of war is determined by policy; that policy,
in turn, is determined by statesmen, and that these statesmen are
strongly influenced by public opinion. But it has not been gener-
ally appreciated that for this reason public opinion may give to
strategy its initial direction and may color and even decisively
influence the outcome of a war. Above all, it is not sufficiently
taken into consideration to how considerable a degree this may
be true when we have to deal with half-trained militias and with
regular organizations expanded to a war footing by the addition
of untrained civilians.
Let us take up each aspect in turn. The extent to which public
opinion may influence the conduct of a war by determining the
conditions under which it may be fought is well illustrated by our
peace strategy in the Pacific. It was public opinion as influenced
by Admiral Mahan that was responsible for the building of the
Panama Canal and for the annexation of the Hawaiian Islands.
It was the absence of an enlightened public opinion that led us
first to neglect to create naval bases in the Philippines and at Guam,
and later to agree not to establish them there. To how great an
extent the former gave us a strategic advantage in the Pacific, and
to how great a degree the latter has handicapped us, it is hardly
worth while to emphasize. Mahan has well stated the relation of
peace strategy to that of war when he said that it bears to the
latter the same relation that strategy bears to tactics. Strategy
may influence decisively the conditions under which a battle may
be fought; for what else is strategy than an intelligent effort to
bring about conditions favorable to a successful battle? And what
else is peace strategy than a prudent endeavor to bring about con-
ditions favorable to the successful waging of a war.
The second point that we must consider in discussing the in-
fuence of the Nation in Arms system upon the conduct of a war
is the character of the armed forces, imperfectly trained or not


  p. 1689 (#617)                      #

1925]
1689
The Nation in Arms
at all. Modern conditions require that the nation furnish not only
the material supplies for a war, but also the personnel, including
to a very great extent the leaders. The expansion of the Army
through the National Guard and Organized Reserves will leave
only a thin veneer of trained soldiers. The Navy, to a lesser
degree, will find its trained personnel diluted, but still to a notable
and perhaps a decisive degree, especially when we consider the
rôle which aircraft plays and the extent to which it will probably
be expanded. The Navy may find an arm, upon which it relies for
its information and accurate long range gunnery, swamped with
new and untrained pilots. We do what little we can to train our
reserves; but in view of the reliance which we are forced to place
upon them, that training is neither sufficient nor intelligent, as I
hope to prove. Even the continuous period of from one to three
years of training given under the European system to conscripts
is not sufficient, as the testimony of von Moltke indicates where
he says:
Order, dexterity, even a certain amount of pride, are the characteristic
marks of armed forces forged in time of peace, but they have no consistency.
.... Let only one small crack appear and all falls into disorder,
just as a glass too suddenly cooled is broken. . ...
Of itself such an army is incapable of doing anything: it may accomplish
results only by reason of the initial direction which it receives. It should
be led with extreme prudence until, trained by its efforts and given confidence
hy its victories, its morale is at last made equal to the severe requirements
and the heavy task which it must accomplish.
Von Moltke sought a solution of the problem of insufficiently
trained troops in prudent leadership; General Bonnal sought it in
the strategic advance guard; the real solution appears to lie in a
more intelligent method of training. Fortunately, this may be
happily combined with a system which ought to give us at the
same time the advantages of a sounder initial direction. In a
word, what we need today is not so much a mere program of
publicity as a definite, thorough, and systematic effort to create
a sound national doctrine of war. That is to say, if we had a
national doctrine based upon the principles of war, not only could
we count upon a greater measure of popular support for our peace
strategy and our initial war strategy, which would confer upon our
half trained forces many of the advantages which they will require,


  p. 1690 (#618)                      #

1690
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
but our recruits would come to the services with a foundation
upon which a more thorough and rapid training could be based.
Upon what is von Moltke's criticism of short term service armies
based? Upon the lack of cohesion, which is to say discipline.
Therefore, the supreme end of peace-time training of militia and
reserves ought to be, not to instruct, but to create disciplinary
habits. “Discipline," says Ardant du Picq, “is a social institution
which ought to be based upon the dominant qualities and defects
of the nation.” “Esprit de corps,” he says, “is formed in war;
wars are becoming shorter and shorter ; esprit de corps must be
formed in advance." "It is always necessary to reform instruction,
to reduce it to the fundamental necessities and to rid it of the
useless frills which the peace-time soldiers add to it every year."
This is true. Let me show you what our soldiers are doing
today. Visit a unit of the R.O.T.C. at one university and you
will behold a unit whose mission is to train leaders for war giving
all the practice in leadership to the Regular Army instructors
and none at all to the cadet officers. The future leaders in war
are being trained not to lead, but to be led; not to accept responsi-
bility, but to shed it; not to win victories, but to lose them. Let
us visit another. Here we find cadets being solemnly taught to
roll packs and to pitch shelter tents. With only a few precious
hours in which to train officers to lead men in battle, supposedly
intelligent beings are wasting it instructing the candidates in how
to do things that in time of war can be taught sufficiently well for
all practical purposes in five minutes; teaching them things that
they must inevitably forget within a year at the most and which,
in all human probability, will be changed long before a war comes.
The General Staff soberly puts out a list of principles of war
which, presumably, are supposed to lead to success in battle; but
it trains its men according to other principles. In training it does
not select an intelligent objective, and uses the vicious “cordon
system" instead of concentration at the decisive point. The
Nation in Arms has come upon us and, instead of adapting our
training to its needs, we continue to use the tactical forms of
Frederick the Great and to train our militia and reserves for
certain disaster.
Unfortunately, this is not due to excessive conservatism, as may
appear, but rather to a too servile copying of the latest fads in civil


  p. 1691 (#619)                      #

1925]
1691
The Nation in Arms
education. But, military education is not the same as civil: it has
other purposes and should employ other means. Education is
composed of two distinct elements : instruction and training. Of
the two, training is by far the more important, and in a military
organization, supremely so. No amount of instruction will make
a soldier or a sailor any more than reading books on the subject
can make a football player. One may lecture until Doom's Day
and demonstrate throughout eternity and, unless he himself
practice and form correct habits, a student will never learn to play
a musical instrument. The only way to get the best results from
our present system is to inquire what are the essential habits of
thought and action that are required to make a man useful in
battle, and to concentrate upon these. The rest, if his habits are
formed and his mind trained, the recruit can pick up unconsciously
in a very short time.
And if this be true of the enlisted men it is supremely true of
the officer. A reserve officer ought not to be required to know the
technical details, but the principles so that he may be able rapidly
to master the details. An officer who knows his Ardant du Picq
and his Xenophon is more useful in war than one who knows his
Army or Navy Regulations. An officer must understand the
tools with which he works, and, “Man is the first instrument of
battle.” If recruits and reserve officers come to the service in
war indoctrinated in the point of view of that service, the basis of
solidarity, of discipline is already laid.
This could be done if we had a national doctrine of war based
upon our understanding of the principles of war. Then the same
principles that would guide the public in supporting the war would
also guide the soldiers throughout their training and guide their
leaders in action. The nation would make war as a unit. The
recruits would have an intellectual background which would enable
them to cooperate intelligently with their officers in their training,
and the basis for that mutual understanding and confidence which
is the supreme cementing force in a military organization. In
brief, there would be cohesion; there would be discipline.
An understanding of the same principles ought to permeate the
public. Such an understanding could, in part, be brought about
through the reserve and militia which are in continual contact with
the public and whose organizations form everywhere points suit-


  p. 1692 (#620)                      #

1692
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
able for the diffusion of these ideas. It ought to be brought about
by every means at our disposal, although it would be a wise thing
to study all possible means and to concentrate our efforts upon
those that promised the most substantial results. But, whatever
means are used, the important thing is that all should preach the
same gospel. At present many agencies are at work doing “pub-
licity” work on behalf of the national defense. There is no
desire to disparage the value of this work, but admittedly the
results are not satisfactory; and there is a growing opinion that
it ought to be coordinated. So far, so good. The best means of
coordinating effort lies in the use of a common doctrine. If the
principles of war were used as a basis there would be no necessity
for the already over-burdened officer to learn and practice some
new thing; but, on the contrary, he would gain a fresh understand-
ing of his profession by explaining its basic principles to the public,
and a bit of valuable practice in adapting those principles to new
situations. It would therefore become a part of his own training
for war as well as a part of the national preparation for war.
Just as an illustration, let us examine a couple of principles and
see how they could be adapted to national indoctrination. The
public certainly ought to understand its own responsibilities and
know enough about the principle of the objective not to demand
one that is improper. It ought to know, in a general way, what
are the legitimate objectives for land, sea, and air forces. Had
it any adequate conception of these things the country recently
might have been spared a situation which has done much to under-
mine the public confidence in its military servants. Again, the
principle of the offensive ought to be understood, at least to the
extent of knowing the vital distinction between an act of political
aggression and the strategical offensive. It would seem very
necessary that the public understand that the only possible perma-
nent results to be expected of a passive defense is an unnecessary
and costly prolonging of the war. “Security,” “Maneuver,"
“Economy of Force," and so forth, could be simply explained and
illustrated, as, for example, by their bearing upon current prob-
lems of policy such as a proposal to establish a base. If the
public is not correctly taught, it will be incorrectly taught.
Who can dispute the value of having a citizenry indoctrinated
in these principles? Who can doubt the utility of having every


  p. 1693 (#621)                      #

1925)
1693
The Nation in Arms
recruit who comes into the service already provided with a skeleton
idea system of military principles upon which his training may be
built? It would not be essential that these ideas be either profound
or clear at first; he knows but the words of the language through
which the ideas are to come and he has an intangible something
that we can best express, perhaps, as a receptive frame of mind
that will prevent many a misunderstanding and save many a lost
hour. He is not at first lost and bewildered by the strangeness and
the mystery of the new profession: he merely has graduated from
the high school to the university and takes up his studies where
he left off. If a personal reference may be allowed, the writer
has had the experience with recruits whom he found to be perfectly
intelligent men utterly bewildered when asked simple questions in
the orthodox military terms. They tried to remember what was
in the manual instead of using common sense. Their judgment
was paralyzed by military hocus pocus. Even the simplest prob-
lem of guard duty was a deep mystery until translated into terms
of night-watchmen and police; whereupon they returned most
sensible answers. Men training to go to the front after a year in
the Army were simply at a loss to answer the very simplest
question regarding advance-guard work. They seemed to think
that when they encountered a military problem the proper thing
was to park their brains and go into a trance hoping to receive
some sort of celestial inspiration. The writer would approach the
"point" and ask, “You are fired on from the woods over there;
what do you do?” He would then listen impatiently to incredible
imbecilities uttered in halting, groping words. There was only
one way to get an intelligent answer; the magic formula was,
“There is no Holy Mystery about military problems; they are
only questions of common sense. You are with a sheriff's posse;
now what do you do?” The correct answer came at once. This
experience led the writer to ask himself, “Do we not underestimate
the enlisted man's intelligence because we talk different lan-
guages?” As an experiment, on a divisional maneuver, the writer
then spread the map on the ground and asked the enlisted men to
solve the tactical problem of the divisional commander; and the
majority gave perfectly sound solutions. These are the ex-
periences which lead the writer to believe that it is not a difficult
thing to create a national doctrine of war based upon a few


  p. 1694 (#622)                      #

1694
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
elementary principles simply illustrated, and that such a step would
greatly simplify our problem of training citizens for emergency
military service.
Who shall create the doctrine, and how shall it be spread? It
need scarcely be said that the creation of a national doctrine, to
be sound from a military point of view, must be the creation largely
of the military; but civilian aid and advice ought not to be despised.
To be truly national, the civil point of view as well as that of the
Army and Navy ought to be represented. To be effectively
spread, the hearty cooperation of civilians will be required.
In propagating the doctrine every useful means ought to be
used. To determine which means are the most useful, the limita-
tions as well as the advantages of each should be weighed. For
example, the method of addressing clubs and societies is valuable
for immediate results, but only among certain classes. The press
offers a great field for wide distribution of ideas, but the results
are not permanent. Our war experience shows what results can
be quickly accomplished with the hearty cooperation of the press
and a definite program; but our experience since the war shows
clearly how ephemeral were the results. However, with a simple,
clear-cut program, a definite and permanent policy, this defect can,
in part, be remedied. For example, a consistent effort along the
following lines might accomplish much:
1) Appeal to the imagination, to get attention;
2) appeal to the sympathies, to maintain it;
3) appeal to the intelligence, to impress facts;
4) reiterate, reiterate, reiterate, to form habits of thought, to
get ideas into the very sub-conscious mind.
Then there are the schools, the very best means for getting
substantial and permanent results. Here fundamental principles
could be made a very part of the students' fund of ideas; here will
be reached the future makers of public opinion and the future
leaders in peace and in war. The students would then read their
history in the light of the principles which would be a part of their
mental equipment, and be prepared to study military and naval
history so as to get the meat out of it.
But, however we go about publicity, all ought to say the same
thing, whether army officers, navy officers or officers of the air


  p. 1695 (#623)                      #

1925]
1695
The Nation in Arms
service. Here, indeed, there is room for a national doctrine. Had
we had one we might have been spared the disgraceful and dis-
astrous spectacle of an army officer undermining the public con-
fidence in the leaders of a sister service and even of his own; and
the two services unable to present a united front with a common
and a coherent defense; and, we might add, of a public bewildered
and confused, where the understanding of a few elementary
principles would have spared that officer from feeling any neces-
sity for getting into a false position, spared the services embarrass-
ment, and spared the public from the temptation to suspect their
military leaders of incompetence.
To found a national doctrine and to supervise its diffusion a
permanent committee appears to be a necessity; and such a com-
mittee, of course, would have to be composed of army and navy
representatives and civilians. That, from time to time, or in an
auxiliary position, the personnel should include reserve officers and
officers of the militias, would seem to be desirable. That edu-
cators, representatives of the press and of the Congress should be
similarly appointed would seem to be even more desirable.
The first step of such a committee would be to consult the War
Department and the Navy Department and to draw up a tentative
doctrine representing their views or a compromise between them.
The next step would necessarily be to review the different means
available for its propagation—a sort of estimate of the situation-
and to draw up a definite and economical program. Thereafter
its duties would consist in supervising and coordinating the work
and in modifying the doctrine or the methods as experience may
require; and to do this effectively, to maintain a consistent and
permanent policy, the wise British institution of a permanent
secretariat would be most desirable.
In short, a mere disjointed effort to create "publicity” for the
national defense appears to be too narrow and insufficient a means
in this day of the Nation in Arms, and that the broader policy
of an effort to establish and disseminate a national doctrine of war
is a possible solution which promises rich rewards, is the firm
belief of the writer.


  p. 1696 (#624)                      #

POSSIBLE IMPROVEMENTS IN OUR
GUNNERY TRAINING.
By LIEUTENANT COMMANDER W. H. P. BLANDY, U. S. Navy
IN SPITE of the rapid advances which our Navy has made in
gunnery during the last two decades, and the high state of
proficiency which has now been attained, I believe that further
marked improvements are possible, at the present time, without
waiting for new developments in naval ordnance. In other words,
our system of gunnery training is susceptible of betterment.
The first and most important change which suggests itself to a
reviewer of our training methods is the elimination of “non-battle
practice” from the operating schedule of our active forces.
Champions of short range “battle” practice are requested not to
become disgusted yet, but to read further. That practice is use-
ful—in its proper place—but its proper place is in the elementary
grades of a separate gunnery school—the kindergarten of gunnery.
Why should the university student go back each year and recite
his A B C's all over again with a handful of infants who have
been allowed to join his classes? This method of training our
gunnery initiates is one of our most effective obstacles to advanced
battle efficiency.
Toward the end of each year we do learn a smattering of the
advanced phases of naval gunnery, and see our mistakes clearly
after we have made them. Then we go back to short range
“battle” practice, and forget all about real battle practices until
the end of the next year, when, with the inevitable changes of
personnel, and the many and varied activities of the year's opera-
tions, the same blunders in the advanced practices that were made
the year before are repeated. We never become thoroughly versed
in battle gunnery.
Furthermore, any plotting room officer will testify that there
are many members of the fire control party to whom short range
battle practice does not give even fundamental training. Some of


  p. 1697 (#625)                      #

1925)
1697
Possible Improvements in Gunnery
them must remain in utter idleness, because the fire control prob-
lem involved is so simple, or the range is so short, that the instru-
ments which they man are either not required or cannot be used.
Others are forced by the extreme artificiality of the problem to
adopt methods which are distinctly false and therefore harmful.
This result is perfectly natural. The practice was originally in-
tended to "qualify" gun pointers. It also develops fast loading
crews, and familiarizes new personnel with the functioning of the
battery and the loading devices, but it was never intended to train
the fire control party. In 1903, when the first practice similar to
our present S. R. B. P. was held, fire control as we know it today
simply did not exist.
As for training and qualifying gun pointer and director pointer
groups, and demonstrating to new personnel the operation of the
battery and loading devices, this work can be done more thoroughly
and rapidly in a gunnery school than on board fleet vessels, solely
because of concentration and specialization, and fast loading crews
can be developed by plenty of drill both at the gunnery school and
in the fleet, punctuated by various firing, elementary at the school
and advanced in the fleet. It makes very little difference to the
loading crew what the practice is, except that short range battle
practice is probably somewhat more hectic and feverish than a
battle would be.
To summarize, short range battle practice on vessels of the
fleet is:
I) Unnecessary for loading crews.
2) Not so good as a gunnery school for developing pointers
and trainers and for demonstrating general gunnery principles to
new men.
3) Distinctly harmful for the fire control party.
The substitute, then, is the U. S. Naval Gunnery School. This
institution has already been discussed by a number of officers, and
it is not the purpose of this article to propose any details for its
organization, equipment, or curriculum. I wish only to point out
that if all men of the seaman branch were given a rudimentary
course in gunnery at such a school before joining the fleet, the
active forces could devote their entire time to real battle training.
Furthermore, the elementary training received at the gunnery


  p. 1698 (#626)                      #

1698
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
school would be standardized, and since the officer and petty officer
instructors, through constant practice, would become expert in
their work, the instruction given would be uniformly excellent.
We should have "quantity production” of well trained men. It is
true that vessels would have to be assigned to the school, and that
these vessels, even though they operated with reduced comple-
ments, would take men from the fleet. The men in training would
also represent a personnel loss to the fleet. The Navy would
therefore need more men, or else we should have to content our-
selves with a smaller (and more efficient) operating force; but
the game is surely worth the candle.
It has been proposed by Commander Russell Willson, U. S.
Navy, in “Our System of Fleet Training,” PROCEEDINGS No. 266,
April, 1925, that we change our fleet training cycle from a one-
year to a two-year system. Such a change would appear highly
desirable, in view of the greater opportunities afforded for
strategic and tactical training. It would also improve gunnery by
providing more advanced practices in the complete cycle, and by
allowing more time for preparation and analysis. It would also
force us into greater permanence of official personnel. But, it
must be remembered that our large turnover of enlisted personnel
afloat is not caused so much by men merely changing stations, as
is largely the case with officers, as by men going out of the Nazy.
Changing from a one-year to a two-year cycle cannot, therefore,
alter to any great extent the large number of new men joining the
active vessels of the fleet each year, and, with an elementary
practice only once in two years, vessels would frequently go into
advanced practices with a large percentage of absolutely green
men. So, as little as I like S. R. B. P. in the fleet, on account of
the time it wastes for practically all officers above lieutenant grade,
and for nearly all men except the "boots,” I should certainly not
like to see it abolished, with no substitute, even for alternate years.
The establishment of an elementary gunnery school would
furnish the necessary substitute for our annual elementary
practices in the fleet, and would thus enable us to take full ad-
vantage of the two-year training cycle. As regards tactics alone, it
is easily seen that the substitution of advanced gunnery exercises in
the feet for the elementary practices will, in itself, emphasize the
effect of the two-year system by introducing more tactical train-


  p. 1699 (#627)                      #

1925]
1699
Possible Improvements in Gunnery
ing into the gunnery program. Compare, for instance, the tactical
training value of short range battle practice with that of any
practice wherein a division or squadron of ships is steaming in
formation and firing simultaneously, and, of course, it is practices
of the latter type which we must add to the program. We are
still prone to think in ships instead of squadrons. We are not
yet doing enough to encourage division and squadron battle effi-
ciency. A greater proportion of "group exercises” for ships which
will have to operate in groups in action will place us a little nearer
to our goal of readiness for battle.
The next suggestion for improving our gunnery training system
is that we make better use of the spirit of competition. This
appears at first to be an unwarranted criticism of a navy which
has probably used competition to greater advantage than has any
other, both in gunnery and in engineering. But, we have made
some mistakes, and we are still making them, in applying competi-
tion to gunnery. We give prizes to pointer groups and to turret
and gun crews in the elementary and more or less individual work
of short range battle practice; and then we give no prizes at all to
these units in the practices which most nearly represent an actual
engagement. Of course, the old story is that we can isolate the
performance of the individual only at short range. But do we
actually bother to do this? How many times has "the best little
gun pointer in the navy” gone down to defeat because of some
defect over which he had no control—a jammed plug, a broken
powder bag, a break in the firing circuit, a rammer out of com-
mission! And did he get qualified on the shots he did fire, which
were hits ? Not very often. And what about the world beating
loading crews, who load their guns three times "in nothing flat”—
only to have the pointer score three beautiful misses ? What do
they get? Nothing worth mentioning. No; we lump the work of
all the individuals in a turret or gun crew, in awarding prizes for
short range battle practice, because it encourages "teamwork.” In
other words, we “isolate the work of the individual,” and “de-
velop team work in the group," all in the same breath. Consistent ?
Not quite. The teamwork of the group is really all we can fairly
grade, and the entire ship is certainly a more important team than
a single gun or turret crew. Hence, if we cut out short range
battle practice, we should give the prize money to the high ships


  p. 1700 (#628)                      #

1700
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
in some advanced practice, or, for that matter, to the high ships
in the entire year's work. If we must retain short range battle
practice, then we should at least greatly reduce the turret and gun
prizes awarded therefor, and allot the majority of this money to
the more important practices. Thus we may begin to turn our
competitive system right side up. We can make matters still better
by awarding division trophies, and where appropriate (for
instance, for destroyers), squadron trophies, in addition to the
present individual ship trophies. Division and squadron spirit will
never be so strong as pride in the individual ship, but these
additional trophies, with corresponding distinguishing marks to be
displayed by all vessels of the unit winning them, will go far
toward fostering such spirit, and therefore toward increasing
group efficiency.
The second mistake in our methods of applying competition
to gunnery lies in our "graded merit” system, by which we com-
bine the scores made by all the ships of a class in all practices into
final scores and standing for the entire year's work. The present
system aims to accomplish this object in such a way that each
practice is given a "weight” proportional to its relative importance.
Such a principle is necessary, of course, but the system is sus-
ceptible of a change which will make it accomplish its intended
purpose more efficiently than it does now, and at the same time
will make for keener competition within units, especially in the
case of isolated forces.
Without going into great detail in describing the present system
for those who may not be familiar with it, it will suffice to say that
the "points" scored by a certain ship in a given practice are de-
pendent upon the best performance in that practice by any ship,
which performance is taken as the standard. Other ships are
graded by the ratio of excellence which their performances bear to
this standard. Since some ships are always delayed, this pro-
cedure results in no ship getting a score that means anything for
months after a practice. When it comes to combining merits for
different practices, to see how two vessels stand, just between
themselves, the job is hopeless, until next year, when the printed
book comes out. Of course, for standing in the entire Navy, the
answer cannot come in until the last shell goes out—and even then
we must wait for the last torpedo. But it's your own league that


  p. 1701 (#629)                      #

1925]
1701
Possible Improvements in Gunnery
counts the most. The ships you see every day are the ones you
want to beat, especially if it's toward the end of the year, and you
know your chance for the trophy is “shot.”
The remedy is to assign a definite standard score based on
previous years' average performances. Make it as much bigger
as you like, each year, but set it up for all ships to shoot at, and
give each vessel her points according to the ratio her score bears
to it. It is true that if some ship makes a freak score much higher
than the standard in à certain practice, she will get a number of
points much greater than the practice is supposed to be worth-
but so she does now, by forcing all other ships down so far in this
practice that the average vessel finds it of less importance in mak-
ing up her total multiple than some insignificant “Battle Biscuit B.”
In the meantime, under the new system--which probably was the
old system before "graded merits” were invented—two vessels
which are about even, before the last practice of the year, will
know that whichever one makes the higher score in that practice
will win for the year, so far as those two are concerned, regard-
less of what any other ships do. They will therefore work the
harder, just to beat the other fellow, and the skippers will not be
detached before the issue is settled.
The final suggestion for improving our gunnery training system
is that a careful survey be made of the size of our targets in all
practices. It is easy to use the same size of target year after year,
when constant improvement in a particular form of practice would
justify making the target a bit smaller, and it is also easy to use
for one type of vessel a target which has become standard for
another type; but it does not follow that the best results will be
obtained in this way. Generally speaking, a target should have the
same dimensions as the objective in battle. If the practice is ex-
tremely difficult, and especially if it is a new form entirely, then
we would be justified in starting with a larger target, cutting it
down gradually each year until its proper size is reached, but
under no circumstances should we use a target smaller than we
shall have in action, when it is possible to use a target of proper
size. For instance, a destroyer, supposedly firing her guns at
another destroyer which is presumably returning her fire, should
have an area not appreciably less than the vulnerable part of her
enemy would be when projected through the sharpest angle which


  p. 1702 (#630)                      #

1702
(Sept.
l'. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
would permit all of the enemy's guns to bear. Thus, if the enemy
destroyer had the same general characteristics as one of ours, this
area would be about twenty feet high by 140 feet long, which area
would include all of her guns, tubes and depth charges, lower
portion of stacks (where smoke pouring out would affect deck
personnel) and the exposed hull, at a "target angle” such that all
her guns could just bear. A target very much smaller than this,
iſ used in an important practice, will result in such ridiculously
low scores that the gunnery personnel will get the idea that “It
can't be done,” and in an effort to cover their humiliation, will
laugh it off, and not take it so seriously next year. The target
must always be large enough to insure a reasonable percentage of
hits being obtained by well trained personnel. Otherwise, the
gunnery officer's only chance is to emulate the negro soldier on the
transport, who rushed on deck when the submarine alarm sounded,
took one look at the gun's crew and another at the tiny periscope,
then fell on his knees and prayed, “Oh God, give them gunners
luck !”


  p. 1703 (#631)                      #

THE PANAMA CANAL’S BIGGEST SHIP
By CAPTAIN A. W. Hinds, U. S. Navy
A RECORD was made at the Panama Canal on July 23,
o 1924, both as to size of ship passing through the canal and
as to tolls paid on a single vessel. This record was made
at the passage of the British battle cruiser Hood, which is 860
feet 7 inches in length, has a beam of 105 feet 2/2 inches, and was
drawing 32 feet at the time of the transit.
Men-of-war, other than those of the United States, are charged
canal tolls at the rate of fifty cents per ton displacement, and as
the Hood displaced 44,799 tons she paid into the U. S. Treasury
$22,399.50—by far the largest sum ever paid for the transit of a
single vessel. Another record near that of the Hood was made on
the same day on transit of H.M.S. Repulse, which is 794 feet 27/2
inches long, 102 feet 8 inches beam, and paid a toll of $17,679.50.
The best previous records were made by the British battle
cruiser Renown, which transited the canal with the Prince of
Wales on board in 1920. The Renown is 795 feet long, but had
much less beam than the present battle cruisers, for the torpedo
and mine blisters have been installed since the Renown used the
canal. The Renown's tolls were $16,689,50, which were slightly
exceeded by the steamer America with tolls of $16,855.50.
The nearest ships in breadth of beam to the Hood and Repulse
have been the U. S. S. Mississippi and New Mexico, with beams
of 97 feet 472 inches.
The problem in seamanship with the Mississippi and New
Mexico, however, was a much simpler one than that of passing
the Hood through the locks. No damage would have occurred had
the American ships rubbed against the concrete side walls of the
lock as the armor plate projects enough to protect the tender hull
from side wall damage. The under water blisters on the Hood
project well beyond the armor plate so they would have taken up
against the side walls first in case the ship had got far from
the center of the locks, and with any way on the heavy ship ex-


  p. 1704 (#632)                      #


H. M. S. Hood in Pana-
ma Canal locks at Pedro
Miguel. The blisters (under water)
project so much outside of armor plate
that there was only 2 feet, 434 inches clear-
ance on each side between ship and walls. Note
the electric locomotives on walls used to keep ship
in middle of lock and to pull her in at slow speed.


  p. 1705 (#633)                      #

1925)
1705
Panama Canal's Biggest Ship
tensive damage might have been done. As the locks are 1,000 feet
long and 110 feet wide there was to spare when the Hood was in
a lock, 70 feet clearance at each end between the ship and the lock
gates and only 2 feet 434 inches clearance at the sides.
The problem of locking through the Hood was a ticklish one for
canal authorities for it was known that the blisters are not strong
enough to resist any great amount of side pressure against the
lock walls and it was further realized that damage to these power-
ful warships of a friendly nation would cause unfavorable com-
ment and give the canal a bad reputation. It was, therefore,
decided in making the transit plans for the Hood to use the old
maxim “Better go slow than be sorry."
There is a center wall, between the twin locks, that projects
about a thousand feet beyond the lock proper. So the locking plan
involved, first, approaching this center wall very slowly; then,
when alongside the wall with practically no way on, the locomotive
wires were passed aboard and the ship proceeded into the lock at
a snail's speed, guided and kept in the exact center of the lock by
four electric locomotives on each of the side walls.
On account of the top hamper the pilot could see very little
astern, so the ship had platforms built along the upper deck which
projected beyond the armor plate the same amount as the blisters.
Officers manned these platforms and kept the pilot informed as to
how far the outside of the blister was from the side wall and
whether the clearance was increasing or decreasing.
Aside from the locking problem, there was a little nervousness
about how these big ships would handle in Gaillard Cut where the
canal width is only 300 feet and which has eight turns varying
in magnitude from seven to thirty degrees. Some ships act very
badly in the cut, especially when they are of heavy draft. They
will be going along very nicely when suddenly, and apparently
without reason, they take a sheer toward the bank and it takes
all the rudder and all the engine power to break the sheer and
sometimes even an anchor has to be dropped and the chain snubbed
to break the swing toward the bank. The Hood is so heavy that
there was no thought of trying to check her with the anchor chain.
but she had an advantage over the ordinary deeply laden freighter
in ample power of engines. As a matter of precaution a tug was
placed ahead of each battle cruiser on a short tow line to assist in


  p. 1706 (#634)                      #

1706
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
swinging the ship if it became necessary. It would have given
more turning power, of course, to take the tug on the bow but the
forecastle flare was too great for the tug to work at the bow. Both
ships passed through the canal without any trouble whatever.
The steering tugs did not have to be used at all in the narrow cut.
Incidentally, the least depth the ship had to steer in during the
passage of Gaillard Cut was thirty-seven feet. This was due to
the fact that all of the material of last October's slide has not yet
been removed. The whole cut is being cleaned up—material from
slides and silt dredged out; when this is completed the draft in the
cut at the end of the rainy season, when the lake is high, will be
forty-seven feet. When the lake is low, at the end of the dry
season, the least depth will be forty feet. Those who have served
on battleships will appreciate how much better the Hood would
have maneuvered with fourteen feet of water unedr the keel (as
she would have had with slide material all dredged out) compared
to the five feet she had on the day she transited. Nevertheless,
these big ships handled wonderfully well and the canal organiza-
tion was very proud of the message of congratulation from the
British vice admiral.


  p. 1706 (#635)                      #



  p. 1706 (#636)                      #



  p. 1707 (#637)                      #

GRAPHICAL AIDS TO NAVIGATION
By LIEUTENANT W. A. Mason, U. S. Navy
\HE value of graphical aids to the navigator are obvious,
affording, as they do, an easy method of obtaining necessary
data in minimum time and without troublesome interpolation.
In Fig. 1 is shown a graphical chart of the corrections to the
altitude of Polaris for the year 1925. This chart was constructed
from data given in Table 1, Nautical Almanac.
The outer circle is graduated into divisions of from o to 24 hours
Local Sidereal Time, each graduation corresponding to four
minutes of time. Visual interpolation to one minute can easily
be made.
Fifty-six concentric circles are drawn, each representing a
correction of one minute of arc to the altitude of Polaris. Visual
interpolation to the fractional part of a minute can easily be made.
To use this chart the altitude of Polaris is observed and time
noted. Watch time is converted into L.S.T., which is then located
on circumference of outer circle. A straightedge laid from this
point to center will intersect one of the two correction circles. At
the point of intersection will be found the correction to the altitude
of Polaris, the value of same being given by the number of the
concentric circle which is nearest this intersection. It will be
noted that corrections taken from one correction circle are additive
and those from the other correction circle are subtractive.
The author has constructed a similar chart for corrections to
the altitude of the moon, from the data given in Table 49 of
Bowditch.
It has been found that the use of such charts permits more rapid
and accurate work. They are of particular value to those to whom
interpolation is irksome. The use of this chart would obviate the
possibility of error due to typographical error in Nautical Almanac
for 1925 for Table 1, L.S.T. 3h. iom.


  p. 1708 (#638)                      #


noo:v 180°
160°
LONGITUDE EAST
1909 120 100 80 60
40%
LONGITUDE WEST
40 60 80 100
120
140
160
180' NOON
NA
L.C.T. P.M.
C.T. SAME DATE
6.C.T. NEXT DATE
L.C.T. P.M.
122
2
/
10
23
MIDNIGHT
T. YAMEOATE
B.C.T PREVIOUS DATE
UZ NEXT DATE
.C.T SAME DATE
JMIDNIGHT
G.C.T. PREVIOUS DATE
R.C.T. SAME DATE
A.M.
VN
L.C.T.
L.C.T AM
NOON
NOON
poo
100
110
120
100
80
60
100
200 100
60
80
100 120
1900 160
200
Fig. 2


  p. 1709 (#639)                      #

1925)
1709
Graphical Aids to Navigation
In Fig. 2 is shown a graphical method of determining the proper
date at Greenwich for those who have trouble with this simple but
important factor.
A similar chart was previously published in the PROCEEDINGS,
but as so constructed is of no value subsequent to January 1,
1925, due to change from G.M.T. to G.C.T. at that time.
To use this chart, enter at the longitude line (east or west)
corresponding to your longitude. Follow this line until it inter-
sects the time line (horizontal) corresponding to your watch time
A.M., or P.M. The nearest diagonal line above this intersection will
be the G.C.T. Should this intersection take place in upper right
triangle the Greenwich date is of the next day. Should the inter-
section take place in the lower left triangle, the Greenwich date is
of the previous day. Intersection that takes place in any other
section of chart will give Greenwich date as same day.


  p. 1710 (#640)                      #

A HOME-MADE PLANISPHERE
By CAPTAIN ALBERT N. Wood, U. S. Navy, RETIRED
ITIS deplorable that at the present day the study of descriptive
I astronomy seems almost entirely neglected.
The writer has investigated the subject as far as his re-
stricted opportunities have allowed. Among those interviewed
were a number of college graduates, a few naval officers, rather
recent graduates of Annapolis, and a very much greater number of
other intelligent people, not of collegiate education. The results in
all cases were similar. A few of the college graduates had studied
astronomy, usually an elective course, and one or two of them con-
fessed to having a slight bowing acquaintance with a few of the
stars and constellations, knowing them when they saw them. Of
the naval officers interviewed, it happened that all of them frankly
and regretfully admitted that their personal intimacy with the stars
left a great deal to be desired, though, of course, all were familiar
with navigation; all of them seemed glad to have their attention
called to their deficiency, which admits of speedy rectification. As
to the third class, their astronomical knowledge, beyond knowing
the position of the North Star and how to find it, was practically
nil.
That this ignorance is not confined to our own people, the
following quotation from Camille Flammarion's Astronomy for
Aniateurs will show :
Ask ourselves how many there are, even among thinking human beings,
who ever raise their eyes to the starry heavens? How many men and
women of our acquaintance are there who sincerely and with intelligent
curiosity, interest themselves in the shining specks, and inaccessible lumi-
naries, and are really desirious of a better acquaintance with them? Their
number is small, indeed.
Seek, talk, ask in the intercourse of daily life. You will find that the
number of those inquiring after truth is so limited that no one desires to
speak of it, so disgraceful is it to the so-called intelligence of our race.
And yet the great book of the heavens is open to all eyes.
Astronomy is the science par excellence. It is the most ancient and
beautiful of all; it dates back to the indeterminate times of highest antiquity.


  p. 1711 (#641)                      #

1925)
1711
A Home-made Planisphere
Its mission is not only to make us acquainted with the innumerable orbs
by which our nights are illuminated, but it is, moreover, thanks to it that
we know where and what we are. Without it we should live as the blind,
in eternal ignorance of the very conditions of our terrestrial existence.
Without it we should still be penetrated with the naive error which reduced
the entire universe to our minute globule, making our humanity the goal
of the Creation, and we should have no exact notion of the immense reality.
Today, thanks to the intelligent labor of so many centuries, thanks also
to the immortal genius of the men of science-and I mean women toom
who have devoted their lives to searching after truth, men such as Coper-
nicus, Galileo, Kepler, Newton, Caroline Herschel, Hypatia, of Alexandria,
Madame Hortense Lepaute, Marie Agnesi, Maria Mitchel, of America, and
many others but little known, the veil of ignorance has been rent, and the
marvels of creation are perceptible in their splendid truth to the dazzled eyes
of the thinker.
The study of astronomy is not, as so many suppose, the sacrifice of one's
self to the cerebral torture that obliterates all the beauty, the fascination,
and the grandeur of the pageant of nature. It is not necessary to plunge
oneself into mathematics. Simply open your eyes to see where you are,
so that you may not stray from the path of truth, which is also the path
of happiness. Once you are well entered upon it, no persuasion will be
necessary to make you persevere. And you will have the profound satis-
faction of knowing that you are thinking correctly, and that it is infinitely
better to be educated than to be ignorant. The reality is far beyond all
dreams, beyond the most fantastic imagination.
The application of these remarks seems to be that there is a
defect in the curricula of our high schools and colleges that should
receive the serious attention of our educators.
Restricting the application to the Navy, the writer assumes that
conditions are much the same as when he graduated. The young
officers leaving the Academy have received a slight course in
general astronomy and an intensive one in navigation, while little
or no personal introduction to the stars that must have become-
with constantly increasing sea speeds—more and more important
factors in navigating. Anything which helps to remedy this
assumed defect deserves attention.
There are less than fifty-nine of the heavenly bodies that are at
all likely to be used by the navigator. It is not too much to expect
that every line officer will render himself familiar with the person-
alities of these bodies—and they all have them—in the interests of
quick and efficient navigation. This is as easily accomplished as
getting acquainted with the personal characteristics of the same


  p. 1712 (#642)                      #

1712
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
number of men; more so, perhaps, as the stars are always found
with the same associates.
Possibly some readers of this article may be unfamiliar with the
planisphere, which was certainly in use in this country during the
first half of the last century as an aid in teaching astronomy, along
with a star atlas that pictured the constellations as the skeletons
of mythical or fanciful creatures or figures from which they had
been named by early astronomers. These aids were in vogue at
young ladies' finishing schools. One of these atlases, now in the
possession of the writer, was copyrighted in 1835.
There seems to have been in those days a much wider popular
interest in the stars than obtains at present, which, however, is
not claiming very much. Sixty years ago astronomy was studied
in many high schools and colleges as a regular course. Today it is
almost unknown in high schools and has generally become elective
in colleges and universities.
The word planisphere is thus defined by the Century Dictionary:
1. A projection of the sphere; especially a polar projection of the
celestial sphere.
2. An apparatus consisting of a polar projection of the heavens, with
a card over it turning about the pole and so cut out as to show the
part of the heavens visible at a given latitude at a given sidereal
time.
The planisphere was invented by Hipparchus, who lived about
160-125 B.C. He was evidently a genius of the first rank: “He
catalogued the stars, invented the planisphere and made a number
of the most important discoveries, including the eccentricity of the
solar orbit, some of the inequalities of the moon's motion, the pre-
cession of the equinoxes, and so forth.” The writer has found
no detailed description of Hipparchus' invention. He has in his
possession an arrangement called “Whitaker's Planisphere, show-
ing the principal stars visible for every hour in the year from
Lat. 40° N.” The planisphere in use during the earlier half of the
last century is said to have been very similar in design to
Whitaker's. This is quite an ornate affair in cardboard and
leather, with gilt lettering; it is made abroad and distributed by
"Thomas Whitaker, 2 and 3 Bible House, New York." No pro-
vision is made for plotting the changing positions of the sun, moon,
and planets. Another form of commercial planisphere, called a
star and planet finder, is a patented article of American manu-


  p. 1713 (#643)                      #

1925)
1713
A Home-made Planisphere
facture, generally similar to Whitaker's though somewhat larger,
and having a complicated arrangement for plotting the places of
the members of the solar system on it for a number of years ahead.
Both of these instruments come under the second definition of
planisphere. Neither is well adapted to the uses of a navigator,
both being designed for a latitude of forty degrees, both being too
small a scale, with the cut out window showing a celestial horizon
that is an ellipse. They are both rather expensive. Both com-
mercial planispheres are undoubtedly useful in the study of the
stars and in the localities for which they are designed. The cost
of the Home-made Planisphere, about to be described, is trifling,
and it has several other marked advantages, such as much larger
scale, mathematical correctness of design, and wider adaptability.
The description is more detailed than would be necessary for
navigators alone, as it is hoped to interest others in the use of this
easily constructed apparatus. The sanguine writer has visions of
its being made a fad by retired naval officers and others who find
golf too violent, cross-word puzzles a bore, and who love
the outdoors. In fact, it is conceivable that our Hydrographic
Office might design and print the "riding card” for the planisphere
(definition 1) that it already has on the market. In this connection
its value for popularizing the Navy might be considerable.
The essential parts of the Home-made Planisphere are “U. S.
Hydrographic Office Chart No. 2100, Constellations of the
Northern Hemisphere," with a "riding card” applied to it, and a
copy of the American Nautical Almanac for the current year.
The chart and almanac are for sale at all stores dealing in nautical
instruments; as the stock on hand at the dealers is sometimes
exhausted, one can always get the chart by sending directly to the
Hydrographer, Navy Department, Washington, D.C., and enclos-
ing a postal order for twenty cents, the price of the chart. The
American Nautical Almanac bears this legend on its face: “Pub-
lished by the Nautical Almanac Office, U. S. Naval Observatory,
under the authority of the Secretary of the Navy. Sold by the
Superintendent of Documents, Government Printing Office, Wash-
ington, D.C. Price fifteen cents.” A postal order to the Super-
intendent of Documents for fifteen cents will insure the delivery
of the Almanac with great promptness.
The chart is a polar projection of the northern hemisphere of
the celestial sphere, showing the principal constellations, with all


  p. 1714 (#644)                      #

1714
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
of the stars of the first and second magnitudes, and many others
down to and including the sixth magnitude; this is the lowest
magnitude for stars visible to unaided vision. The projection
proper is included in a circle of sixteen inches diameter, which
affords a very convenient scale for the chart; there is added to its
circumference, a circular zone two and two thirds inches wide, on
which are shown the constellations and stars from the equator to the
thirtieth degree of south declination. This zone is necessarily a
drawing on a different scale from the chart, and this should be kept
in mind. There is one first magnitude star,* that is useful to the
navigator, that escapes being plotted on the chart by being just
south of the thirtieth degree declination limit. It can be plotted
from its coordinates in the Nautical Almanac. Directions for use
of the chart are printed on its margin, as are the symbols for the
various members of the solar system, and the conventional method
of denoting the magnitudes of the various stars mapped. All stars
are named in the order of their brilliancy in their own constella-
tions by the letters of the Greek alphabet, and are so marked on
the chart; it would have been an additional convenience, perhaps,
if the Greek alphabet, in whole or in part, had been printed on the
margin with the names of letters in English, especially so as the
Nautical Almanac omits to give this educational feature. The
Greek alphabet is Greek to many intelligent people.
The "riding card” needed to bring Chart 2100 under the second
definition of planisphere, is made of cardboard or other suitable
material. A circle of ninety degrees radius, scale of the chart,
is drawn on the cardboard sheet, marking the center. Graduate
the circumference to convenient units. Draw diameters at, say,
every fifteen degrees, extending the diameters slightly beyond the
circumference of the circle, and carefully perforate the card at the
extremities of the diameters. Cut out the circle and reeve strong
coarse thread through the opposite holes of each diameter, secur-
ing the ends of the threads with each diameter taut across. Stiffen
the central crossing of the threads with a drop of mucilage, and
before it is quite dry perforate the exact center. Cut the outside
of the cardboard at a suitable width to give stiffness in handling.
Mark the graduations of the circle for azimuths, having denoted
the meridian diameter by a thread of a different color from the
others. Numerous modifications will suggest themselves.
* Fomalhaut, Alpha Piscis Australis.


  p. 1715 (#645)                      #

1925]
1715
A Home-made Planisphere
To use the apparatus, mount the chart on a light drawing board
of suitable size, find the zenith of the observer at a desired time,
as directed on the chart, and with a thumb tack through the cross-
center of the "riding card,” secure it at the zenith. Turn it till
the colored thread cuts the pole. The circle then represents,
approximately, the celestial horizon, of the observer at the given
time; the cross threads are the vertical circles, and all the visible
stars will be seen charted very much as they will appear in the
heavens. From time to time the zenith may be shifted to the east-
ward, and to the north or south, by dead reckoning, as needed.
The altitude and azimuth can be approximately obtained for any
visible star, almost by inspection. The rising of bright stars can
also be anticipated and provided for. Best of all, there need be no
possible mistake in the star observed. With this crude apparatus
and a little attentive study, perhaps with a very little help at first
by a more instructed amateur astronomer, it is within the capacity
of an eighth grade, public school boy to learn how to find the
answer, himself, to the question "What is the name of any ob-
served star?" or "Where is such and such a star, now?" In
addition to this, this intelligent school boy* has become a zealous
amateur astronomer, and an educational center. It's really worth
while—anybody's while.
There are two excellent books, published by Harper Brothers,
that give their readers a charming view of descriptive astronomy,
both by the same author, Martha Evans Martin ; they should form
a part of every naval vessel's library; perhaps they do. For the
more advanced students of astronomy there is A Popular History
of Astronomy during the Nineteenth Century, by Agnes M. Clerke,
Fourth Edition, Revised and Corrected. London, Adam and
Charles Black, 1902. This is a recognized, standard work.
So far as the writer knows, this method of actually showing
the zenith of the observer, the celestial horizon as a great circle,
centered at the zenith, and the various vertical circles, is original.
He hopes it may prove useful in high speed navigation. He has
already proven to his own satisfaction its utility in clearing up the
somewhat puzzling motions, apparent and real, of the orbs of
light that form the “Pageant of Nature.”
* An actual boy, named John Clark.


  p. 1716 (#646)                      #

A MOORING BOARD PROBLEM
By LIEUTENANT COMMANDER T. L. Gatch, U. S. Navy
A SSUME that in a certain form of target practice the rules
A require that fire be opened with the target bearing 70
degrees to the right of the base course at a range of 16,000
yards; that the speed of the target is to be not less than 6 nor more
than 12 knots; that the speed of the firing ship is to be 20 knots,
and that the course of the target is to be not more than 30 degrees
from the base course. Assume that for your firing the base course
prescribed is 270 degrees.
You have talked things over with the gunnery officer and have
promised him to be steady on the base course as long before
opening fire as practicable. You figure this out mentally and
estimate that if you steady on the base course 4,000 yards before
you get to the firing point it is bound to give him something over
five minutes, which ought to satisfy any gunnery officer. You
have impressed Plot with the necessity of getting the target's
course and speed up to you as soon as they can.
On the mooring board you have laid down point A, line O-A
representing your firing course and speed, and point B, the point
where you open fire. You start the approach and by the time you
have closed to 20,000 yards, say point C, Plot has given you the
target's course as 250 and speed as 10. You lay this down, line
O-D. The line A-D represents your motion relative to the target,
and, obviously, to point B. Draw a line parallel to A-D back
through point B. If from any place on this line you steady on your
firing course you will intersect point B. The geometrical proof
of this is simple: Point B moves along a line parallel to (-D,
B-M; the firing ship moves along a line parallel to 0-A, E-M;
triangle EMB is similar to triangle OAD for the three sides are
respectively parallel to each other; therefore BM must be pro-
* Author's note. Some of the features of this problem I have never seen
published, and doubt if they are known by many of the younger officers
of the service. My acknowledgments are made to Rear Admiral L. M.
Nulton and Captain R. C. Moody, U. S. Navy.


  p. 1717 (#647)                      #

KUL
No. 2665 a

TO
260
yo
TAILU
250
TUTTI
320
310
20
hukumudu
350
P
YIL
LUXULLINDUL
22
00
061
OU
VTTTII
180
LIL


  p. 1718 (#648)                      #

1718
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
portional to OD, the speed of the target, and EM to AO, the
speed of the firing ship. You have already determined to reach
a point on the line B-E 4,000 yards from B. Lay this down,
point E. Your course from C to E is 241 degrees. When you
reach point E you change course to 270 and reach the firing point.
Suppose as you plot over, and when you have reached point X,
the captain asks you how long it will be until open fire. Your
present course and speed are represented by O-F; the target's
by O-D. The relative rate of change between you and the target
is the distance FD on the speed scale, and, in this problem, is
10.6 knots. The speed reduced to yards per minute is 353. (The
rule is, multiply speed in knots by 100 and divide by 3. A knot
is 2,000 yards in 60 minutes.) From X to E on the distance scale
is 7,100 yards. Therefore, in 7,100 divided by 353 equals 20
minutes, about, you will be at point E. At point E you change
course to that represented by O-A. The distance AD on the speed
scale is 11 knots, which is 367 yards per minute. From E to B is
4,000 yards. 4,000 divided by 367 is i minutes, about. Your
answer to the captain's question is 31 minutes. If you are wise
you will answer, “About thirty minutes, captain."


  p. 1718 (#649)                      #

RETARDATION OF SHIPS' SPEED
DUE TO TURNING
By ENSIGN W. K. MENDENHALL, JR., U. S. Navy
IT IS common knowledge that when the rudder of a ship is
I put over the ship heels, turns along a curved line and slows.
The advance and transfer of all naval vessels with various
amounts of rudder must be obtained in order to establish their
tactical qualities; but the retardation in speed due to the vessel's
angular advance through the water and the drag of her rudder is
a subject that has been neglected.
Accurate data concerning a ship's retardation in turning would
be of assistance to the ship for two reasons. In the first place,
engagements in the future will, in all probability, be fought at
great ranges, and possibly with targets obscured from ship's di-
rectors, necessitating indirect fire; our plotting, tracking and range
keeping become of utmost importance and consequently anything
that tends to their accuracy is of value. In problems of fire con-
trol, we have always considered as known factors the course and
speed of our own ship. The ship's course is known as accurately
as the compass provides it, but the speed may temporarily be in
error. The flexibility of our battle line which allows the change
of course of units, or even of ships in certain instances, anticipates
numerous changes of course of each ship during a major engage-
ment. These changes may easily come at a crucial point of the
battle and it would certainly add to the accuracy of the range keep-
ing if the operator knew how much speed the ship lost for each
change of course. Second, from a tactical standpoint it would be
of assistance during maneuvers if the speed of the vessel were
known when the vessel was turning up to an assigned position from
a course at an angle with that of the guide.
On August 6, 1924, the U. S. S. Maryland, Captain Frank H.
Clark, U. S. Navy, commanding, Commander W. L. Calhoun,
U. S. Navy, navigator, took tactical data in Puget Sound off Port


  p. 1718 (#650)                      #

Turning Circles
U.S.S.Maryland.
Ships heed 90°
Tine 0-00
l Rudder 18+ Right@
or'
Wind 300' Force 12
Sea calm
1
o--2-
pSpor
oro o a
&
P Spar
Ships head o
e
9 Ships mecson
å se og
-
SAips head 270
line 50
(Ships need 30°
Tine 0
Rudder 174 Loft ® 0-or


  p. 1719 (#651)                      #

1925)
1721
Retardation of Ships' Speed
Angeles, Washington, as directed by Commander Battleship Divi-
sions, Battle Fleet, in an effort to ascertain something concerning
the ship's retardation on turns. A brief description of the method
used in obtaining the data and the results observed, together with a
plot of turns made, follow.
A spar weighted to float at the mean draft of the ship was put
over to afford a reference point for observations. The spar so
weighted and floating freely in the same water as the ship auto-
matically compensated for any set and drift of current which might
affect the ship’s turning. The wind was 300° (true) but was so
light as not to affect the turning of a ship of this type. In order
not to be wholly dependent on the reading of a short range base
range finder two officers with stadimeters were sent in a pulling
boat with instructions to keep as close as possible to the spar
without actually touching it or affecting its drift by the movement
of their boat. Stadimeter readings were taken on the foremast of
the ship and range finder readings on spar were taken from the
bridge, so that not more than ten yards difference in ranges from
ship to boat and from boat to ship should have occurred. A time
signal was arranged whereby observers in the boat could start
stop watches simultaneously with watches on board ship; signals
were also arranged so that ranges could be taken from the boat
and the ship simultaneously. In the accompanying plot of turns,
positions by stadimeter from the boat are marked by small crosses,
and range finder positions are marked by circles.
The ship made the approach on the spar from a distance of
over two miles to insure a steady course and speed at the com-
mencement of the turn. When the ship reached a point such that.
the turning circle would circle the buoy, the order was given,
“Right Standard Half Rudder”—watches were started, the time
signal executed and a range and bearing were taken on the spar.
At each 10° change of course an observer stationed at the steering
gyro repeater sang out “Mark," time was noted, boat was signalled
to take stadimeter reading and range and bearing were taken from
the ship. When the ship had turned 180° the rudder was eased
and the ship steadied on her course as usual. An observer at the
rudder had observed the exact rudder angle and although it was
not exactly standard half rudder, the helm was not changed after
the turn was once started. The throttle was not changed during


  p. 1720 (#652)                      #

of
Turring Circles
U.S.S.Maryland.
Ships head 90
Tine 0-00
I pudder 184 Right @ 007
Wind 500" force 1-2
Sea calm.
210*
------
---
ter geen
PSpar
p Spar
Ships kecd09
toong
are o_ees
0-
on 270
Ships need 80
Time 0-0
(Ruador 171 Lefta 0-0%


  p. 1721 (#653)                      #

1925)
1721
Retardation of Ships' Speed
Angeles, Washington, as directed by Commander Battleship Divi-
sions, Battle Fleet, in an effort to ascertain something concerning
the ship's retardation on turns. A brief description of the method
used in obtaining the data and the results observed, together with a
plot of turns made, follow.
A spar weighted to float at the mean draft of the ship was put
over to afford a reference point for observations. The spar so
weighted and floating freely in the same water as the ship auto-
matically compensated for any set and drift of current which might
affect the ship's turning. The wind was 300° (true) but was so
light as not to affect the turning of a ship of this type. In order
not to be wholly dependent on the reading of a short range base
range finder two officers with stadimeters were sent in a pulling
boat with instructions to keep as close as possible to the spar
without actually touching it or affecting its drift by the movement
of their boat. Stadimeter readings were taken on the foremast of
the ship and range finder readings on spar were taken from the
bridge, so that not more than ten yards difference in ranges from
ship to boat and from boat to ship should have occurred. A time
signal was arranged whereby observers in the boat could start
stop watches simultaneously with watches on board ship; signals
were also arranged so that ranges could be taken from the boat
and the ship simultaneously. In the accompanying plot of turns,
positions by stadimeter from the boat are marked by small crosses,
and range finder positions are marked by circles.
The ship made the approach on the spar from a distance of
over two miles to insure a steady course and speed at the com-
mencement of the turn. When the ship reached a point such that.
the turning circle would circle the buoy, the order was given,
“Right Standard Half Rudder"-watches were started, the time
signal executed and a range and bearing were taken on the spar.
At each 10° change of course an observer stationed at the steering
gyro repeater sang out "Mark," time was noted, boat was signalled
to take stadimeter reading and range and bearing were taken from
the ship. When the ship had turned 180° the rudder was eased
and the ship steadied on her course as usual. An observer at the
rudder had observed the exact rudder angle and although it was
not exactly standard half rudder, the helm was not changed after
the turn was once started. The throttle was not changed during


  p. 1722 (#654)                      #

1722
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
the turn and revolution counter readings were taken every thirty
seconds.
The same procedure was repeated in a turn to port. The ranges
and bearings taken were plotted to scale on coordinate paper. In
cases where times of ranges from ship and boat were not identical,
interpolation was done for bearing at the time of boat range. A
curve was faired through points thus obtained giving equal weight
to boat and ship ranges. The accompanying plots of turns are
copies of those submitted by the commanding officer to the Chief
of Naval Operations.
From the curves plotted and times of each 10° change of ship's
head the following interesting results are obtained :
a) Very little retardation seems to occur in the first 10° change
of course and each succeeding 10° shows an increasing amount of
slowing, up to 70°, from which point the retardation falls off, and
after 90° the speed is almost steady.
b) Practically the entire retardation takes place in the first 90°
of the turn.
c) Speed of approach was 12.4 knots, speed at completion of
turn 9.5 knots, or a total retardation of 2.9 knots, or twenty-three
per cent of the total original speed.
d) This vessel apparently turns more sharply and rapidly to
port than to starboard.
e) The retardation in turns to port and starboard are approxi-
mately the same.
f) The curves check the original tactical data of the ship very
closely, except that for turns of over 90°, the ship appears to trans-
fer less to port and more to starboard than the original tactical
data indicates.
It seems that the above observations fully warrant more com-
plete investigation of the subject of retardation and it is submitted
that this feature of the study of speed should be given due con-
sideration in the future.


  p. 1723 (#655)                      #

DISCUSSION
Star Identification Diagram
Midshipman (now Ensign) L. H. Burkhead and Midshipman (now Ensign)
W. H. BENSON
(See page 1667, September, 1925, PROCEEDINGS)
G. W. LITTLEHALES.—The present Star Identification Diagram comprises
essentially the meridians of a stereographic meridian-projection of the
celestial sphere, and the procedure for its use described in the article by the
authors of the diagram depends upon the application of the principles of the
stereographic projection to the transformation of spherical coordinates.
In Fig. 1, let us suppose that the full lines, consisting of a system of
great circles and parallels on the stereographic projection, with C and D
as the poles of the latter, have served to project the points L and M, the
coordinates of which are given. Let us
suppose, further, that L is one of the poles
of a similar set of great circles represented
by the dashed lines and that to this system
of dashed lines, which serve for the
measurement of another system of spherical
coordinates, the point M is to be referred
for the solution of the problem. To make
the explanation more practical, let us assume
first, that the full lines consist of hour
circles and parallels of declination, the
primitive or bounding circle being the
meridian of the observer, C the elevated
FIGURE I
celestial pole, and that having the hour angle
and declination of a celestial body given, we have projected its place, M,
upon the figure; second, that L is the zenith, the dashed lines vertical circles
and parallels of altitude, and that we require the azimuth and altitude of
the body at M.
If the graduation of the primitive and of the dashed-line diameter or
horizon GH were properly numbered we should simply have to note the
parallel of altitude and the azimuth circle passing through the point M,
follow one to the primitive and the other to the horizon, and take readings,
in order to find the altitude and the azimuth of the body, that is to say, the
coordinates of the point M, according to the system of coordinates measured
by the dashed lines. So long as the relative positions of the two points
L and C remained the same such a figure would serve for the solution of


  p. 1724 (#656)                      #

1724
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
similar problems involving any other position of an interior point M; but,
since the relative positions of L and C are constantly changing in practice,
no two sets of lines similar to those of the figure, and printed upon a single
sheet, can be of universal application in the manner described.
To meet the requirements of general application, Chauvenet combined two
identical stereographic projections, one fixed and the other transparent, and
designed to rotate concentrically with the first so that the relation of the
zenith to the elevated pole could be readily set. In the "Graphical Method
for Navigators,” published in the PROCEEDINGS of the Naval Institute,
Vol. XI, No. 2, 1885, whole No. 33, Sigsbee showed how to adapt the fixed
one of these projections to serve the purpose of both systems for all positions
of L and M.
The position of M, with respect to the dashed lines, is defined by its
position relative to the points L and O. Since the two systems of lines
are similar, if we transfer M to M' so that M' shall have the same position
with respect to C and O that M has with respect to L and O, then M'
will have the same relation to the full lines that M has to the dashed lines,
and we may therefore let M' represent M, and the system of full lines, in
connection therewith, represent the system of dashed lines. Briefly, then,
the method is to assume, first, that the full lines represent a system of
spherical coordinates to correspond with the given data, and then to project
L and M; next, to transfer M to M', and then to assume that the same
lines represent another system of spherical coordinates, to which it is
necessary to refer to M' for a solution.
The following elementary, graphical process forms the basis of solutions.
Having projected on the diagram two points, as L and M, given in position,
one upon the primitive or bounding circle, and the other within, conceive a
sector, LOG, whose radii, OL and OG, shall include these points. Con-
ceive the imaginary sector to be revolved about 0 until L coincides with
some other given point upon the primitive, as C; then find M', the revolved
position of M. The radii need never be drawn.
There are various ways of finding M'. Since, in principle, one case em-
braces all, let it be required to revolve the sector LOG about 0 and L
coincides with C and find M'. Since L will traverse the arc LC, the point
G will traverse and equal arc GB.
Lay a piece of tracing paper upon the diagram and trace the points
L, O, and M. Revolve the tracing about 0 until L coincides with C; the
traced point M will fall at M'.
In performing this transformation of spherical or astronomical co-
ordinates, the angular amount of the revolution performed about the
central point of the meridian stereographic projection is expressed by the
value of the co-latitude. This will appear from a consideration of the
transformation of coordinates as a direct, visual solution of the astronomical
triangle effected in the manner about to be explained.


  p. 1725 (#657)                      #

1925]
1725
Discussion
In Fig. 2, if the latitude of the observer be laid off along the bounding
meridian at L, and the declination of the observed celestial body be laid off
at M along a meridian making an angle with the bounding meridian equal
to the hour-angle of the observed celestial
body, an astronomical triangle will be
formed in which the known parts are the
two sides CL and CM, representing re-..
spectively the co-latitude and co-declination,
and their included angle LCM, which is the
hour-angle of the observed celestial body.
Two of the unknown parts of this triangle
are the azimuth, CLM, and the co-altitude,
LM, of the observed celestial body. If the
triangle CLM, were revolved about the
central point of the projection, with the side,
CL, kept in coincidence with the bounding
FIGURE 2
meridian until the point L is brought to the
position of the point C, the latter would then occupy the position P, and the
point M would fall at M', so that the unknown side of the triangle, repre-
senting the co-altitude, would lie along some meridian, and could be measured
from the graduation of the projection, and the unknown angle, representing
the azimuth, would become an included angle between two meridians, which
could likewise be measured from the graduations of the projection; and
thus the altitude and azimuth of any observed celestial body could be
simultaneously determined from the diagram with any degree of precision
that the scale of the projection might permit. In the more recent designs,
to obviate the necessity for actual revolution of the triangle, a series of
equally spaced concentric circumferences and a series of equally spaced
radial lines have been drawn over the projection in lines of dashes. For the
purposes of designation, the overlaid system of concentric circumferences
is numbered serially from the center of the projection outward to the
bounding meridian, and the radials are also marked by numbers indicating
their angular distance in minutes of arc reckoned in a counter-clockwise
direction from some fixed origin, like the line OD; so that, having plotted
the declination and hour-angle of the observed celestial body at M, it is
only necessary to note the number of the circumference and the number of
the radial which pass through this position, and then, adding the co-latitude
expressed in minutes to the number of the radial, find the intersection, M',
of the noted circumference with the radial whose number is the sum just
found, and read off from the graduated arcs of the projection the altitude
and azimuth of the point of intersection. Likewise, when the altitude of
a star is measured, if its compass bearing be observed and the approximate
true azimuth be obtained by correcting the bearing for the variation and
deviation of the compass, the identity of the star may at once be ascertained
by reversing the order of proceeding that has been described for finding
the altitude and azimuth from the declination and hour-angle—that is, having


  p. 1726 (#658)                      #

1726
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
plotted the corrected altitude of the star on the meridian of the projection
which makes an angle with the left-hand bounding meridian equal to the
star's azimuth counted from the elaborated pole, note the number of the
radial and the number of the circumference that pass through the point so
plotted, and, having subtracted the co-latitude of the place of observation
expressed in minutes from the number of the noted radial, find the inter-
section of the noted circumference with radial whose number is the re-
mainder thus found by subtraction, and read from the graduations of the
projection the declination of this point and its hour-angle from the left-
hand bounding meridian. The hour-angle of the observed star thus found
must be converted into right ascension. Then scan the star tables of the
Nautical Almanac and find the name of the star whose tabulated righ
ascension and declination come nearest to the values of the right ascension
declination that have been deduced.
Divesting their projection of the system of parallels which usually
accompanied the meridians or vertical circles, and of the radials of the
overlaid system circumferences and radials, Burkhead and Benson have
accomplished the procedure, which has been described for the transforma-
tion of coordinates or solution of the astronomical triangle, by resorting
to the necessary construction on the projection to supply the parts which are
dispensed with in their Star Identification Diagram, thus securing more
clearness in the diagram by performing more construction in the solutions.
To the extent of refinement with which the primitive or bounding circle
of the diagram is divided, the missing radials may readily be supplied, as
occasion requires, by drawing radii from the central point, O, to the
graduations of the primitive; and the required
point of the missing parallel is found, as illus-
trated in Fig. 3, by recourse to that principle
of the stereographic projection which teaches
that a required point on a parallel will be
found where the given meridian through the
point is cut by a straight line drawn from
the point on the primitive marking the latitude
of the parallel to a point on the equator 90°
of longitude from the given meridian.
It is the application of such principles, show-
FIGURE 3
ing an insight into the stereographic projection
and resulting in a convenient numbering of
the graduations of the equator and of the primitive for the conversion of
hour and minutes into units of space, that lends interest and merit to the
present production.


  p. 1727 (#659)                      #

1925]
1727
Discussion
Why Change the Organization of the Navy Department
(See page 357, March, 1925, PROCEEDINGS)
COMMANDER JOHN N. JORDAN, (SC), U. S. Navy. It is easy to say
what is, is right, and let it go at that. But, in nautical terms, to rest on
your oars and let the boat drift, only to realize later that you have lost
your headway and that some current or breeze is setting you on the rocks,
is not good seamanship. A long pull and a strong pull together keep up
the speed and hold the boat to its directed course. The advantage must be
taken of the favorable currents and a careful lookout kept to avoid danger
and the forces that may have a bad effect on the speed and course of the
vessel.
These seafaring platitudes are well known, and their application in our
daily life goes with our progress as a nation. To apply them to our Navy
with a view to crystallizing thought and making officers and men of the
naval service and others think on our present administrative organization
and the welfare of the Navy is a matter of general interest and special
study.
The present course set for the Navy since the conclusion of the Treaty
Limiting Naval Armaments is well laid, as evidenced by the general approval
given to it by the country and the appropriations made by Congress. The
spirit of the Navy and the interest taken both from within and from
without have been revived and enhanced since the adoption of a published
policy to meet the conditions of the new era on which the United States has
entered since the war as a world power.
The question now arises: With the personnel, ships and shore stations
allowed and the money provided by Congress, is the Navy Department able
to carry out the policy adopted with its present administrative organization
and detailed methods in use in an efficient manner?
The present organization of the Navy Department is a development based
on the principle of authority and responsibility as required by expansion,
experience, and invention to meet the needs of the service today and the
naval warfare of the future. The expansion has been based on economic
conditions of the capacity and skill of individuals to perform repeated or
specialized tasks efficiently. The experience has been gained by a study of
the result of individual effort applied to actual conditions. Invention, the
result of original thought, and the ingenuity of individuals, has changed the
material conditions of life and property so decidedly that the organization
has had to conform to the improved material and better social conditions of
the day.
The scientific development of the Navy's personnel organization has,
therefore, resulted in a natural division of the duties and service required
by the conditions created from time to time since the beginning of the
Navy. This development is at present represented by the line of the Navy
as detailed for the many duties for which it is qualified and by the staff
corps as provided for the special service rendered by these several corps.


  p. 1728 (#660)                      #

1728
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
There is, of necessity, a considerable interchange of duty between the
line and the staff corps on account of special experience and knowledge
gained through the service of individuals, which provides for the coordina-
tion of the many activities and special services rendered for and by the Navy
as a whole.
The authority and course of events leading up to the establishment and
organization of the Navy Department is clearly set forth in the Constitution,
Revised Statutes, Navy Regulations, General Orders and Instructions issued
by proper authority for the guidance of the naval service.
The following is a general outline of the history of creation of the Navy
Department, its organization and the effect of the above-mentioned docu-
ments as given in opinions rendered by the U. S. Attorney General, taken
from the compilation of the laws relating to the Navy, Navy Department,
and Marine Corps, which was prepared by Mr. George Melling, attorney
in the office of the Judge Advocate General, by authority of the Secretary
of the Navy pursuant to a resolution of the United States Senate.
In order to carry out the purpose of the government of the United States
expressed in the preamble of the Constitution, as adopted on March 4,
1789, Clause 13. Section 3, Article 1 of the Constitution reads, “To provide
and maintain a Navy.” By the Acts of August 7, 1789, the Department of
War was established, and the Secretary of War was required to perform
the duties relative to the military and naval affairs. During the adminis-
tration of John Adams, when the magnitude of our commerce and im-
portance of our maritime relations induced the government to pay more
attention to the military marine, Congress, by the Act of April 30, 1798.
established the Department of the Navy. The head of the Department was
to be called the Secretary of the Navy, whose duty it should be to execute
such orders as might be received from the President relative to the pro-
curement of naval stores and materials, and the construction, armament,
equipment, and employment of vessels of war, as well as to all other
matters connected with the naval establishment of the United States. It
was to be established at the seat of government, and the Department, with
its bureaus or offices, is, in the contemplation of the law, an establishment
distinct from the branches of the public service and the offices thereof which
are under its supervision.
The Revised Statutes provide that the business of the Department of the
Navy shall be distributed in such manner as the Secretary of the Navy
shall judge to be expedient and proper among the bureaus. The several
bureaus that have been provided for under a chief of bureau or other
officer, from time to time since the establishment of the Department of the
Navy are as follows: Bureau of Yards and Docks, Bureau of Equipment
and Recruiting (the Naval Appropriation Acts for the fiscal years 1911-14
provided for the distribution of the duties, funds, and employees of the
Bureau of Equipment among the other bureaus and offices of the Navy
Department, and the Bureau of Equipment was abolished by the Act of
June 30, 1914), Bureau of Navigation, Bureau of Ordnance, Bureau of


  p. 1729 (#661)                      #

19251
1729
Discussion
Construction and Repair, Bureau of Steam Engineering, Bureau of Pro-
visions and Clothing (changed by the Act of July 19, 1892, to the Bureau
of Supplies and Accounts), Bureau of Medicine and Surgery, Bureau of
Aeronautics. The office of the Judge Advocate General of the Navy, while
simply designated as an office, is one of the coordinate branches of the
Navy Department, with responsibilities of no less importance than those of
the chief of bureaus. Other boards, commissions, councils, and offices have
been authorized by law and in accordance with the Appropriation Acts to
perform certain specific duties as required by the increasing numbers or size
of the activities of the Navy Department.
Congress, in making appropriations for the naval service, recognizes the
distribution of duties as made by the Secretary of the Navy. In the appro-
priation acts the moneys appropriated for expenses are placed under the
heading of the different bureaus in conformity with the Revised Statutes.
While, therefore, it is within the authority of the Secretary of the Navy
to make any changes in the distribution of business that may seem to him
expedient and proper, such authority must be exercised so as not to conflict
with any Act of Congress.
The work of the Navy Department may be grouped under general
divisions, each of which may include different bureaus, and in each division
the Secretary of the Navy may detail an officer of the Navy as an “aide” to
advise the Secretary on all matters pertaining to the duties of the division
and to transmit orders of the Secretary to the various chiefs of bureaus
and to other subordinates of the Department, signing such orders "by
direction of the Secretary of the Navy." However, such aides cannot,
individually or collectively, exercise any supervisory authority over the
chiefs of bureaus.
By Change No. 6 in the Navy Regulations dated November 18, 1909, there
were established the following aides as advisers to the Secretary of the
Navy: “Aide for Personnel," "Aide for Operations," "Aide for Material,"
and "Aide for Inspections." In view of the conflict of authority or assumed
authority between the new departments and the bureaus, this super-depart-
mental organization did not function with success, nor did it have the sanction
and backing of congressional action. The several offices were abolished by
a change in the Navy Regulations dated July 15, 1915.
It is apparently beyond the power of the Secretary of the Navy to create
new bureaus or offices and appoint new officers to perform the business of
the Department, other than those previously authorized by law, as indicated
by the opinion of the Attorney General rendered on October 27, 1909.
The present law, contained in the Act of July 11, 1890, provides for an
assistant secretary to be appointed from civil life by the President, to
perform such duties as may be prescribed by the Secretary of the Navy as
required by law. The Chief of Operations, authorized by Act of March 3,
1915, as amended by the Act of August 29, 1916, is charged, under the
direction of the Secretary of the Navy, with the operations of the feet and
with the preparation and readiness of plans for its use in war, and is to


  p. 1730 (#662)                      #

1730
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
succeed to duties of the Secretary of the Navy during the temporary
absence of the Secretary and the Assistant Secretary.
The bureaus of the Department are, in effect, authorized under the pro
visions of the law providing for the manner of appointment of the chieís
of the several bureaus, who are, by their appointment and duties, officers
of the Department and advisers to the Secretary of the Navy, in addition
to their status as commissioned officers in the naval service.
The Statutes give full authority to the heads of the various bureaus and
to the acting heads thereof, when properly designated, to issue under
authority of the Secretary of the Navy all orders pertaining to the business
of their respective bureaus with the same force and effect as though the
orders were issued by the Secretary himself.
Congress, in making legislation providing for the establishment of the
executive departments, has not attempted to regulate by statute the minute
movements of every part of the complicated machinery of government. It
has, however, in making appropriations, required certain duties and services
to be performed by specific branches of ihe departmental organization. By
a study of the Statutes, it will be noted that, in general, the existing law
provides for the agency to be established to carry on the business of the
Department, except for certain restrictions placed on the employment of
personnel of the naval establishment and the specific duties required of
the Bureau of Supplies and Accounts in the accounting to be made for
property and for the expenditures of money.
So much for the general outline of the organization of the Navy Depart-
ment as it exists today under the provisions of law and regulations affecting
it, with its civilian secretary and assistant secretary, chief of operations and
the chiefs of bureaus, boards and offices. Under this organization, the
Navy has developed and the country has received the benefits of the service
rendered in peace and war. During the World War the successful adminis-
tration of the naval service was carried on with the enormous increases in
personnel, ships and activities, which, under any other organization, might
have completely failed under such conditions. It has met the changing con-
ditions of modern times, and is today a leader in scientific development.
What better recommendation can a service have than the acknowledgment
of success gained by it in accomplishing results.
The details of organization are always subject to change, and it is to the
credit of the service at large that initiative and endeavor have never been
condemned or set aside when properly directed.
Subordinate to the policy outlined by the President of the United States
to Congress each year, together with a report of the condition of national
affairs, the Secretary of the Navy reports on the service rendered by, and
the condition of, the Navy, together with his recommendation for its develop-
ment as one of the arms of the national defense. Among other reports
made by the Secretary of the Navy to Congress, there is a complete state-
ment of the appropriations of the Navy, showing the amount appropriated
under each specific head of appropriation, the amount expended under each


  p. 1731 (#663)                      #

1925]
1731
Discussion
head, and the balance which, on June 30 preceding such report, remained
unexpended, with the probable demands which may remain under each
appropriation.
In submitting estimates to carry out the policies of the government, and
the recommendations of the Secretary of the Navy as to the construction,
armament, equipment, and employment of vessels of war, as well as all
other matters connected with the naval establishment, a very careful and
detailed analysis is made of the money required to obtain the desired result.
Since the adoption of the National Budget System by the Budget Act
of 1921, all executive departments and agencies are required, in order to
secure greater economy and efficiency in the conduct of public service,
to submit their estimates of expenditures and appropriations necessary for
the support of the Department for the ensuing fiscal year, to the President
via the Bureau of the Budget. The Bureau of the Budget, when directed
by the President, is required to make a detailed study of the departments
and establishments for the purpose of enabling the President to determine
what changes should be made in (1) the existing organization, activities,
and methods of business of such departments or establishments, (2) the
appropriations therefor, (3) the assignment of particular activities to
particular services, or (4) the regrouping of services.
The head of each department and establishment is required to designate
an official thereof as a budget officer therefor, who, in each year, under his
direction, on or before a date fixed by him, shall prepare the departmental
estimates.
The law provides that the chiefs of the several bureaus shall furnish
to the Secretary of the Navy estimates for specific, general, and contingent
expenses of the Department and of the several bureaus. The arrangement
and order of the estimates are to be the same as provided for in the
appropriation acts for the preceding year. Any changes therein, and
transfers of salaries from one office or bureau to another office or bureau,
or consolidation of offices or bureaus desired by the head of the department,
may be indicated by a note in the estimates. The estimates for expenditures
required by the Navy Department for certain purposes must be given in
detail.
In appropriating money for the naval service, Congress makes a very
careful study of the amounts appropriated and the expenditures made for
the preceding year. The subcommittee of the House of Representatives
Committee on Appropriations conducts hearings, attended by the Secretary
of the Navy, the Assistant Secretary of the Navy, the Chief of Naval
Operations, the chiefs of bureaus, and other officers cognizant of the con-
dition of the business and funds required for the proper administration of
the many different activities coming under the naval establishment. These
hearings are supplemented by statements, recommendations, and full and
complete data, to provide the committee and Congress with information on
which to base their subsequent action in appropriating funds for the naval
service.


  p. 1732 (#664)                      #

1732
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
On the estimates made, supported by the detailed facts and information,
the committee is able to approve or disapprove the policy and appropriate
the funds required, with an assurance and confidence that the money is
needed and will be expended as provided. The annual appropriation for the
naval service for the fiscal year 1926 approximates three hundred million
dollars. The detail in which the appropriations are made clearly indicates
that the committee has taken into consideration detailed and specific knowl-
edge with reference to the expenditures affecting nearly every activity and
unit of the naval service.
It is to be noted here that in the above procedure the legislative body
has direct control over the initiation and approval of expenditures for the
Navy. Further action taken on naval appropriations by the Senate and
the approval given by the President to Acts of Congress are additional
controlling factors and have their effect in adding to or reducing the ex-
penditures originated in the House of Representatives.
The direct investigation made by the House Committee on Appropriations
of the service rendered by the many activities of the naval establishment
tends to simplify the administration of naval expenditures. The simplicity
of an organization depends on the physical ability and mental capacity of the
individuals personally to perform the service, or to produce a product as
time and circumstances will permit. It is believed that the representatives
of the people gain and exert a personal influence on the conduct of the
naval administration through their knowledge of the conditions as they exist
in the service.
The general comment or criticism which arises from time to time, due
to an effort to simplify and provide for more efficient methods in naval
administration, contemplates the grouping of the several bureaus charged
with the duty of the material maintenance and operation of ships afloat
and shore establishments under one head or bureau. Under this organization
there would be one appropriation under the control of such a bureau or
head.
Is it possible to conceive that the Appropriation Committees of Congress
would consider appropriating one or a reduced number of appropriations
without obtaining information as to the manner in which the funds were to
be expended? In order to secure information as to the use made of the
money provided for the service rendered and material and property obtained,
a systematic accounting is required.
In the appropriation acts by Congress it has been provided that the
Bureau of Supplies and Accounts shall keep the money accounts of the
naval establishment so as to show the direct and indirect charges in the
cost of work at industrial navy yards, and report them annually for the
information of Congress. It is also required to report annually to the
Secretary of the Navy all receipts and expenditures. The Bureau of
Supplies and Accounts is also required to report annually to Congress the
money value of the supplies on hand, supplies purchased and expended
during the year, and the balances remaining.


  p. 1733 (#665)                      #

1925)
1733
Discussion
Criticism is often made of the existing appropriation system in view of
the fact that funds provided under one appropriation cannot be transferred
from one appropriation to another. This situation, though at times working
to the disadvantage of the service to be rendered by an activity or unit of
the organization, affords a certain control over the expenditure of money
provided. This control is not only maintained by Congress under the
Appropriation Acts, but is also used and applied by the departmental organi-
zation to its field activities, consisting of shore stations and the ships afloat.
To a certain extent the difficulties that may be met by the possible
exhaustion of appropriation are overcome by the continuing appropriations
under which funds are usually provided in excess of the amounts required
during the fiscal year. The Naval Supply Account Fund is also provided
for the purchase of materials to be maintained as a stock of material for
general service use and chargeable to the current annual and other appropria-
tions when expended.
A provision might be made in making annual appropriations for a limited
additional amount to be carried over into the succeeding fiscal year to
provide for such contingencies as may arise where the service authorized
cannot be carried on because of the lack of funds. The conditions or
limitations under which such an additional appropriation might be provided
are numerous and practical of operation. Such an arrangement, however,
should not be made so that appropriations are transferable, as the accounting
under such conditions would be involved and impracticable, and subject to
constant controversy.
It has also been contended that, under the present organization of the
Navy Department, through the chiefs of bureaus there is not a unified
control over the expenditures of funds.
While it is necessary for the bureaus to require a control over the use
of funds in the field service, and the use of such funds is best understood
by those who are responsible for the service rendered by the major divisions
of the Navy Department, there is at present a close cooperation and inter-
change of information with reference to the use to be made of the funds
and the activities of the different bureaus, offices, or divisions concerned.
If any question arises as to the use of one appropriation as affecting several
appropriations, the Secretary of the Navy is well equipped by advisers,
consisting of the chiefs of bureaus and the budget officer, to decide on the
use to be made of the money, in accordance with the needs of the service.
As to the detailed methods of accounting for expenditures and the in-
formation required for the proper recording of the funds provided, the
responsibility of the Bureau of Supplies and Accounts is clearly defined by
law. The improvement of the detailed methods requires no reorganization
of the Navy Department.
Any accounting system is subject to the influences and desires of those
who wish to show or report expenditures as they think they should be made.
Undoubtedly, the best thought of the Department has been applied and
given to work out an accounting system both for appropriation and cost


  p. 1734 (#666)                      #

1734
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
accounting that will provide information required by Congress and for
administrative purposes. The fairest criticism to be made of the account-
ing system is that it is too detailed and too much is expected of it as a
panacea for all ills of the Navy Department and the industrial establish-
ments of its shore stations. Only by placing more responsibility on the
bureaus, and especially on the Bureau of Supplies and Accounts, to produce
the information desired and the reports required on current allotments and
expenditures, can the administration of appropriation expenditures be
handled in a more satisfactory manner.
The American people are blessed with a spirit of initiative, ingenuity,
and a willingness to try the latest development in all of the branches of
the arts and sciences. The Navy has been loaded down with the results of
modern invention and methods of organization. Every effort should be
made to reduce the number and complexity of these improvements along
the lines of bare necessity and simplicity. So far as possible, the adminis-
trative organization of the Navy Department should be continued along the
lines of the original organization, based on the major divisions of the service
to be rendered by the personnel of the service.
Diesel Engines for Capital Ships—A Military Necessity
(See page 1217, July, 1925, PROCEEDINGS)
COMMANDER R. A. THEOBALD, U. S. Navy.—The article “Diesel Engines
for Capital Ships—A Military Necessity," by Captain A. M. Proctor, which
appeared in the July issue of the Institute PROCEEDINGS should serve the
purpose of starting discussion .concerning the practicability of such main
motive power for future captital ships. All such discussions must be
beneficial. The ultimate result may be that the marine engineers of this
country, after years of research, may evolve a Diesel engine of sufficient
power and sufficient ruggedness to meet what may well become an insistent
military demand for such propulsive machinery for capital ships.
Accepting the figures as to the economic operation of the Diesel engine
plant, and comparing those figures with known fuel expenditures for
present installations, there is no contradicting Captain Proctor's contention
that the Diesel engine installation (if and when rendered capable of utiliza-
tion for capital ship propulsion) is, indeed, a military necessity. With these
figures before us, it is not necessary to enlarge at great length on the
obvious logistic advantage that would result in any oversea naval compaign,
when Diesel engine development enables the Navy to use this type as out-
lined in the article.
In this connection, recent experiments on the Aorangi, a Diesel engined
23,000-ton passenger liner, are a matter of considerable interest. The ship is
driven by four Sulzer, two cycle, six cylinder engines on four propeller
shafts ; each engine has a continuous rate of 3,200 shaft h.p. with a maximum
two-hour rating of 3,800 shaft h.p. The Aorangi steamed continuously for
1,600 miles at an average of 17.91 knots, developing an average shaft horse-


  p. 1735 (#667)                      #

1925]
1735
Discussion
power of 12,200, at an average of 123 revolutions per minute. The fuel
capacity is 3,000 tons. If this fuel capacity was increased to the 5,000-ton
capacity, which is made the basis of Captain Proctor's article, the ship would
have had a cruising radius at 17.91 knots of about 45,000 miles.
This brings us to the question of whether or not the Diesel engine is
sufficiently developed to be seriously considered at the present writing for
the purpose of capital ship propulsion. It is true that the M. A. N.
Company, of Germany, prior to the World War, developed a six cylinder
engine, 2,000 brake h.p. per cylinder. Further, a test with a single cylinder
engine, according to the chief engineer of that company, enabled them to
prove by prolonged operation and continually increasing loads, that this
single cylinder engine was capable of operating at 145 revolutions a minute
with a brake h. p. of 3,200. However, this development in Diesel engines
in Germany by the M. A. N. Company, was the result of definite support
by the German Admiralty, with the definite goal established by the German
naval authorities of producing an engine of 2,000 or more brake h.p. per
cylinder. To date, there has been no such urge in this country, and it is a
significant fact at the present time that the American built Diesel engine
produces a maximum of about 750 brake h.p. per cylinder.
This fact is significant when we consider the history of electric drive
installation on board our capital ships. It was years after the electric
power plants on shore were handling loads well in excess of those demanded
by marine propulsion before consideration was given to installation of this
power for large ship marine propulsion. It seems reasonable to expect that
a similar situation must arise in the Diesel engineering field before the
Diesel engine would be seriously considered in similar manner. In other
words, very large Diesel engine power plants must be an established fact
in the mechanical engineering field of this country before we may expect
the engineers of the Navy to give serious consideration to this engine for
capital ship propulsion. The large Diesel engine must have thoroughly
established its reliability.
Recognizing the military advantage of electrical propulsion, it is wondered
why no suggestion of a possible Diesel electric installation was made in
this article.
In view of the present development of the Diesel engine, it is highly
probable that few if any will agree with the statement contained in the
final paragraph of Captain Proctor's article. This positive statement, how-
ever, should serve to enliven the resulting discussion.
Diesel Engines
(See page 1217, July, 1925, PROCEEDINGS)
LIEUTENANT COMMANDER H. Gibson, U. S. Navy.—The article “Diesel
Engines for Capital Ships—A Military Necessity,” by Captain A. M.
Proctor, U. S. N., is, from a theoretical point of view, undoubtedly correct.
There are, however, many practical considerations in constructing such an


  p. 1736 (#668)                      #

1736
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
engine which would have to be met, and at the present state of the Diesel
engineering art are still experimental and untried. There are also many
necessary features in the development of a large Diesel engine for capital
ships which are not required for the development of large Diesel engines
for commercial use. Conditions are not the same, and cannot be considered
as one and the same problem. The military requirements of a Diesel
engine installation in a capital ship must naturally subject itself to the
structural conditions of the spaces allowed in the ship and the necessary
subdivisions of the ship's hull to afford the maximum water-tight integrity.
These conditions impose difficulties which are not met in a merchant ship
or in the commercial field. These naval requirements of necessity divide
the problem of Diesel propulsion for capital ships into two classes or types:
namely, the large, slow-speed Diesel with the multiple cylinder type up to
possibly twelve cylinders, direct driven on the propeller shaft, the other
type being the light, high-speed Diesel, driven through reduction gears or
electric drive. Both schemes, of course, have advantages and disadvantages,
but the merits of each scheme will have to be seriously considered to meet
the conditions of the particular problem.
There is no question but that the future will develop a Diesel engine
for naval use in capital ships and the nation which first successfully de-
velops such an installation will have a decided military advantage over any
nation with capital ships driven by steam motive power.
As stated above, requirements of a Diesel driven capital ship are not the
same as in the commercial field and it seems unreasonable, particularly in
this country, to expect commercial firms to develop a Diesel engine meeting
these special requirements when there is no particular need for such a type
of engine in the commercial field. The statement of Captain Proctor, that
development of such an engine must be undertaken by a government agency,
is absolutely sound and if this government considers seriously the question
of driving capital ships by Diesel engines, it will be necessary for the govern-
ment to finance experimental development work for such an engine. Pro-
gress made in the development of Diesel engines has been such as to give
every reason to believe that such an engine can be developed and will be
developed, but, as stated in the above article, such experimenting will justify
all of the money, time and energy expended.
“Diesel” Engines for Capital Ships—A Military Necessity
(See page 1217, July, 1925, PROCEEDINGS)
COMMANDER P. H. HAMMOND, U. S. Navy.—Undoubtedly, the statement
made in the opening paragraph of Captain Proctor's article on the Diesel
engine, as regards the cruising radius of ships engined with Diesels, is true;
but there is the danger of losing sight of perhaps more desirable features in
the engines of warships, in striving for economy in itself. Reliability
is more to be desired in warship propulsion than economy of operation
From the experience in the United States Navy the Diesel engine does not
compare with the steam turbine in reliability.


  p. 1737 (#669)                      #

1925)
1737
Discussion
Due to keenest competition in commercial service over practically all of
the trade routes of the world, the Diesel engine has received an enormous
increase in application to the types of ships suited for the service. The cost
of fuel oil has gone up so that even though operating at a higher efficiency
(using the Diesel engine) than possible in any type of steam plant, the cost
of operation (fuel) is greater than fifteen years ago.
The number of passengers carried on the transatlantic routes due to
restricted immigration to the United States has dropped off to such an extent
that reduction in operating cost is imperative. The Diesel engine is an
excellent solution to the problem of the comparatively low powered shipthe
type that has carried and carries today the bulk of the world's commerce.
There is the danger of losing sight of the desiderata of warship propulsion
in trying to fit the more economical type of engine to naval use.
Diesel engines at present do not use a low grade fuel oil as satisfactorily
as can be burned in marine boilers, and the Navy will find it necessary to
accept the poorer grades of fuel oil more and more, as the demands for the
better refined oils become greater in the industrial world.
Even with the enormous incentive to use the most economical methods
of propulsion-where economy is placed first on the builders' and operators'
end to be attained—the greatest power yet produced for marine installation
is some 30,000 horsepower (Motor Ship Aorangi 24,000 I.H.P.).
The details of the installation given in Captain Proctor's article in com-
parison to the steam installation on the U. S. S. Oklahoma need not be
discussed here, except, perhaps, in one or two particulars. In submarine
service the reduction in weight is more imperative than in other marine
installation: to this fact may be attributed the unreliability of our sub-
marine engines, or at least the unreliability of the earlier types. This
question of weight must be kept in mind in the design of larger marine
engines. To get the utmost reliability in the Diesel engine the weight per
horsepower cannot be reduced to as low a figure as is desirable. The weight
of machinery (Diesel type), in the comparison with weight of machinery in
the high pressure turbine installation as proposed by Sir Charles Parsons,*
is fifty per cent greater in the former than in the latter.
Warship design requires that, when necessary, the engines be operated
at, or near, full power as long as the fuel lasts. This is where the ships
with reciprocating engines operating with the grand feet during the World
War were at a great disadvantage. In similar circumstances the Diesel
engines would not experience boiler trouble, but it is safest to design on the
assumption that the engines must be run at high power for long periods
rather than otherwise.
In conclusion, Captain Proctor mentions the development of the Diesel
engine by the government rather than by private firms. Many of the
largest concerns, both in this country and abroad, are spending large sums
on the development of the internal combustion engine. All types of heavy
oil engines are being investigated. The driving incentive of keen competition
* (Marine Engineering and Shipping Age of May, 1925.)


  p. 1738 (#670)                      #

1738
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
to produce the most reliable and economical engine is behind the investiga-
tions. No doubt in a few years an outstanding type of engine, as regards
the cycle and other characteristics, will be evolved. Until such time,
particularly with regard to the limited funds available, it would seem
wiser to develop the Diesel engine for smaller ships and submarines rather
than for capital ships.
At present the theoretical promises of the Diesel engine are most alluring
but the lessons of past experience should be kept in mind in its application
to naval use. It is not believed that there is at present any type of heavy
oil engine suitable for use in capital ships.
Diesel Engines for Capital Vessels—A Military Necessity
(See page 1217, July, 1925, PROCEEDINGS)
COMMANDER H. C. DINGER, U. S. Navy.-Captain Proctor's presentation
of the possibility of employing Diesel engines for capital vessels is most
interesting and this paper will no doubt bring to the fore the possibilities
of securing materially greater cruising radius for capital vessels. The use
of Diesel engines will no doubt double the cruising radius at low speeds
but the difficulty at present is how to get them into the space and hooked
up to the propellers under the conditions imposed on high powered capital
vessels.
The Diesel driven capital vessel appears to be still some considerable
distance in the future and before such an installation is attempted there
would have to be considerable experimentation in order that a much lighter
and more compact design than that now employed could be used.
Of course the Diesel engine is quite suitable for naval vessels of moderate
power, such as tenders, gunboats, and other auxiliaries, but where space is
very limited and light weight required, it is wifficult to see how it can be
used successfully. Heretofore, attempts to build Diesel engines of light
design have usually ended in failure. The lightest successful Diesels are
of the type built for the German submarines and which design is being used
for United States submarines and gunboats. This engine has been found
very expensive and difficult to build in this country.
A large, long-stroke Diesel engine built from materials now avail-
able is inherently heavy by reason of the fact that it has a comparatively
low number of revolutions and the piston speed cannot be increased to any
great extent. While cylinder construction can, by better design, be lightened,
this of itself will not reduce the weight necessary for reciprocating parts,
housings, shafting, and so forth.
The successful Diesel engines have been those where adequate weight
has been allowed. Where weights have been skimped, trouble has developed
in various different directions. In vessels where there is abundant space and
where moderate powers are used, the Diesel engine may well compete with
the steam plant. It will weigh more and cost more, but this can be more
than made up by reason of the better fuel economy.


  p. 1739 (#671)                      #

1925]
1739
Discussion
The proposition of going to materially larger cylinder diameters is full
of possible and probable difficulties.
The two cycle, double acting engine with larger cylinder diameter as
suggested by Captain Proctor appears to be the most promising field for
securing lighter engines and more power per cylinder. However, the Diesel
engine has a very long way to go before it can approach the limitations
of weight, space, and propeller conditions that are imposed by conditions
found on a high powered cruiser or capital vessel; powers of 50,000 s.h.p.
and above. The double acting, two cycle engine with large cylinders, as
yet, cannot be considered out of the experimental stage. While 1,000 h.p.
per cylinder may be considered as a probable success, the reliability of
cylinders of greater power than this is seriously in doubt; this, notwith-
standing successful shop tests of a few engines, some of which have been
cited by Captain Proctor.
Should we consider cylinders of 1,000 h.p. for 54,000 s.h.p.—about the
least power that would be put into a capital vessel-we might put this
power on three shafts with eighteen cylinders on a shaft. This is rather
complicated and some difficulty would be found in getting these engineers
below the protective deck and still have adequate access to the cylinders for
overhaul, and so forth. It would be possible, but would it be advisable
from the military point of view ?
The weights of such an installation would exceed that of turbo reduction
gear units by about fifty per cent. This might be saved in fuel but there
would be some doubt about it.
The existing designs would not go in the space. The engines would have
to be especially designed and might not be successful unless much costly
experimental work was done. With plenty of time and money it might be
accomplished successfully, but can the Navy spare the sums required?
The chief advantage of the Diesel engine is its economy, hence radius
of action. To secure this great radius economy at the low speeds is the
great desideratum. There is another way to secure this and that is by
using a combination of Diesel engines and steam installation. Here the
Diesel engine need be large enough only to give cruising speeds. This
may be one tenth to one fifth of the total power. By such an arrangement
a Diesel engine of a size that has been thoroughly tried out can be used in
combination with a turbo-reduction gear steam plant which would very
readily fit into the space available on high powered vessels.
This system would consist of the latest type of turbo-reduction gear on
two or more shafts. On two of the shafts would be mounted Electric
Motors, D.C., which would be energized by Diesel driven generators. The
method of operation would be similar to the system used on the V class
submarines, only it would be much simpler.
If we must go to Diesel drive for high powers, the more feasible proposi-
tion might be the use of high speed Diesel engine (submarine type) with
reduction gears. Designs on this basis have already been proposed. Here,
on two shafts, eight of these engines might be installed, four connected to


  p. 1740 (#672)                      #

1740
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
each reduction gear. Such an installation would be fairly compact but its
reliability is somewhat in doubt. The Diesel electric drive also might be
applied with the same type of engine. Such installations, however, would
weigh considerably more than turbo-reduction gear.
On the whole, it does not appear desirable to force the Diesel into high
speed, high powered vessels that are limited for space. The Diesel engine
does not seem to be well adapted for this field. For battleships and
cruisers a Diesel cruising installation can be made that will give us excellent
economy at low cruising speeds. Such a cruising installation will not
detract from the reliability of the main steam plant and yet will secure a
very large cruising radius at low speed.
Excellence of Naval Material
(See page 1573, September, 1925, PROCEEDINGS)
COMMANDER G. L. ScHUYLER, U. S. Navy.-1. Lieutenant Commander
Craven's article proposes greatly improving excellence of naval material by
consolidating under one head the design sections of the several bureaus.
2. He supports his contention by a painstaking analysis in the War
College form of exposition. Even if we grant nothing else, the article is
useful as an illustration of orderliness of thought. To many it may be
very convincing, because, frankly, to refute it in equal detail and in similar
style involves much more work than most of us would care to expend.
3. Reasoning of this very careful sort is helpful, but it has never been
capable of definitely deducing the best form of government by analyzing
historical facts. This method of attack seems to succeed conclusively only
in the more mathematical sciences, of which naval administration surely is
not one. Moreover, the writer's premises will bear looking into.
4. Many excellent administrative schemes appear hopeless on paper if
accepted too literally, but they work, nevertheless, because they are not what
they seem. So with the Navy Department administration chart--one can
look at lines running from one circle to another and remark upon the
absence of some essential forms of liaison. In reality, such lines do exist,
but they are invisible on the chart, because they are informal, it being the
convention of chart-makers to omit them for that reason, even though they
are of extreme importance.
5. The design sections are so large that all could not go into a single
room, but it is difficult to see how they could be housed much closer together
than they now are in the Navy Department. Between them there are well
worn short cuts by which personnel constantly and informally come and go as
often as necessary to confer with those they need to see in the other bureaus.
6. There would be obvious setbacks, complications, and technical diffi-
culties in so drastic a reorganization as Lieutenant Commander Craven
proposes; but if navy department design matters were so hopelessly com-
partmented as he implies and pictures, one could well admit (with much


  p. 1741 (#673)                      #

1925)
1741
Discussion
less lengthy an argument than Lieutenant Commander Craven sees fit to
give to it), that something drastic was needed.
7. A close-up of Navy Department material design organization does
not reveal perfection, but, in the opinion of most of us, it comes far from
showing sufficiently serious pathological conditions to warrant the proposed
major operation.
Aviation in Coast Defense
(See page 1652, September, 1925, PROCEEDINGS)
CAPTAIN W. H. STANDLEY, U. S. Navy.—The article “Aviation in Coast
Defense" by Captain A. W. Johnson, U. S. Navy, Assistant Chief of the
Bureau of Aeronautics, is timely. The pamphlet “Joint Army and Navy
Action in Coast Defense” is now in process of revision. This pamphlet, as
its name implies, covers joint action in coast defense only, but it is pro-
posed to have the revision include all joint army and navy action. Any
discussion tending to clarify army and navy joint action is therefore timely.
In the pamphlet "Joint Army and Navy Action in Coast Defense,” an
attempt was made to eliminate misunderstanding and friction, and to bring
about cooperation and coordination of effort by a clear and definite state-
ment of the functions and missions of the various branches of the two
services, and by stating definitely how to determine which service has
paramount interest and when.
In a further effort to the same end, and also to prevent duplication of
effort, the War and Navy Departments, through the action of the Joint
Board, have agreed upon a "policy of the Army and Navy relating to air-
craft.” This agreement, published in Army General Order No. 20, dated
June 30, 1924, and Navy General Order No. 132, dated July 7, 1924, gives
the functions of aircraft of the Army, Navy, and Marine Corps, and also
provides for another joint agency, the Aeronautical Board, whose duty it is
to consider and make recommendations concerning "whatever it considers
essential to establish sufficiency and efficiency of cooperation and coordina-
tion of effort between the Army Air Service and Naval Aviation.”
It would, therefore, seem that the question of aviation in coast defense
is already so thoroughly covered by departmental definition and regulations,
and by provisions for considering and making changes in these regulations,
that there could be no chance for controversy or misunderstanding. As a
matter of fact, this is the case, and we would not have heard of this con-
troversy over aviation in coast defense were it not for the agitation for
the united air service.
The proponents of the united air service contend that aviation has
revolutionized warfare. They do admit that armies and navies, or parts
thereof, are still necessary, but only as adjuncts or auxiliaries to the united
air service. They contend that decisions of such men as Generals Pershing,
J. L. Hines, March, Haan, Lassiter, Nolan, Wells, Eltinge, Heintzelman,
and Admirals Eberle, Coontz, Oliver, Williams, Shoemaker, Robertson,
Jackson, Cole, Bostwick, members or ex-members of the Joint Board, and


  p. 1742 (#674)                      #

1742
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
General Patrick and Admiral Moffett, senior members of the Aeronautical
Board, are ill-founded, obsolete, and out of date, and that such of these
officers as are not fliers are totally unfitted to pass upon questions of tactical
or strategical coordination of our military and naval forces for national
defense. In fact, these proponents have gone so far as to actually state
that the only officers now qualified to pass upon such questions are mem-
bers of the flying service.
The reason for such extravagant statements is not hard to find. The
cause of the united air service cannot, in the present state of air develop-
ment, be supported by sound reasoning. There is no necessity in this
country, as yet, and therefore no demand, for a "united air service.” The
highest military and naval authorities are in entire accord as to the functions
and missions of the various branches, including the air, of the Army and
Navy. In order to support their cause the united air service proponents
have resorted to all sorts of extravagant statements, which in many cases
are misleading and not susceptible of proof. They have attempted to dis-
credit the Joint Board, the Aeronautical Board, and, in fact, all of the high
ranking officers of the two services, as well as the Secretary of War and
the Secretary of the Navy. In fact, there are no lengths to which they will
not go, as evidenced by their efforts to introduce into one of the service
appropriation bills a rider which would prevent the Navy from using air-
craft in carrying out its mission in coast defense as assigned by the Joint
Board, and which would even restrict naval facilities to such an extent as
to make it impossible for planes carried by vessels under overhaul at a
navy yard to land at the navy yard. It is a case of everybody being out of
step with the music, except the "united air service" proponents.
As a result of the activities and contentions of these united air service
proponents, there was an investigation by one of the committees of Con-
gress into the question of functions and missions of aircraft as determined
by and laid down in departmental publications. No matter in which direc-
tion this investigation led, one was always forced to the same conclusions:
namely, that there is no duplication of effort in the functions and missions
of aircraft as now prescribed by the Department, and that there would be
a duplication of effort if the patrolling of sea lanes were taken away from
the Navy and turned over to the Army Air Service or turned over to a
"united air service.” These inevitable conclusions were reached through
logical process of reasoning as a result of the agreement to the following
facts:
a) That according to the most optimistic views as to the future develop-
ment, the distance to seaward that shore-based planes could be expected to
operate, was about 250 miles.
b) That for protection of our interests beyond this 250 mile limit, we
would still require a Navy.
c) That whatever were the geographical limits to which they might
restrict the Navy, it must still have its air arm.
d) That the navy air arm would require a special type of plane for
flying over the water.


  p. 1743 (#675)                      #

1925)
1743
Discussion
c) That the same type of plane would be used by the Navy in patrolling
the sea lanes.
f) That to properly interpret the language of the sea, pilots should have
sea training.
9) That if patrolling the sea lanes were assigned as an army air service
or a "united air service" mission, a special type of plane and especially
trained pilots (which they do not now require under assigned functions and
missions of aircraft) would be required.
Conclusions.-1. That there is no duplication of effort under present
assigned missions and functions of aircraft.
2. That there would be duplication of effort in personnel, as well as in
types of planes, if patrolling the sea lanes were assigned as an army air
service or a "united air service” function.
The question of coast defense has been a series of recurring controver-
sies. No sooner do we settle and bury one controversy than another springs
up. The question as to whether or not coast defense should be turned over
to the Navy and be manned by the marines was argued for a long time.
When the submarines appeared, it was contended that they should be turned
over to coast defense. Now we have the question of the air, which again
brings up the question of coast defense. It would seem that there is no end
to the controversy, and there is a reason for this. Coast defense is on the
border between the land, the domain of the Army, and the sea, the natural
element of the Navy, and under these conditions, of course, there cannot
help but be an overlapping of interests and responsibilities. The Navy
naturally operates up to the shore line. The purpose of coast defense guns
is also to cover the approach by water-overlapping of responsibilities is
unavoidable. This is evidenced, as Captain Johnson shows, by the fact
that no two powers have identical plans for coast defense. The air
weapon does not help to remedy the difficulty. It simply extends the
area over which there is overlapping of responsibilities. The Navy
must still come as far as the shore line, and the Army can now deliver an
attack by bombing at a much greater distance to seaward; so the overlapping
of responsibilities is still with us. It was this overlapping of responsibility
and resulting confusion which created the demand for joint agencies to
bring about cooperation and coordination of forces to prevent duplication
of effort. The Joint Board and the Aeronautical Board have accomplished
wonders in this respect, and it should be the duty of every officer in the
military and naval service to loyally support the agreements which have
been reached by these joint agencies in an effort to eliminate contention and
strife between the sister services.
Captain Johnson has covered his subject thoroughly. He has discussed
every phase in an impartial manner. His article is an appeal for sanity
in coast defense and hence, national defense-an appeal for faith and con-
fidence in the wisdom and judgment of our two secretaries, War and Navy,
and of the highest ranking officers of the Army and Navy. It is a sincere


  p. 1744 (#676)                      #

1744
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
and earnest protest against radicalism and fanaticism, for certainly only
a fanatic would make, in all sincerity, the statements accredited to the pro-
ponents of the “united air service”; to wit, that only flying officers were
qualified to pass upon tactical and strategical utilization of our national
defense forces.
The question of the united air service is not dead. It is only sleeping
with the time-lock set for the opening of the next Congress. Aviation in
coast defense is only one of its manifestations. The public has generally
only been given half truths or misleading statements. The arguments for
the united air service cannot survive in the light of the whole truth. Cap-
tain Johnson has gone a long way toward such illumination, and each and
every one of us should exert his best effort toward educating Congress and
the public, lest the Navy be deprived of a most vital arm—the air.
A Balanced Fleet for the United States Navy
(See page 1107, July, 1925, PROCEEDINGS)
BROCK HOLST LIVINGSTON.—Captain Taussig quoted from the General
Board: “Naval policy .... is based on and designed to support national
policies and American interests. .... The Navy of the United States
should be maintained in sufficient strength to support its policies and its
commerce, and to guard its continental and overseas possessions." Later,
he states that before "the promulgation of the Treaty for the Limitation of
Armaments, it was practicable to determine the numbers and classes of
vessels necessary for a balanced fleet without international restriction. This
is no longer possible. The balanced fleet for the United States . ...
depends greatly on the restrictions injected by the treaty." It must be
constantly borne in mind that the treaty limited capital ships and aircraft
carriers only. It made no mention whatever of limitation for cruisers
and other auxiliaries except to restrict them as to individual tonnage and
armament. Upon ratification of the treaty the various signatory nations
were found with great numbers of war-built vessels. Great Britain had a
preponderance of cruisers; the United States an excess of destroyers.
Neither of the classes were necessary in the numbers then constructed. The
vessels had been built under a war-time need. With peace came the
realization that these were faults which should be rectified. On our part
we knew that some of the destroyer tonnage should have been devoted to
cruisers; Great Britain felt that her cruisers were outclassed by larger,
modern ships. Both knew the navies were not well balanced. The navies
as they are constituted now are not sufficiently well balanced to be used as
models upon which to fashion future sea forces. We need not stand at
par with Great Britain in every type of vessel. Our needs may run to
preponderance in one class; theirs to another. It is for us to create a naval
policy providing for a navy sufficient to the end.
"To create, maintain, and operate a navy second to none, and in con-
formity with the ratios for capital ships established by the treaty for the


  p. 1745 (#677)                      #

1925]
1745
Discussion
Limitation of Naval Armaments.” This is the policy formulated by the
General Board. The ratio of 5-5-3 provides, not for an eventual capital
ship strength of eighteen, as mentioned as the basis for calculation hy
Captain Taussig, but for one of fifteen, the number to be retained after
the year 1936. Upon a basic force of fifteen capital ships it would then be
possible by the present policy, to reduce Captain Taussig's figures for all
other classes. Since we have a superiority in destroyers and since it is the
policy "to create .... a navy .... in conformity with the ratios for
capital ships" we must reduce our number of destroyers. There is a
surplus in this type and we shall never replace all of them when these
become obsolete. Naturally, we would not now scrap them because there
are a few more than Great Britain owns. This reduction must come about
in the future. Destroyer leaders must be built and present destroyers
scrapped. We must cut down and fill in until we have a compact, well
balanced whole.
The United States has not used proper judgment in its naval con-
struction. Glance down the list of ships. Practically every class of vessel,
with the exception of battleships which have been built under a continuous
program, has been constructed as a craze. Our armored cruisers, our Denver
class; six, eight, or ten vessels of a type built at one time and nothing again
for years. We are mad now for cruisers. We may get them but our fleet
will be weak in some other point. Would it not be better to build even a
few of each class, capital ship, carrier, cruiser, mine layer, destroyer, leader,
submarine, gunboat, but have modern examples of each type represented
in the feet?
Captain Taussig mentions that at replacement time "the decision will
have to be made as to whether the conditions warrant new construction to be
battleships or battle cruisers, or both.” Later on, a footnote on page 1130
gives particulars of the new Rodney class, stating that "the unusual design of
these ships leads to supposition that they may be intended for use as fleet
flagships.” Possibly it would be wise for the American Navy to utilize its
allowance of capital ships as follows: One fleet flagship combining high
speed, a few heavy guns, moderate armor and deck space for airplanes; four
battle cruisers for the scouting fleet; one battle fleet flagship and three
divisions of three ships each representing the present battleship, heavily
armored and carrying the largest possible number of guns at a moderate
speed.
Captain Taussig's article is interesting but it appears that many of his
conclusions are needlessly excessive. It is, however, a possible foundation
upon which to raise a continuing building policy for the Navy.
Limitations of Aircraft in Naval Warfare
(See page 746, May, 1925, PROCEEDINGS)
LIEUTENANT F. W. WEAD, U. S. Navy.--I have read Lieutenant Com-
mander Ballou's article on “Limitations of Aircraft” which appeared in the


  p. 1746 (#678)                      #


1746
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
May number of the PROCEEDINGS with a great deal of interest. I cannot
but disagree with him in many particulars, nor but feel that he makes a
very poor case for aviation. In discussing this article with Lieutenant
Commander Ballou he informed me that it was primarily written as an
argument against the "separate air service” and against relinquishing the
battleship in favor of aircraft. In many points, however, his case is made
as clearly and specifically against naval aviation as it exists and will con-
tinue to exist, as it is against any other form of aviation. I am sure
that many of his statements are in error and that they require further
comment and correction. Any discussion based on a superficial knowledge
of aviation material and methods is dangerous. Saneness and lack of
sensationalism, however, are certainly desirable. His conclusions are well
known facts and his attitude in regard to the United Air Force controversy
and toward the aircraft versus battleship argument are accepted by most
well informed persons who have given the matter thought, except extreme
radicals. No one can feel that the battleship is any longer on the defensive
or can doubt that sea power is a primary necessity in our national defense. I
am sure that Lieutenant Commander Ballou has convinced everyone that he
personally shares this opinion to the nth degree. It is equally necessary,
however, that facts be not distorted in such a manner as to have an improper
influence on the uninformed, particularly now, closely following a serious
crisis and while naval aviation is apparently making great strides in close
harmony with the fleet each day. Our present attitude should rather be to
insure that aircraft are given every possible chance to prove their capabilities.
Lieutenant Commander Ballou draws a great many lessons from the
operations of aircraft during the late war and from them reasons that
operations in the next war will be subject to similar limitations. He
neglects entirely the fact that naval aviation is 99 per cent a post-war
development; that the material and methods in use now were not, in 1914
to 1917, even thought of; and he casts aside the tremendous progress which
has been made in personnel and in all phases of aviation activities. In
reliability of aircraft engines, decreased fuel consumption, lower weight
per horsepower, increased greater speed, increased useful load, auxiliary
installations, suitability of arrangement for specific tasks, ruggedness, greater
climb, and in all other details of performance, serviceability, and usage
advances are made from month to month and the net progress since the
war has been tremendous.
He states that the only progress so far as bombing is concerned is in
the increased bomb load which has been obtained in new aircraft and
neglects the development work which has gone on in bomb sights and
bombs and in personnel and methods. His quotation from Admiral Sims'
book that we had 500 airplanes operating when the Armistice was signed
in 1918 requires more thorough analysis than he gives it. Practically all
of these 500 planes were utilized in training and for anti-submarine patrol,
and, as Admiral Sims states, their primary function was the location of
submarines and not destruction, destruction being left to surface craft oper-


  p. 1747 (#679)                      #

1925]
1747
Discussion
ating in the vicinity for that purpose. He states that only one submarine
was sunk and makes no mention of how many submarines were sighted.
Moreover, the bombs and equipment carried by such planes were very crude
and of small size and were not entirely suitable for anti-submarine work;
bombing was a new and little developed art, and aircraft and engines re-
quired frequent overhauls and repairs.
One must agree with Lieutenant Commander Ballou in his statement
that a navy is essential to the operation of aircraft in numbers at any
distant point. No one can at this time tell, however, whether this function
of the fleet will become its primary mission or not. While this may not
appear possible at this time it is well within the realm of possibility and
infinitely more capable of actual execution than the radical view of con-
ducting a war by air alone. I fail to see, however, by what logic he
derives the statement that "if aircraft must be put on carriers to bring them
into action or if they must get their fuel supply from surface ships they
have been relegated definitely to the sporadic raiding activities of an inferior
fleet.” To me it seems to make little difference whether aircraft are capable
of flying 2,000 miles in order to reach their objective or whether they must
be launched from a carrier 200 miles away. With aircraft of 4,000 miles
radius we might possibly begin to consider the value of sending out large
unsupported bombing attacks in strength. Until that time we must have a
navy to place and maintain the carriers in a striking position. Bombing and
torpedo plane attacks are a distinct augmentation of the striking strength
of any fleet, either superior or inferior, and are not defensive weapons but
strictly offensive, and will assist in winning wars even though they are
admittedly not a substitute for sea power. The main uses of naval aircraft
are offensive and auxiliary. Their defensive use is apparently limited to
protective screening against aircraft, submarines, and light forces.
That an aircraft cannot sink a battleship because it cannot carry enough
fuel is unbelievable. The fuel required depends entirely on the relative loca-
tion. An army is useless fighting power unless it can be properly placed and
so is a navy or any other form of fighting strength. If enough aircraft can
carry enough fuel to reach a battleship they can certainly sink it, and
“enough” may require a fifty mile radius or may require one of 5,000 miles.
In discussing the value of bombing planes with the fleet, Lieutenant Com-
mander Ballou entirely neglects the balance in various types of planes which
present fleet plans prescribe. He makes no consideration whatsoever of the
defensive gun power of a bombing formation against fighting planes, which
is considerable. He does not consider that every bombing attack will be
accompanied by protective fighting plane formations and he further indicates
that all of the enemy fighting planes will be ideally concentrated in one
spot ready to pounce upon the bombing attack when it occurs. Nothing
could be less logical. Fighting planes available in any fleet will be assigned
to specific tasks which will require their presence in somewhat separated
locations. While concentration of fighting planes may be effected in order
to repel a bombing attack in force, the advantage of surprise lies entirely
with the bomber.


  p. 1748 (#680)                      #

· 1748
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Bombing planes can attack from any direction and at any altitude.
Lieutenant Commander Ballou's "one point in space" is misleading and is
true only for any specific altitude and direction. Torpedo planes using
curve fire may attack an enemy from any direction within torpedo range.
His description of the placing of a "creeping or ladder barrage of bursting
shells to make odds against arriving rather heavy" is fantastic and is not
sustained by past experience. At this time no entirely satisfactory method
of anti-aircraft fire-control has been developed and the fleet is at present
in the throes of considerable experimentation in this regard. It may be
accepted as a fact that the defense of a fleet against aircraft must rest
upon fighting planes within the fleet. Anti-aircraft guns should be pro-
vided and experimented with until the best possible results are obtained.
Inherent limitations will, however, render them always a secondary means
of fleet defense against aircraft. His statement that "from the moment
an airplane is sighted the path it must travel to reach its striking
point is known” is absolutely in error. If he can produce any method by
which the path of a bombing or torpedo plane attack led by a competent
leader can be predetermined he will confer a tremendous favor upon the
fire control experts of our fleet.
With proper development of bomb sights which have been under design
for the past five years and with proper training of crews over moving
targets, it is believed that the accuracy of bombing will increase to approxi-
mately 50 per cent of hits on a capital ship. The present bomb sights in use
are cruder than the old open sights used on guns, and while a stabilized
sight is essential present sights can be considerably refined in structural
details alone. Lieutenant Commander Ballou evidently assumes that we are
going into the next war under exactly the same conditions in which we came
out of the last one.
His remarks in regard to the limitation of weather likewise show lack
of appreciation of facts gained in experience. Radio direction and aerial
navigation in its advanced phases have been developed almost entirely since
the war; chances which would not be taken in peace time become an
absolute necessity in war time. In the past ten years we have developed
planes more suitable for work in all sorts of weather, including fog, rain,
snow, and darkness, and pilots have obtained much experience in operating
under adverse conditions. Aircraft landing in heavy seas will probably
be lost. No difficulty in launching them from carriers or catapults in heavy
weather obtains. A commander-in-chief, in weighing any such situation,
would compare the value of the serial reconnaissance, observation, or bomb-
ing or torpedo work to be carried out with the subsequent loss of planes
involved. The work can be executed if of greater value, than the risk
incurred. In any event, it is extremely improbable that our next war will
be fought in the Straits of Dover, and the weather conditions in that area
will probably have little effect on those in the Pacific or elsewhere.
It is true that bombers dispose of their load at one release, i.e., "one
shot in the locker"; this shot, however, is far from being expelled from a


  p. 1749 (#681)                      #

1925]
1749
Discussion
pea-shooter, and, after all, the damaging effect accomplished is the primary
factor, whether it be accomplished by one blow or by several. This method
is not a necessity and when more than one bomb is carried they may be
released individually. Simultanecus release is, however, more efficient
from the destruction standpoint.
Bombing is not comparable to gun fire in that spotting or corrections
are needed. Each bombing problem must be based upon a complete solution
of existing conditions at the time. When these conditions remain absolutely
unchanged "spotting" may be of some value. Conditions, however, will
not remain unchanged for two successive runs in time of war. This applies
to the altitude speed, and position of the airplane, the force and direction of
the wind between the ground and the bombing airplane, and the course and
speed of the enemy ship.
Lieutenant Commander Ballou's statement that seagoing aircraft that
can be stowed on a carrier and take off on the length of the fight deck
cannot be of sufficient size to carry more than one torpedo or one bomb of
a size sufficient to injure a dreadnaught also is capable of some explanation.
If such airplanes can be produced elsewhere, and without doubt they can be,
they can be utilized on a carrier very readily. Carriers steaming into the
wind at 30 knots with an actual wind of 10 knots produce a wind of 40
knots over the carrier deck. This in itself is almost sufficient for flight and a
very short run is required to get into the air. In addition, a rapid adjustable
and detachable catapult which hooks into the under carriages of
heavily loaded planes is under development for "boosting” them into the
air and has been used. This problem is so near solution that further dis-
cussion is unnecessary.
The question of wing spread is not believed to be vital, as it appears
probable that new carriers will be or can be designed to accommodate any
airplane with wings folded which it appears desirable to build from a design
standpoint.
The statement that bombers can never become an efficient or dependable
weapon because they are out of action after firing one salvo is equally
inaccurate. If that one salvo carries with it sufficient destructive effect to
accomplish the purpose for which it is intended, it seems to me that from a
standpoint of efficiency it is much higher than a naval gun which may
require thirty-five or forty salvos to accomplish the same result.
I will grant that from an analysis of past bombing results many of
Lieutenant Commander Ballou's statements in regard to the accuracy and
possibilities of bombing may appear true. He lacks, however, that knowledge
of present experimental work and development with bomb sights which
lead even the most conservative of those who are familiar with it to feel
sure that the bomber as a weapon is bound to become a thing of precision
and accuracy.
He knows of nothing more helpless than a bombing plane which has
delivered its attack, when, as a matter of fact, bombers are much more
capable of self-defense the moment their bomb load is released in that they
are free to maneuver, and can take the shortest way home.


  p. 1750 (#682)                      #


1750
[1925
Discussion
The mental hazard in aircraft work in time of war is certainly not greater
than that encountered in other weapons and in writing about the mental
hazard of war-time bombing one should in fairness include the mental
hazard in war-time fighting from surface ships or submarines.
It is believed that the statement that the airplane is the most expensive
weapon, considered from a standpoint of damaging effect against any
target, be it enemy fleet or shore bases, will not hold water under careful
analysis. This item would require thorough research and a detailed state-
ment regarding the peace-time cost of the airplane and battleship or other
destructive arm, cost of the personnel involved, interest on the capital
invested, annual cost of fuel, average life and other matters, balanced
against the destructive effect obtainable, and is so complicated that no definite
figure could be reached which would be satisfactory to everyone.
Detailed information in regard to the equipment of the Zeppelins which
were scheduled to be used in Jutland is not at hand. It may be assured,
however, from the results of air raids over London that these aircraft did
not carry bombs of any great size or in any great amount. The majority
of their useful load was taken up with fuel, and the value of these Zeppelins
to the German fleet for any purpose whatsoever except that of observation
may be considered absolutely nil.
Lieutenant Commander Ballou takes entirely too many lessons from the
late war without consideration of conditions as they existed and without
apparent knowledge of new material, new methods, and experience which
has been gained since the war and with little conception of the uses of
aircraft in future naval engagements.
His “steady pressure by which wars are won” in reality consists of a
series of striking blows against the enemy and the length of time such
pressure must be applied depends entirely upon the effectiveness and striking
force of the blows. The greatest amount of such destructive strength that
can be applied at any one point is bound to come, to a certain extent, through
aviation in the form of bombing and torpedo attacks which now have a
striking range of some 200 miles with a 2,000 pound destructive load and
the great advantages of high speed and surprise.


  p. 1751 (#683)                      #



  p. 1752 (#684)                      #


10,000 H.P., DOUBLE-ACTING DIESEL ENGINE FOR THE M.S. "AsturiAS"


  p. 1753 (#685)                      #

PROFESSIONAL NOTES
PREPARED BY
LIEUTENANT COMMANDER H. W. UNDERWOOD, U. S. Navy
FROM JULY 7 TO AUGUST.7
1753
1754
1756
1758
GENERAL ARRANGEMENT
GREAT BRITAIN
Future Capital Ships..................
Unemployment ......
An Airship Offensive......
The Air Ministry's Exhibits at Wembley..
FRANCE
Impressions of French Sea Power........
French Navy Notes..........
UNITED STATES
“Old Ironsides" Campaign........
Hawaii's Naval Needs.....
1762
1764
....................................
1704
1766
1767
AVIATION
Commercial Air Transport......
Civil and Military Aircraft......
The Uses of Water Recovery....
1768
1769
1769
...
1773
1773
1775
1775
.......
177
1776
1780
ENGINEERING
The Motor Passenger Liner “Asturias”.........
Supercharging ......
Proposed German Admiralty Rotorships...
Motorship Performances (“Aorangi”)..
German Diesel Engine Practice........
ORDNANCE
Gunnery in the Battle of Jutland.
MERCHANT MARINE
World's Shipbuilding Touches Lowest Level Since War.....
The World's Merchant Shipping ......
Merchant Ship Subsidy Systems ........
Ford's Bid for Scrap Ships...........
Scrapping Shipping Board Ships......
MISCELLANEOUS
Submarine Cruisers .....
CURRENT NAVAL AND PROFESSIONAL PAPERS
1782
1785
1787
1790
1791
..................
1701
1792
1798


  p. 1754 (#686)                      #

1754
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
GREAT BRITAIN
Future Capital Ships
The Army, Navy and Air Force Gazette, 4 July, 1925.-Will the Nelson
and Rodney, which are shortly to take the water on the Tyne and the
Mersey, prove to be the last battleships of large displacement to be built
for any power? It is rash to speculate on such a matter, but the indica-
tions at present certainly point in this direction. It is well to recall the
circumstances under which these vessels were put in hand. The Washington
Conference of 1921-22 proposed a complete ten-year naval holiday from
battleship construction, but Japan stood out for the completion of her new
battleship Mutsu, which gave her two post-Jutland ships of the latest
design. America then insisted on completing two more, the Colorado and
West Virginia, and, to maintain the status quo, Great Britain, which had
stopped work on four new battleships at the start of the conference, was
authorized to build two others. Now, although the Washington Treaty
is to last until the end of 1936, or for another eleven and a half years, the
powers are not bound by it to suspend battleship construction for so long.
France and Italy have the right to resume such construction in 1927, and
to lay down in that year ships which will come into service in 1930-31 to
replace the Jean Bart and Dante Alighieri, respectively. Much will doubtless
depend upon whether they exercise this right.
Three years ago, the right to build a new battleship was offered to the
French Government by the loss of their ship, the France. They took no
advantage of the clause in the treaty which permits of the replacement of
capital ships or aircraft-carriers accidentally destroyed, and the precedent
may commend itself in 1927. After all, each power is only authorized to
lay down one ship in that year and the use of such an isolated unit would
raise some awkward problems. Much better, it would seem, would be the
construction instead of, say, three 10.000-ton cruisers, or six flotilla leaders
similar to the fine trio of Italian ships now visiting the Baltic. Supposing
France and Italy take this view, their action will not be without its in-
fluence on the other signatory powers, Britain, America, and Japan, as to
the decisions they will make in 1931, when they are allowed to resume
battleship construction. Another conference before that date might well
confirm and consolidate what would by then have become the general ten-
dency.
It is only a question of agreement between the powers before what we now
call the cruiser becomes the capital ship of the future. As Admiral Sir
William Henderson has often argued, a 10,000-ton cruiser could perform
all the functions of a battleship, provided that the nations had agreed that
vessels of larger tonnage should not be built. From the standpoints of
personnel and operations, there can be no question that two or three cruisers
would be preferable to one battleship. As regards the strategic aspect, too,
Admiral Henderson has pointed out that fleets should be constituted to fit
the probable theaters in which they may have to act. This points to the
elimination of the big ship, and the use of smaller, simpler, and more
mobile vessels. The naval lesson of the war, he affirms, is that the con-
struction and organization of the fleets was such that they could only be
used to advantage in narrow waters. But, the next move is with the
politicians if a return to smaller dimensions is to be brought about, for the
powers must agree collectively before any one of them dares take the risk
which failure to include the largest and most powerful vessels in their battle
squadron would involve.


  p. 1755 (#687)                      #

1925]
1755
Professional Notes
Unemployment
The Engineer, 3 July, 1925.—So much has already been said about unem-
ployment, so many people have studied it profoundly and so many cures or
palliatives have been examined or tested that it may seem scarcely worth
while to discuss it again. Yet, the debate in the House of Commons on
Monday last invites our consideration if only on account of the honest and
admirable speech which was delivered by the Prime Minister. Mr. Baldwin
does not suffer from the illusion that unemployment can be stopped by
Parliament, and he made an effort, which his opponents sought to defeat,
to raise the whole subject out of the political cockpit. Whatever politicians
may think of a Prime Minister who hesitates to make claims which he knows
he will find difficulty in maintaining; who refuses to take advantage of the
speeches and failures of his predecessors in office, and who seeks to elevate
a wrangle into a debate, all who are intimate with the industries of the
country can appreciate the necessity of a clear statement of facts free from
political bias and from vague promises of performances which history has
shown over and over again that Parliament is unable to effect. Unemploy-
ment is no new thing. Ever since the industrial era began there have been
recurrent periods of bad trade, and we are not aware that in a single in-
stance the action of any government in the world has retarded their arrival
or hastened their departure. All that Parliament can do, apart from the
execution of relief works, is to facilitate trading conditions. It cannot
produce a demand that does not exist, and, as we have seen in the case of
housing, it is powerless to increase output in the face of the opposition of
an industry.
There are two aspects from which the depressed position of the trade of
the country may be regarded. One is that it is not our own fault and the
other that it is. It is impossible at the present day to say quite definitely
which point of view should be taken. In the familiar ten-year trade cycles
it was fairly safe to assert that the country was no more responsible for the
hollows in the waves than it was for the crests. Influences beyond the con-
trol of any single country were at work to make or mar us. Even the
heavens conspired for our advantage or distress. A bad harvest, a bad cot-
ton crop, a disastrous wool clip brought the purchasing power of the world
down and trade suffered a set-back. On the other hand, fine weather fol-
lowed by plentiful harvests of all kinds filled the pockets of purchasers and
trade abounded. In how far the conditions of the present slump resemble
those of normal trade cycles we cannot say, but this much at least we have
reason to believe, that this country is not an isolated sufferer and that the
trade of other European countries is not as rosy as it is sometimes made
to appear. It is at least possible that we are in the trough of an ordinary
depression to which there is added a secondary depression of about equal
magnitude peculiar to certain industries of this country. If this is the
case we may expect, in the course of a year or two, recovery from part
of our complaint-from that part which we call the normal cyclical de-
pression. Shall we recover from the remaining portion? We speak now
only of the industries with which we are concerned, the industries which
for the most part are those suffering most severely at the present time.
Mr. Baldwin spoke in admirable terms of the necessity of allying science
with manufactures. Of the importance of that alliance it is impossible
to speak too highly. It is an absolute essential to progress; in its absence
we cannot hope to compete with other countries; but we must not fall
into the easy mistake of supposing that such an alliance is all that is
needed. Science is the beginning of industry, not its continuance. The
industry must be carried on by the factory and its organization, and we


  p. 1756 (#688)                      #

1756
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
believe that it is just there that the weakness of this old manufacturing
country will be found. We have, it is true, many fine new works and ship-
yards; but we have also a great many that are antiquated, and we are con-
tinually handicapped by the effort to combine modern scientific processes and
methods with works which were built for the methods of half a century
and more ago. We have, particularly during the past few years, seen
examples of capital expenditure on a magnificent scale, but on the whole it
must be admitted that British manufacturers have been more chary about
the modernization of works than America or Germany. As a matter of
fact, for a long period we found it profitable to adhere to the old plants.
Labor was relatively cheap, our markets were established, and we could
carry on very well against such opposition as we had to meet. But, a
great change has taken place. Not only have we to meet much greater
competition from countries outside the empire which have hastened to in-
crease their engineering production, but we are confronted with the fact
that in several lands within the empire engineering is advancing so rapidly
that the old dependence on the mother country is disappearing. Searched
to its foundation, the problem resolves itself into this: Can we hope,
with the prospect of foreign trade steadily diminishing, to support a popu-
lation of forty-five millions in greater comfort than a smaller population
enjoyed ten years ago? We fear that there is but one answer to it.
Something, indeed, might be done by the rejuvenation of old works and
the general improvement of industries, but unless we can get more foreign
trade than we had before the war-an unlikely consummation—the prob-
ability is that we shall find it impossible to support so large a population as
at present. Economists tell us that with the coming of the industrial era
in Great Britain the population rapidly increased because means of support
were easy to find. We may assume that, by the converse process, it will
decrease automatically when means of support diminishes.
There is, we admit, no helpful policy in that philosophic point of view.
It takes us nowhere. Is there nothing that can be done now? nothing
that will delay the decrease of our population? We agree with Mr.
Baldwin that the government can do but little and that industries must
help themselves, yet as we believe one of the first steps to be the modern-
ization of antiquated factories, we were glad to observe his statement that
the government was prepared to give facilities for the "modernizing and
repairing of plant in works." There are many, many works in the kingdom
that would do well to take advantage of that offer. But, as we have sug-
gested, the improvement of factories only takes us part of our road. The
rest of it lies by a harder path. With all of our factories set in order,
with science firmly allied to industry, we might support our present popu-
lation in the standard of comfort which it enjoyed in pre-war days. It
is doubtful whether, in the face of decreasing foreign demand for our
goods and increasing foreign competition, we can hope to maintain a popu-
lation of forty-five millions at the standard of life which is now demanded.
Foreign trade now, as always, is the key to the situation. We may tempt
it back by lowering our costs of production, which, in the long run, means
lowering the standard of living; or, alternatively, if we insist on maintain-
ing the present standard of living, we must be content with a smaller
volume of foreign trade and a smaller population. Whither that policy
would ultimately lead us we do not propose to discuss.
An Airship Offensive
By Admiral Sir W. H. Henderson, The Evening Post, 10 July, 1925.—
The minister for air, Sir Samuel Hoare, at Pulham the other day, made


  p. 1757 (#689)                      #

1925)
1757
Professional Notes
statements in regard to the value of airships which require serious examina-
tion if the public is not to be misled and vast sums of money spent before
it is too late. The criticism of airship policy which Sir Samuel Hoare
derides is something more than that of "timid people who dislike great
experiments that may lead to big changes in established ideas."
It is based rather on principles of which the air minister appears to be
completely unaware, principles which a sailor, from his training, can
appreciate. A word of explanation and of protest from an old seaman
may not, therefore, be out of place.
The escape of R-33 was simply due to the fact that the gale abated
in time to enable her, with the amount of petrol she luckily had on board,
combined with pluck and good management, to crawl home before all of
her petrol was expended. Had the gale lasted but a very little longer
she would, in all probability, have been lost.
To a landsman or a sailor the movements of the air are felt as, and
designated as, wind; they interfere but little with transport either on
land or at sea, for in case of necessity natural shelter is almost always
available; a well found ship can always hold her own in open water.
This is not so with aircraft, and is, therefore, the underlying fallacy
concerning lighter-than-air (that is, airship) schemes. An airship afloat,
immersed in the air, is in a current which carries her with it whatever its
direction. She does not feel any wind except that which may be caused
by her own propulsion through it. Only by being able to fix her position by
astronomical observation, by directionals, by bearings of objects on the
land (including, as suggested, enormously powerful lighthouses at frequent
intervals) can she be aware of the direction in which she is being taken;
and if these fail her, as they will do, especially when over the sea, she
can have no knowledge of her position and drift.
Sailors have to do with currents, but the currents of the oceans and seas
are practically constant, are well known, are charted, and are exceedingly
slight compared with those of the air, which may range up to 100 miles an
hour. Even in only fresh breezes they average from fifteen to twenty miles,
and always vary constantly both in direction and speed.
An airship cannot hope to hold her own unless she has a speed superior
to that of the current of air against which she may have to proceed.
The inability of R-33 to make any stand against a current of 45-55 knots
has again demonstrated the necessity of a higher speed, and 70 knots is
aimed at in the new government airships, necessitating craft of 5,000,000
cubic feet capacity.
These unwieldy monsters will require for shelter, in place of the an-
chorages nature provides for ships, huge artificial hangars (it was stated
that one to take the R-II would be large enough to contain both St.
Paul's Cathedral and the Nelson Monument), enormous mooring masts,
directional stations, lighthouses, factories, and armies of groundmen always
ready, scattered not only along, but outside of their routes. In fact, air-
ships need artificial provision in every single respect to enable them to work
at all.
I see it is proposed to make a beginning by the establishment of an
aerodrome at Colchester, which it was stated at a meeting of the town
council “would mean the expenditure of something like a half million
of money and that establishment in Colchester of about 500 men.” For
what purposes ? None that can ever pay commercially, for not only will the
cost of airships and their paraphernalia be prohibitive, but their available
weight-carrying capacity is exceedingly small, and when the weights
of the hull, envelope, engine, necessary ballast, fuel, crew, etc., are deducted
from the total lifting capacity, little remains over to afford any paying


  p. 1758 (#690)                      #

1758
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
proposition, even were safety and reliability not the essential disiderata.
One has to remember the disasters which happened to the eight Zeppelins
in October, 1917 to R-34 in 1921, and the French airship Dirmude, which,
in December, 1923, was carried away in a current and lost with the fifty-
three people who were on board her; and, in addition to the ever-present
danger of atmospheric currents, there is the risk of thunderstorms. In
“The Distribution of Thunderstorms Over the Globe" (Geophysical Memoirs
No. 24), Air Ministry Meteorological Office, Mr. C. E. P. Brooks, MSc.,
estimates that 44,000 occur daily throughout the world, mainly in the
tropics, the Java Sea being the worst region.
Lightning is very dangerous to airships should there be any escape of
hydrogen. Those who note these things will recall that the British airship
N.S.-II was struck by lightning off Norfolk in 1919, and fell into the
sea, a blazing wreck.
An airship disregards the first principles of transport, which are that a
ship or any other means of transport must have a power of motion of its
own, greatly in excess of the modicum in or on which it moves. She is
consequently only a fine-weather craft, capable of making trips in selected
weather, or for use for reconnaissance on selected days from some few
definite positions. That this is the case was shown over and over again
by the Zeppelins during the war.
The Air Ministry's Exhibits at Wembley
The Engineer, 17 July, 1925.-To those willing to seek out and study the
Air Ministry's exhibits at the British Empire Exhibition, a feast of great
scientific interest can safely be promised. We do not refer particularly
to the examples of full-sized airplanes shown in the Palace of Housing
and Transport, for neither the service nor the civil machines exhibited are
particularly modern, and are staged more for the education of the general
public than for the attention of technical people. Nor do we reier es-
pecially to the series of airplane models shown in the British Government
Pavilion. Individually, these models are very beautiful examples of mini-
ature mechanical construction, and collectively they present a striking syn-
opsis of the evolution of aircraft from the early Roe triplane and the
strangely grotesque Cody machine to such fairly recent productions as the
10,000-horsepower Avro, Aldershot and the triple-engined Handley Page,
Hamilton. But, here again the interest is popular rather than technical.
Opposite these models is to be found, among other similar exhibits, a
tableau, arresting alike in its artistic realism and in its effect on the blood,
illustrating the slaughter of the retreating Turks by British and Australian
bombers in a gorge of the Wady-Fara, on September 21, 1918. It is
an almost over-grim demonstration of the efficacy of aerial forces against
troops on the ground when too panic-stricken to defend themselves, and
it is with a feeling approaching relief that we turn to an examination of
the more peaceful uses of aircraft and of the instruments and devices as-
sociated with their design and operation.
It has been argued, even by some intimately associated with the develop-
ment of aircraft, that the “conquest" of the air has not benefited humanity.
On balance, we have no doubt, airplanes and airships have so far produced
more of evil than of good. The benefits obtainable from civil aerial trans-
port-to some they still even require demonstration-are not so great as
to compensate for the suffering and destruction which military aircraft
have caused, and will undoubtedly continue to cause, in warfare. Aero-
nautics, however, almost from the first, was given a military trend and,
possibly to its own misfortune, was at a critical stage in its development


  p. 1759 (#691)                      #

1925)
1759
Professional Notes
when circumstances arose which compelled attention to be exclusively de-
voted to its application to war purposes. While the military side of aviation
will probably always be the dominant one, it is not to be supposed that
the transport of passengers and goods represents the only important appli-
cation on the civil side. Rapid and important developments, as a section
of the Air Ministry's exhibit shows, are now proceeding in a field of applica-
tion, and photographic surveying of large tracts of land, to which aircraft
are peculiarly and exclusively adapted.
It would seem a fairly simple matter to take a series of photographs from
the air of contiguous areas of land and to mount them side by side to
form a map of the whole. Actually, it is not easy. In fact, to derive any
really useful delineation of the land over a large surface in this way requires
a considerable amount of mathematical work as a basis. Two methods are
available. For rapid survey work not demanding a great degree of refine-
ment, one oblique photograph taken from the air may be made to serve
the whole area. This method has been extensively applied in Canada. Pro-
vided two datum points fixed on the land surface by ground surveyors
are included in the photograph, the oblique view can be plotted as an or-
dinary vertical map projection by ruling a series of convergent grid lines
on the photograph and transferring the intersections onto a map blank ruled
with a corresponding rectangular grid. A development of this process con-
sists of employing an instrument of the camera lucida type. In this
device the oblique photograph is obliquely projected in such a way that
the one obliquely cancels the other, thus permitting the rectangular map to
be traced directly on the plane of projection.
For work requiring an increased degree of accuracy, a mosaic of photo-
graphs taken perpendicularly from the air is built up to form a complete
map. This process has been applied in a noteworthy instance to the map-
ping of the Irawaddy Delta which, consisting more or less of inaccessible
forest and swamp, does not lend itself readily or at all to ordinary ground
surveying. Working with this method the pilot flies back and forth along
parallel courses over the area to be surveyed, taking successive photographs
of the ground with a camera pointing vertically downwards. The camera
may be controlled by hand, but in some cases it is now operated auto-
matically by means of mechanism which varies the interval between the
exposures to suit the speed of the airplane.
The speed with which an aerial survey can be completed is one of its most
valuable features. In Canada the oblique photographic method has enabled
the first proofs of the finished map to be prepared for a large area in six
months' time, or in a fraction of the period which a ground surveyor
would take merely to make his field observations. Again, the detail revealed
by the photographic survey is very much greater than the ground surveyor,
chained it may be to transport by a canoe, can hope to record without
much wearisome journeying. In Canada it has been found possible to dis-
tinguish between the different classes of trees, deciduous and otherwise,
standing on the ground surveyed from the air. In that country, too, the
aerial survey organization works in conjunction with the forest fire-fighting
services, notifying an outbreak and assisting in the transport of the fire-
fighters from their base to the seat of conflagration. It is of interest to
note that our own ordnance survey has now decided to use aerial surveying
as a means of revising the twenty-five-inches-to-the-mile ordnance maps of
this country.
Of all the devices connected with aerial surveying which are exhibited by
the Air Ministry at Wembley, chief scientific interest must be accorded to
the "camera plastica," a device developed by the combined Admiralty, War
Office, and Air Ministry Air Survey Committee, and made by Cooke,


  p. 1760 (#692)                      #

1760
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Troughton and Sims, Ltd., of York. This appliance makes use of the
anaglyph principle, whereby two slightly displaced views of an object, one
in red and the other in green, are given an appearance of relief when
viewed through a green and a red glass. In the camera plastica a pair of
such stereoscopic views is projected, one by red and the other by green light,
on to a horizontal plotting board, which may be raised or lowered through
known scaled distances. If the red and green lights are set to flicker
rapidly and alternately, the image cast on the plotting board flickers as a
whole in unison. At certain points on the image, however, no flickering
is seen. At these points the red and the green rays intersect in the plane
of the plotting board. By raising or lowering the plotting board a dif-
ferent series of points becomes steady. Each series of steady points is
plotted and represents a contour line of the land being surveyed. The height
from contour line to contour line is read off from the scale attached to the
plotting table. Few, we think, will fail to agree with us in our view that
the camera plastica is a very beautiful instrument of considerable practical
promise.
Close to the aerial surveying section the visitor will find a large and
entertaining collection of ancient books, engravings, and other objects illus-
trating man's attempts at and thoughts about artificial flight from the time
of Bladud-a legendary king of Britain who 3,000 year ago attempted to
fly with wings on his shoulders, and killed himself by falling on the Temple
of Apollo in Trinovantum, or St. Paul's Cathedral in London, as we would
now call it—to the time of Cayley, Henson, and the other pioneers of
modern aeronautics. This exhibit was collected by Mr. J. E. Hodgson, a
well-known authority on aeronautical history, and both for its extent and
the manner in which it is arranged, deserves our consideration and praise.
In another part of the Government Building close to the series of model
airplanes to which we have referred above, a miniature wind tunnel in-
vites more than passing notice, especially if the visitor is allowed, as we
were, to operate it for himself. A wing section is exposed in the air
current and is connected by nine tubes from its top surface and by a like
number from the bottom to a series of eighteen separate water manometers
mounted side by side. The distribution of pressure on the underside of
the wing and the much more important distribution of suction on the upper
side and the manner in which these distributions alter as the wing is tilted
from zero incidence. up to the stalling angle are rendered visible in a
highly enlightened manner.
Passing into the Palace of Housing and Transport the visitor should
note the full sized reproduction of the tower of Croydon, from which,
with the aid of wireless telephony, the position of airplanes crossing to or
from the Continent is determined and their alighting and departure are
controlled. If he is fortunate he will head an actual message coming in
from an actual machine in flight, reporting its passage over some familiar
landmark, and will see the operator recording its position on a cork-faced
map by means of a small flag bearing the civil registration letters of the
machine.
Another exhibit relating to the navigation of airplanes, to which attention
should be given, is the duplicate of one of the six aerial lighthouses which
have now been erected on the continental route between Croydon and
Lympne. This lighthouse, the joint product of Chance Brothers and the
Gas Accumulator Company, is designed to operate without attention of any
kind for periods of six months or more. It has a range of visibility of
about thirty-five miles, a distance which is sufficient to enable a pilot flying
by night to pick up the second light before losing the first, and so on
throughout all six. The lighting up of the burner is controlled by a "sun-


  p. 1761 (#693)                      #

1925)
1761
Professional Notes
valve" on top of the lens work, the sensitiveness of the valve being ad-
justable so as to bring it into action at any desired degree of darkness.
The valve, we understand, is not sensitive to heavy clouds but would, or
could be made to, operate under the darkness of a really heavy thunder-
storm, Rotation of the light is effected by the pressure of the dissolved
acetylene gas on its way to the burner, and is therefore stopped and
started by the action of the sun valve. The automatic control of the ap-
paratus is even carried so far that should the gas mantle be broken or burnt
out in service it will be automatically replaced by a new one.
Aeronautics has undoubtedly caused the medical profession to look at
humanity from many new angles, so much so that the "air doctor” may
now be regarded as something of a specialist. Apart from the effects
produced on the human constitution by high altitudes, rapid speeds, sudden
accelerations and decelerations and other matters cognate to actual flight,
the medical officer attached to an aeronautical unit has to study the re-
action of those under his charge to movement in three dimensions. Until
this aspect of aeronautics was studied on a scientific basis its importance was
perhaps not realized by many, even among those closely connected with
aeronautics. All of the movements which we make in ordinary life call
for two-dimensional control, and after we have passed the babyhood stage,
no conscious effort is required for the coordination of our movements in
two planes; but when, as in flight, three-dimensional control is required,
good coordination comes naturally to a few individuals, can be acquired by
practice by others, and is apparently beyond the attainment of many. Such
would seem to be the lesson to be derived from the records obtained with
the Reid time reaction apparatus for testing pilots. This apparatus consists
of an airplane cockpit equipped with the usual means of controlling the
flying organs. The controls, however, instead of operating ailerons, ele-
vators, or rudders are connected to various electric lights on the dash-
board. The operations of banking, gliding, spinning and so forth are
indicated by the appearance of colored lights. Recovery is shown by the
appearance of three white lights, which mark the fact that the "airplane"
is Aying normally in all three dimensions. A tape-recording machine and
a chronometer are fitted to give a permanent record of the time taken by
the "pilot" to recover the normal flying altitude after it has been disturbed.
Many curious interesting facts have already been accumulated by the use
of this apparatus. Motor drivers and others accustomed to the control
of machinery usually show a short time reaction when their hands alone
are tested, although few or none are equally good with both hands. Foot
controls may also be good when tested separately, but even among the
best and most experienced airplane pilots a preference is nearly always
shown for turning to one side rather than to the other. When, however,
a combined foot and hand control is required, the entry of the third di-
mension upsets most people, and six or seven or more seconds may be
required to effect the coordination as compared with the tenth to a half
second for a really first-class born pilot. Those who sometimes feel a
certain sense of shame when they start at a sudden noise, may take consola-
tion from the fact that even the said born pilot will frequently show a
quick jump in his control curve when a Klaxon horn beneath the Reid
apparatus is sounded without warning. The height of the jump in the
curve is not, however, regarded as being of great importance. What is
examined is the after effect on the pilot-or patient, as it might be better to
call him. Whereas an ordinary being may show a widely "hunting” curve
for some time after being startled, the good pilot, the man born to fly, re-
covers very quickly and commonly gives an even better curve after than
before the disturbance.


  p. 1762 (#694)                      #

1762
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The Reid apparatus can be adjusted to represent anything from a light
scout which can only be flown in the normal attitude by the constant manipu-
lation of the controls to a heavy bombing machine which is inherently
stable. It is of great interest as a means of translating a man into a curve.
In its purely professional aspect its value lies in the fact that it enables
candidates for pilotship to be examined at the start of their career with
the object of determining whether there is any reasonable likelihood of their
becoming good pilots in a short time. It enables the hopeless case to be
eliminated at the outset without risking his life and those of others in an
actual machine. It reveals the deficiencies on which special attention should
be concentrated during the training of the embryo pilot, provides a means
of practicing with the object of improving a new or former pilot's per-
formance, and serves to indicate the particular type of machine which the
would-be pilot is best qualified by his natural aptitude to control.
FRANCE
Impressions of French Sea Power
By Hector C. Bywater, Baltimore Sun, 3 August, 1925.—Scenes of ex-
traordinary enthusiasm were witnessed at Cherbourg last Thursday when
President Doumergue reviewed the French fleet. Huge crowds of people,
many of whom had come from towns and villages some considerable dis-
tance inland, thronged the narrow streets of the quaint old port. Everyone
wanted a trip in the little steamers that took sight-seers around the fleet,
but these were unable to accommodate more than a tithe of the host and
the majority had to content themselves with a distant view of the fighting
ships, sixty of which lay at anchor in the roads.
I was fortunate enough to secure a passage in one of the first steamers
that went out to the fleet. As we steamed down the harbor guns began to
thunder from the batteries on the heights, for the presidential train had
just arrived at Cherbourg and the Chief Executive of the Republic was being
saluted with 101 guns. With him was a distinguished party of ministers,
senators, deputies, and officials.
I have already described in a cable to The Sun the principal events of the
day, such as the President's trip in a submarine (which, however, did not
submerge), his run in a destroyer at full speed and his visit to the arsenal,
where he drove the first rivet in the big submarine Redoubtable, a vessel of
some 3,000 tons and by far the largest underwater craft which France so
far has laid down.
As for the fleet itself, it was rather less imposing than one had expected.
Six battleships were there, but of these only four possess any degree of
fighting value. The old Voltaire and Diderot, in spite of their five funnels
and piled-up turrets, are wholly obsolete, and probably are kept only for
training purposes. The same is true of the armored cruisers that still
serve in the northern division, although they were built twenty years ago.
The two most powerful battleships, Province and Lorraine, compare as
to armament with the United States' New York and Texas, albeit they
are smaller and less well protected. Extensive modernization has completely
altered the appearance of these ships. Each is now fitted with a colossal
tripod mast, while the forefunnel has been raised and the tophamper in-
creased. Also, their big guns of 13.4-in. caliber have been modified to permit
of higher elevation, from 18° to 23°, and can now range up to 23,000 meters.
This change appears to have been tacitly approved by the other signatory
powers out of regard for the numerical weakness of the French battle fleet.
The Jean Bart, an older dreadnaught, mounting 12-in. guns, also has been
metamorphosed by bringing the two first funnels into one casing and fitting


  p. 1763 (#695)                      #

1925]
1763
Professional Notes
a tripod mast. Her sister ship, Paris, was present, but did not go out for
maneuvers with the rest of the fleet.
There was nothing between these big armor clads and the destroyers,
for the few light cruisers which France now owns were absent on blockade
duty along the Riff coast, and none of the five new ships building is ready to
hoist the pennant. Even the twenty-two destroyers present all dated from
the war or pre-war period and included a series of boats which once flew
the German flag. These, incidentally, looked the most powerful and busi-
nesslike of the lot.
But, it was the submarines that formed the real Pièce de résistance of
the display. Of these there were twenty-four of diverse types, among them
being the sister boats, Requin and Souffler, which have just been completed
at Cherbourg arsenal. It was from the deck of the Souffler that President
Doumergue reviewed the fleet, and the fact that he did so may signify
the unbounded faith which Frenchmen have in the deadly powers of the
underwater arm. As is well known, these craft constitute more than half
of the 120 new naval units which France has built and authorized since
the treaty. The Requin class are large boats of 1,130 tons, carrying one
gun and sixteen torpedoes. In outline they resemble the later German
U-boats, although French experts indignantly repudiate any hint of in-
spiration from the designers of hated Bocheland.
France hopes in the not remote future to command a fleet of 100 sub-
marines, by means of which and the cooperation of fifty big destroyers and
swarms of aircraft she looks forward to dominating the Mediterranean.
Very possibly she will do it. In any case, those waters will be decidedly
unhealthy for a hostile dreadnaught when the new French mosquito fleet is
in being.
A dozen sloops and mine sweepers of no great military value rounded off
the Cherbourg armada. Taken as a whole, its fighting power was not
appreciably above that of a single battle squadron of the British or Ameri-
can Navies, although the French crowds who cheered with so much ferver
seemed blissfully ignorant of the fact.
But, the future sea power of the republic is not to be measured by this
somewhat nondescript array of ships. A few years hence their place will
have been taken by twice the number of new craft, all designed on the basis
of war experience. Meanwhile, the existing fleet is used as a school for
training the officers and men who will handle the fleet of tomorrow. It
puts in a great deal of time at sea practicing battle evolutions, carrying out
gunnery and torpedo exercises and maneuvering in all conditions of weather.
What impressed me most during this visit to Cherbourg was the change
which has taken place in the French naval personnel. Having known the
pre-war navy fairly well, the contrast between the human element of 1914
and that of 1925 is, to me, quite remarkable. The typical French sea officer
of pre-war days was a scientist first and a sailor afterward, but his suc-
cessor of today typifies the happy mean between the two.
Ignoring differences in uniform, these bronzed, smooth-faced men might
be mistaken anywhere for British or American naval officers. They are, as
an English critic put it, "as keen as mustard" on their jobs. Their hearts
are obviously in their profession, of which they are intensely proud, and
they trust, and are trusted by their men. Of course there are exceptions,
but the old type of dreamy officer, who was more interested in Voltaire
and transcendental mathematics than in the manual of seamanship, seems
to me well-nigh extinct.
As with the executives, so with the enlisted men. These, as always,
are drawn mainly from the hardy seafaring communtities of Normandy and
Brittany, but they have improved enormously in smartness and bearing. It
is true that there is a malcontent minority which furtively distributes Com-


  p. 1764 (#696)                      #

1764
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
munist literature through the mess decks and is able, now and again, to
stir up a mutinous spirit among the greener recruits; but I am told on high
authority that the discipline and morale of the enlisted personnel in the
mass are beyond criticism, and the fleeting impression I was able to obtain
bears out this statement. It would certainly be foolish to ignore or minimize
the French Navy as a factor in the present and future balance of world
power.
French Navy Notes
The Naval and Military Record, 15 July, 1925.—The Riff War is taking
a disquieting turn, not only for France but also for Great Britain, that is
the greatest Moslem Power and stands to lose the most if Abdel Krim has
his own way. France is paying a terrible price for not understanding
sooner that Spain was fighting against the pugnacious Riff mountaineers
the battle of Europe. Gross and much regretted was the blunder of Premier
Herriot, when thoughtlessly and for reasons of internal politics he refused
the Moroccan collaboration Primo de Riveira offered him: greater still
will be the mistake of England if she fails to see in time the warnings on the
wall. Colonial warfare is assuming new shape and portent, since Germany,
having lost her own colonies in the mad 1914 venture, decided that her
victors should likewise lose theirs. Abdel Krim's well equipped army in the
Riff is merely a wing of the great Sovietic forces that are attacking France
at home with success.
The 1925 shipbuilding program has just been voted by the Senate, after
an animated and interesting debate. It will mean a substantial addition
to the French naval list, although only 35,000,000 francs are to be spent this
year on the units to be laid down, which means that the main progress will
be made next year. The 10,000-ton cruiser will be, but for a few minor
ameliorations, similar to the Duquesne and Tourville (185 meters long, 19
wide, 6.30 meter draught, 130,000 h.p., 35 knots, eight guns of 8-in. in axial
twin turrets of special anti-gas design, eight anti-aerial quick-firers firing
bomb shells of wide explosive radius, four triple torpedo tubes copied from
English types, and two light scouting seaplanes to carry small bombs). They
will be fine ships, no doubt, but on paper, at least, inferior to the larger
10,000-ton Italian Trente and Trieste, these being longer, wider, and better
armed since they carry twelve anti-aerial guns of greater power and sixteen
torpedo tubes, and as the same time have more powerful engines. The
Washington Conference, that adopted the 10,000-ton limit, apparently forgot
to define what is previously a 10,000-ton cruiser. It is surmised that the
cleverly-designed Italian cruisers are very fine indeed. It is expected
that the adoption of quadruple turrets in future French ships will restore
to the French side superiority for the utilisation militaire du déplacement
by permitting an armament of ten guns-eight in two quadruple turrets,
two in single turrets on the sides, giving an end-on fire of six 8-in. weapons,
superior to anything yet designed
The three 2,650-ton flotilla leaders, of which two are already ordered at
Lorient, will be superior to the Chacal type in structural robustness, motor
power, and armament; they will carry cruiser calibers, probably the
latest improvement of the 5.5-in. type, which is logical, superiority of range
over ordinary destroyers being necessary in flotilla mother-ships. More-
over, the advent of numerous 35-knot cruisers, themselves redoubtable
destroyers of destroyers, calls for a substantial increase in the speed of
flotilla leaders. We are in for a tremendous competition of speed that
will entail a fast depreciation of existing flotillas.
The four torpilleurs d'escadre, on the point of being ordered, will mark
a slight progress on the eighteen units of similar type now in hand (Simoun-


  p. 1765 (#697)                      #

1925]
1765
Professional Notes
Alcyon series) of 1,455 to 1,500 tons normal displacement. The armament
of four 5.1-in. weapons is considered sufficient, excelling that of all British
and American destroyers in commission; robustness and speed are the
points requiring attention.
The seven submarines, already ordered in Cherbourg, Lorient, and Brest
arsenals, will be improved copies of the Requin, Souffler, and Marsouin, that
are undergoing trials and giving satisfaction. There is nothing experimental
in them, but tried systems of motors. Their speed is moderate, not exceed-
ing 16 knots on the surface, but the shape and robustness of the bows and
hulls and of the endurance of the motors enable the nominal rate of speed
to be maintained at sea. With their sixteen 22-in. torpedoes apiece, the
sixteen submersibles of that class already in hand will mean a valuable
reinforcement to the French underwater flotillas, especially as they have been
designed for ocean warfare and can keep the sea for over thirty days at a
stretch. Twenty-one further units of so-called premiere classe are projected
to be laid down from 1926 to 1929.
In addition, two submarine mine-layers are to be ordered of the improved
Chailley type. The paris Section Technique has carefully studied this
effective and relatively economical type of defensive craft; lengthy post-
war comparative experiments, still going on, have been conducted in the
Mediterranean and in the Channel with the six sousmarins mouilleurs de
mines in service: viz., the Callot, of 1,300 tons; Chailley, of 1,200 tons ;
René-Audry (ex-Boche), of 1,600 tons; Reveillé (ex-Boche), of 980 tons ;
and Astree and Amaranthe, of 550 tons (submerged), that carry from
thirty to sixty mines with four different systems of installation. The
Normand and Gironde firms have specialized in this class of craft. The
Callot minelayer (Schneider Diesels) and the submersible Lagrange have
just completed a prolonged endurance test in the Mediterranean. A re-
serve supply of efficient mines is being prepared. All-round progress has
been realized, and the French Navy, that commenced the war with rather
inferior torpedoes and mines (nine different systems!) has well regained the
ground lost.
A large mine-laying cruiser is to be laid down shortly at Lorient; she
is intended for ocean warfare, colonial defense, and to be a sort of mining
flotilla mother-ship. A 19-knot seaplane carrier has, besides, been ordered
for general use. Had such a ship been available at the present moment,
operations against the Riff rebels would have been greatly facilitated. At
the same time, it would have been more economical and far more speedy
to convert a liner into a seaplane carrier, in imitation of what Great Britain,
Italy, and Spain have done with success.
The question of naval dirigibles is anew on the carpet. Their partisans
are many in the service, especially since the cost of fast cruisers is growing
at a rapid rate. Colonel de Grenedan, the father of the late commander
of the ill-fated Dixmude, has submitted to the Commissions de la Marine a
strong plea in favor of a return to the dirigible program that has been
abandoned as a consequence of the loss, he says, est le croiseur par ex-
cellence des marines pauvaes; it costs to build ten times less than a
cruiser, consumes per mile eight times less fuel, has a speed at least twice
superior and three times greater radius of action, possesses a radius of vision
twenty times superior, and is 100 times less vulnerable, besides requiring a
crew thirty times less numerous, and requires three months only to be com-
pleted instead of thirty. “Few eggs is one basket,” such is the rational re-
tort that well-managed navies must give to the growing powers of de-
struction ; that operates in favor of dirigibles. The material and human loss
caused to France by the Dixmude disaster was twenty-seven times inferior
to that which the Suffren (12,750 tons) catastrophe entailed. These con-


  p. 1766 (#698)                      #

1766
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
vincing arguments instilled new life into the existing French dirigible
flotillas, that are awaking anew to aerial activity.
On the other hand, Senator Cheron, in the name of the Upper Commis-
sion de la Marine, raised three points: viz., Helium gas, necessary for
safety, is at a prohibitive price; even helium-filled dirigibles would be at
the mercy of fighting seaplanes, that are twice as speedy and very much less
vulnerable; and, thirdly, the English Navy, as the result of long experience
and many tests, has given over the gas-bag. Yet, German experts are busy
improving the Friedrichshafen dirigible plant; that, too, deserves attention.
Interesting points are to be noted in the recent naval debate in the
Senate. There was not a single hostile vote to the Navy, in contrast with
the Chamber that contains anti-navy Communists. The submarine program,
though comprising twenty-one units now in hand, and thirty-six more to
construct from 1925 to 1929, was judged to be totally insufficient by many
senators; and if new submarines were not added to the list it was solely for
the sake of not delaying the taking in hand of the ships voted by the
Chamber. Again, the creation was urged of a Central Technical Com-
mittee, comprising only practical men, naval and non-naval (no windbags),
and having for its rôle research and to find new weapons, more economi-
cal and effective, better ships, and better motors—a right course, since
progress and efficiency are synonymous, but impossible now as l'adieux
paperasserie (Admiral Darrieus) is more than ever submerging the whole
French naval service, routine work taking up the best time of those con-
structors who ought to be heart and soul absorbed by ship-designing. The
English, Italian, and American Navies are much better off in that vital
respect. French public opinion's ignorance of the sea and of its life-and-
death importance Senator Cheron eloquently deplored.
UNITED STATES
“Old Ironsides” Campaign
(Information Circular) Lieutenant John A. Lord, U. S. N., the naval
constructor who has been assigned the task of rebuilding the U. S. S. Con-
stitution, the famous fighting frigate, after a careful survey has reported to
Rear Admiral L. R. de Steiguer, commandant of the First Naval District,
that any attempt to dock the historic ship in her present condition might
result in her collapse and make her restoration impossible.
Most of the job of rebuilding "Old Ironsides” must be done while she
is afloat, for the moment that she rests on her keel and on bilge blocks in
drydock the vertical pressure on the center lines of the badly decayed
frigate will cause her docks to buckle and in all probability fall to pieces.
This was the fate of the old wooden frigate Richmond some years ago when
she was placed in drydock at the Norfolk Navy Yard. Her decks buckled
and her lines became so distorted that the Navy Department was forced
to condemn her.
While "Old Ironsides" is afloat the pressure is evenly distributed, and
the work of rebuilding above the water line will proceed without mishap.
Then, with an elaborate system of shoring her up, she can be placed in a
drydock to have her hull rebuilt.
Lieutenant Lord comes of a long line of Maine wooden-ship builders and
is the only expert that the Navy Department could muster to rebuild the
Constitution when the school children of the nation raise $500,000, the
amount necessary for her restoration. The Benevolent and Protective
Order of Elks, upon the invitation of the Secretary of the Navy, have made
plans to make contact with every school in the nation and collect the chil-
dren's pennies, dimes, and nickels during the week of October 19-24.


  p. 1767 (#699)                      #

1925)
1767
Professional Notes
Hawaii's Naval Need; Comments by British
By Hector C. Bywater, Baltimore Sun, 20 July, 1925.—London, July 2.-
American press stories of the naval maneuvers off Hawaii were studied
with deep interest by European observers who are hoping that some more
authoritative version of the proceedings will in due course be made public.
Meanwhile, the newspaper reports, being more or less unanimous, are
accepted as giving a fairly accurate narrative of what took place. The
impression they convey is that the maneuvers were planned not so much with
the idea of working out definite problems of strategy as for the purpose of
exposing the military weakness of the Hawaiian Islands and so bringing
Congress and the country at large into the right mood for granting the
money necessary to make good the most obvious deficiencies.
If this was really the object in view it seems to have been achieved,
judging from statements made subsequently by members of Congress who
were present.
It is, however, matter for surprise that such a demonstration should have
been needed. The enormous importance of this insular group as the key
factor of American defense in the Pacific is self-evident. It would be
physically impossible for the United States to conduct any serious war
operations, either defensive or offensive, in that ocean unless there existed
in Hawaii an adequate and well-found fleet base.
At present, it seems, no such base does exist. Under ordinary tidal con-
ditions Pearl Harbor cannot be entered by battleships even at normal draft,
to say nothing of damaged ships which might be drawing forty feet or
more. Clearly, therefore, the first requirment is a deepening of the chan-
nel to at least forty-five feet. Until this has been done Pearl Harbor must
continue to rank as a second-class base of limited war value.
Next in importance is the provision of additional docks for dreadnaughts.
With only one dock available the plight of a fleet which had suffered heavy
damage in an engagement would be desperate. Battered ships would either
have to wait their turn for repairs or be towed 2.000 miles to the American
mainland. In either case the delay might have disastrous results.
Nor is it only for ships damaged in action that docks are required.
Unless a warship is periodically docked and cleaned she loses her speed,
and it should not be overlooked that the speed of a fleet is that of its
slowest unit. It was only because all of the ships were docked and refitted
at regular intervals that the British grand feet was able to maintain a
uniform standard of efficiency during the World War.
At the Singapore base, where it is most improbable that more than half
the British fleet will ever be stationed at one time, there is to be dry dock
accommodation for two dreadnaughts, and possibly a floating dock for a
third ship of this type. It will be seen, therefore, that the building of
additional battleship docks in Hawaii is a requirement of the most urgent
importance.
Naval onlookers here are less impressed by statements of Oahu's vulner-
ability to attack, simply because they do not believe the Hawaiian group
lies within the radius of heavy assault from any quarter.
In the recent maneuvers the "Blue" forces approximated to the strength
of the Japanese Navy (vide The Sun for April 28), which was assumed
to have crossed the Pacific with its full force of ten capital ships and used
them to cover a landing of 30,000 troops on Oahu, the entire American bat-
tle fleet being temporarily imprisoned in the Atlantic by the destruction of
the Panama locks.
That the whole scheme of the Hawaiian war game rested upon such
far-fetched hypotheses explains why its strategic significance is discounted in
naval circles. Leaving aside the extremely improbable event of the entire


  p. 1768 (#700)                      #

1768
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
battle fleet's being in the Atlantic at a time when relations with Japan were
clouded ever so faintly, let us briefly examine the logistics of the strategical
problem here postulated.
Japan's ten capital ships represent her total resources in this type, and
losses among them could not be replaced in time to be of war service.
That she would send this fleet as a unit to essay the conquest of a strongly
fortified enemy base 3,400 miles distant is incredible. The presence of
numerous auxiliary ships and at least a score of troop transports would re-
strict the speed of the fleet to 12 or 14 knots, so that the voyage would
occupy ten or twelve days.
When it was approaching Hawaii this unwieldy armada would be liable
to attack by aircraft and submarines, for the war game credited the defense
with ninety of the former and twenty of the latter. It would arrive at the
objective with much of its fuel burned and no prospect of obtaining fresh
supplies unless American stocks of oil and coal were captured intact.
The ten capital ships would first have to silence the shore defenses, which
include a number of long-range guns and heavy howitzers. If experience at
the Dardanelles and on the Flanders coast counts for aught, this initial
operation would be foredoomed to failure, having regard to the forces
available on each side.
If the Japanese battleships fired at long range, their shooting would be
mostly ineffective; if they engaged the forts at close range, they would
stand a good chance of being disabled or sunk. What the troop transports
would be doing all of this time we are left to conjecture, but it would be
strange if they did not suffer severely from air and submarine attacks.
However, if by some miracle these difficulties were overcome, the next
step would be to throw ashore 30,000 men on the northern coast of Oahu,
which is supposed not to be commanded by any of the batteries. As the
landing would have to be made in boats, nosing their way through channels
in the coral reef, no big guns or other weighty material could be brought
ashore. In the war game a skeleton force of 1,500 men contrived to land
between dark and dawn, but when 30,000 were involved the operation might
take days.
And what would the defenders be doing while this leisurely invasion was
proceeding? Despite the naval bombardment, it would certainly be feasible
to rush mobile guns to positions whence the boats and landing beaches
could be brought under fire, leaving a machine-gun barrage to account for
such isolated parties of the enemy as managed to scramble ashore. As a last
line of defense there would be the complete mobile army division which is
stationed at Schofield Barracks.
Such are a few of the practical hindrances to a successful invasion of
Hawaii by the Japanese. Without terming it absolutely impossible, it may
fairly be described as a thousand to one chance. Since the Japanese in pre-
vious wars have always shown a shrewd appreciation of the elements of
strategy, it is in the last degree unlikely that they would ever dream of
committing themselves to an enterprise of this foolhardy character.
AVIATION
Commercial Air Transport
Aviation, 13 July, 1925.—Now that the National Air Transport has
ordered ten Carrier Pigeons to start its New York-Chicago service, there
will be some figuring done as to just how much flying these planes could
do. As the N.A.T. does not plan to fly on Saturdays or Sundays, the
number of round trips per year may average about 250, making allowance
for holidays and trips cancelled on account of bad weather. The round
trip is about 1,500 mi, to which should be added 10 per cent for ferrying
and testing. This would give a total mileage for one year of 412,500 mi.


  p. 1769 (#701)                      #

1925)
1769
Professional Notes
Taking this route mileage and using 100 mi./hr. as an average speed we find
that the ten planes will be required to fly 4,000 hr. per year or 400 per
machine which means a total average use of a machine of 1.6 hr. per flying
day or a little over one hour for the calendar year. As the life of a
modern airplane can be considered to be 200,000 mi., the above estimating
would indicate that ten Carrier Pigeons would last five years-eliminating
crashes.
It will be recalled that Colonel Searles of the Daimler Hire and later
of the Imperial Airways claimed that no airplane could make money un-
less it flew eight or more hours a day. Furthermore, he actually proved
that airplanes can do that much flying every day.
When all the enthusiasm over air transport has calmed down and costs
and profits are the main objectives, then just two questions will be upper-
most in the minds of the directors of the N.A.T. How much traffic was
there? What mileage did we get from our equipment? After all is said
about the enterprising vision of pioneers in air transport, the net result
will probably center around these two factors. We have seen estimates
that called for a complete rebuilding of a service plane after every 500
flying hours, and after every 100 hr. for engines. These estimates also
did not include the crashes. On this basis each of the ten Carrier Pigeons
would have to be rebuilt once every year. It will be one of the most
interesting phases of the development to observe the departures from air
mail practice of a company headed by men with aircraft experience. Nearly
everyone has heard the statement made that if the air mail is inefficient
it is because it is limited by governmental restrictions, civil service, and, to
a minor degree, political considerations. Everyone will watch the planes
of the N.A.T. with this in mind.
Civil and Military Aircraft
Aviation, 6 July, 1925.-In spite of the many statements to the contrary
it can be shown that aircraft for government uses and those for civilian
purposes are basically different. Both as regards cost and structural
strength, the two are as wide apart as the poles. The military and naval
people think of cost as the last item in considering an airplane's value.
Sacrifices are made at every step of design, fabrication, and test to get
the required performance. Just the contrary is true with aircraft for
commercial purposes. Safety and earning power are the prime considera-
tions with these types. Costs must be reckoned with continually and no
compromises are allowable when life or property is to be transported.
With these fundamental differences in mind and an incentive provided in the
form of substantial rewards for advanced designs, the constructors would
not be so enamoured by the size of government orders that they would
consider commercial types of machines as a side line.
The Uses of Water Recovery
Aviation, 6 July, 1925.-Water recovery is now in use as regular equip-
ment on the airships Shenandoah and Los Angeles, and it has been con-
clusively demonstrated that an amount of water can be recovered from the
exhaust gases from the engines, in fight, which more than enuals the
weight of fuel consumed in porducing those exhaust gases. While this is
an interesting novelty, it may be wondered just what the value of the system
may be, and it is the purpose of this article to outline a few uses to which
it may be put.
The first is the conservation of lifting gas. In an airship it is necessary
to maintain an approximate balance between the lift exerted by the helium
or hydrogen in the gas cells and the weight, represented by structure, crew,
fuel, ballast, and so forth. If there is an excess of lift it may be corrected


  p. 1770 (#702)                      #

1770
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
by permitting some of the lifting gas to escape, while an excess of weight
is taken care of by throwing over ballast. In fight, correction may also be
effected by flying the ship nose up or nose down. In this case the hull acts
somewhat as the wings of an airplane, and the reaction of the air upon it
gives dynamic lift, which increases the lift if the nose is pointed upwards,
and augments the weight if the nose is pointed down. This method of cor-
rection, however, is limited in its application, and, while it may be used to
overcome slight discrepancies in equilibrium, it cannot take care of that
caused by the burning of fuel. This obviously results in a reduction of the
gross weight of the ship, which calls for the release of lifting gas to
maintain equilibrium.
This is an expensive proceeding, especially with helium. To operate the
Shenandoah at cruising speed, it would be necessary to valve helium to
the value of $1,000 per hour. Even if this could be afforded, there is not
enough helium available to refill ships operated in this fashion. Conse-
quently, if helium is to be used at all, some means must be found to prevent
its waste. With water recovery the gross weight of the ship may be kept
constant, so that it becomes unnecessary to release any lifting gas.
With hydrogen, it is usually considered that the gas is so cheap that it
may be allowed to escape without serious loss. Alternatively, it is some-
times argued that water recovery involves the installation of weighty ap-
paratus, and that the reduction in useful load accompanying this cannot
be tolerated. Figures of actual costs are unfortunately not yet available, but
it is possible to show that the saving in the cost of hydrogen is greatly in
excess of the value of the space sacrificed.
Taking as a basis estimates made by Commander Burney for his proposed
service from England to India, which is now actually being proceeded in
a modified form, and converting his figures on the basis of five dollars to
a pound, his cost of hydrogen per annum becomes $500,000. The cor-
responding figure for depreciation, insurance, and repairs is $1,750,000 per
annum. On the basis of the results obtained on the Shenandoah the weight
of apparatus necessary to effect water recovery may be placed at less than
2 per cent of the gross lift of the ship; on the large ships now authorized
for the England to India service the deadweight will amount to 50 per cent
of the gross lift. To restore the original useful load to a ship equipped with
water recovery would therefore involve increasing its gross lift by 4 per
cent. This would increase the capital charges by an approximately cor-
responding amount, so that, to carry the useful load originally contemplated,
water recovery involves an increase in the annual charges of $70,000, and
offers a saving of $500,000. The ratio between these figures indicates that
water recovery should be a very useful proposition, even with hydrogen.
In actual practice it is probable that water recovery will result, not in a
loss of useful load as considered above, but in an actual increase. An
airship must carry emergency ballast, and without water recovery this must
be taken aboard at the start and is a deduction from possible useful load.
With the new system the recovered water may be used as ballast, so that
more useful load may be taken on at the start and the ballast manufactured
en route. This might involve the possible discharge of fuel to meet an emer-
gency arising early in the course of a flight, but special "slip tanks" are
provided for emergencies in any case, and to extend their use to this added
case would seem permissible since it would not prejudice the safety of the
ship and would permit useful gains.
The amount of useful load that must be sacrificed to provide emergency
ballast is a very debatable point. The war-time practice of the Germans,
it is understood, was to fly with no ballast at all; it can only be assumed that
they treated maneuvering risks as added war hazards and risked the loss of
ships from this cause in order to obtain increased military value. Such risks
cannot be taken in peace time. An idea of the absolute safe minimum may


  p. 1771 (#703)                      #

1925]
1771
Professional Notes
be gained from the amount carried by the R-34 in crossing the Atlantic:
this represented 5 per cent of the gross lift, and in that case, if ever, useful
load could not be sacrificed unnecessarily. One or two examples of emer-
gencies in which such ballast would prove useful may serve to illustrate the
necessity for an adequate reserve.
The first is the loss of a gas cell. The material forming the walls is a
very light fabric, and though strong enough to meet all ordinary loads, is
none the less delicate and liable to be punctured by accident. Such a
puncture could occur, for example, through some articles coming in contact
with a propeller blade. This would damage the propeller, and the article,
probably with pieces of the propeller in addition, would be thrown outwards.
As there is about one chance in three of any one of these pieces being thrown
into the hull, and in this case the one piece would very probably also pierce
the gas cell, the danger is an appreciable one. It cannot be said for certain
that a careless passenger might not drop something overboard and that this
article might not cause the puncturing of a gas cell, nor is it certain that
a cell might not be punctured from some other accidental cause just as a
surface ship is liable to have a watertight compartment flooded by accident.
ſt therefore seemis prudent to require that an airship should be able to
keep the air in such an emergency. To do this she must be able to jettison
weight equal to the lift of the lost cell, and under present conditions of
operation there are times toward the end of a flight when she would not
be able to do this, since the weight to be sacrificed might amount to 9 or 10
per cent of the gross lift in the case of the largest cell. With water re-
covery the emergency could be met in the early stages of a flight as well as
at present, and could also be met at any other time without involving any
additional sacrifice in lift.
Another emergency that might arise is the complete exhaustion of the
fuel supply. A large reserve will, of course, always be carried, but even
when this amounts to 50 per cent of that necessary for a given journey under
normal conditions, head winds might be encountered and the ship find her-
self with insufficient fuel to reach a base. Without ballast she would in all
probability come to earth during the first night after the stoppage of her
engines. This would not be a violent descent, but a gradual fall due to the
loss of lift from temparature variations between gas and air. In the worst,
and usual case, the gas would become superheated during the day, attaining
a temperature in excess of atmospheric, due to the absorption of some
of the sun's heat by the outer cover and the transference of a portion of
this to the gas itself. This would cause what is known as false lift, and
its immediate effect on a ship with engines stopped would be to cause it to
rise to pressure height and to lose gas until the remaining lift balanced the
weight of the ship. As soon as the sun ceased to shine the gas would start
to cool to the atmospheric temperature, the volume and the lift would fall
in consequence, and the ship would descend. A similar effect might occur,
due to a rise in the air temperature. So long as air and gas remained at
the same temperature and the gas cells were less than full, equilibrium would
not be disturbed, but as there would probably be a lag in the rise of the gas
temperature there would be a loss of lift. Even though this loss of lift
might be small, if the ship had no ballast available she would settle to the
ground.
Under such conditions a commercial ship would probably find herself with
perhaps 5 per cent of water ballast and this would enable her to keep the
air for one night. The next day superheat would probably occur again
and on the loss of this she would come to earth. With water recovery,
about 25 per cent of the gross lift would be available as ballast and a ship
so equipped could stay up for several days, during which time something
could probably be done toward rescuing her.


  p. 1772 (#704)                      #

1772
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
With hydrogen there is a risk of the destruction of the ship through
the burning of the lifting gas; this is eliminated by the use of helium-at a
price. This price is 8 per cent of the gross lift, which is a very severe tax
on the performance of an airship. While the added safety conferred, as
compared with hydrogen as used in the past, may justify this price, the
possibility exists of securing safety by other means at a lesser price. For
example, mixtures of helium and hydrogen, and combination gas cells with
the hydrogen protected by a layer of helium, have been suggested. These
may or may not be successful; but another method is available as an adjunct
to water recovery. This is the insulation of the hydrogen by a surrounding
layer of cooled exhaust gas.
It is known that such an insulation is remarkably effective as a protec-
tion against fire, being proof even against incendiary bullets except when
these are directed in a stream against a single spot. Nitrogen was first sug-
gested for this purpose, and the use of exhaust gas is at present being
strongly advocated by Commander Boothby for the large ships now being
started in England. By merely filling the space between the gas cells and
the outer cover with exhaust gas and modifying the ventilation arrange-
ments, it is at least possible that a degree of protection against fire com-
parable with that obtainable from helium may be secured. There is little
doubt that it would prove completely effective against lightning, and for
peace time uses would probably fail only against a fire that would endanger
the ship without igniting the hydrogen. Even on a helium ship there is the
danger of fire from gasoline. It is very difficult to keep the long fuel lines
absolutely tight, and a leak in the keel space offers a better chance for the
start of a fire than the hydrogen does. Such a fire might be extinguished on
a helium ship, whereas it would probably spread to hydrogen were that
gas present, and cause the destruction of the ship. With exhaust gas in-
sulation the fuel tanks and lines will be within the insulation space so that
the danger of a fire from the gasoline will be less than in a helium filled
ship without insulation.
This protection cannot be secured for nothing, but if used in conjunction
with water recovery the necessary exhaust is available, ready cooled, and
the cost of completing the installation should not exceed one per cent of the
gross lift, at a liberal estimate. This figure covers apparatus to render the
gas non-injurious to the gas cells, fabric partitions within the hull, and gas
delivery arrangements.
Finally, water recovery offers two additional minor advantages; it acts
as a complete silencer to the exhaust noise, which is a matter of distinct
interest when passengers are being carried, and the recovered water may be
filtered and used for purposes other than ballast. It has actually been
rendered potable, and should certainly be available for radiator reserve and
for passengers' use for washing, and so forth.
Summarizing, then, with helium the use of water recovery to conserve
the gas is essential, and even with hydrogen conservation results in a very
considerable net saving; the process provides reserve buoyancy, and hence
protection against emergencies, in excess of that which could reasonably
be provided by other means; it makes possible an increase in the useful
load, since the apparatus weighs less than the minimum landing ballast
that must be carried, which may be manufactured en route instead of being
taken on at the start; it provides protection against fire comparable with
that obtainable from helium at a price in lift of one per cent of the gross
lift as against 8 per cent; it completely silences the noise from the engine
exhausts, and provides water suitable for radiator and for domestic purposes.


  p. 1773 (#705)                      #

1925)
1773
Professional Notes
ENGINEERING
The Motor Passenger Liner "Asturias"
The Engineer, 10 July, 1925.—(See Frontispiece). On the seventh inst.,
the motor ship Asturias was launched from Messrs. Harland and Wolff's
East Yard at Belfast by Her Excellency the Duchess of Abercorn in
the presence of Lord Kylsant, the chairman of the Royal Mail Steam
Packet Company and a distinguished company. The occasion was of un-
usual importance, not only because of the substantial addition to the Royal
Mail fleet that the vessel represents, followed as she is to be by a sister ship
well on the way, but also because she is the largest and most powerful
vessel that has yet been produced. The use of motor driven vessels for
small sizes has been notably increasing for some years, but opinions are
divided as to their suitability for large powers and heavy tonnage. Messrs.
Harland and Wolff's reputation as successful pioneers in the increase of the
size of vessels and their propelling machinery makes their production of
this vessel a piece of practical evidence of which account must be taken
in the controversy now pending.
The Asturias is of 22,000 tons gross register, and how far the Royal
Mail Company has gone since it began to carry mail, passengers and cargo
in 1851, is suggested fairly by reference to the R.M.S. Teviot, with which
its interprise began, a vessel of 1,744 tons, propelled by paddle wheels with
the help of sails. The leading dimensions of the Asturias are: length,
655 ft. 8 in.; breadth, 78 ft.; and depth, 45 ft.; and she is driven by a pair of
Harland, Burmeister and Wain, 8-cylinder four-cycle, double-acting Diesel
engines, running at 155 r.p.m. The engines develop 10,000 i.h.p. each, and
deliver their 20,000 h.p. on two shafts, thus enabling the normal twin-
crew practice to be maintained. The engines are shown in Frontispiece, and,
as will be seen, follow generally the lines of previous four-cycle double-
acting engines by the same makers. Two three-stage air compressors ar-
ranged in tandem are mounted at the forward end of each engine, and driven
off an extension of the crankshaft, providing compressed air for fuel injec-
tion. The output of each of these compressors is by itself nearly enough to
serve the engine at full output. The fuel pumps are also driven off the main
engine. The engines have forced lubrication throughout, oil serving also
for cooling the piston, and fresh water being used in the cylinder jackets
for cooling. Maneuvering air is provided by three two-stage air compressors,
charging six steel reservoirs at twenty-five atmospheres, and like the other
engine room auxiliaries, the compressors are electrically driven by inde-
pendent motors. A small emergency steam-driven compressor is also
provided, and two oil-fired vertical boilers supply steam for cooking pur-
poses, and so forth.
Supercharging
The Engineer, 10 July, 1925.—The production of a maximum of work
from a minimum of material, consistent with reliable service, is the broad
basis of commercial efficiency which finds ample expresssion in engineering
products of all kinds. It is reflected in the progress of internal combustion
engineering, by continual efforts to increase the power output from a given
weight of material, an aim which, in addition to its commercial economic
aspect, possesses features of technical importance, as, for instance, in aero-
nautical engineering, where weight reduction is of primary importance.
For some time internal combustion engineers have been aware that they
are fast approaching finality in the application of this fundamental com-
mercial principle to the simpler, long-tried types of engines, and that any
considerable further advance in power output is only to be expected from
some new departure. A radical change, however, is improbable, and is


  p. 1774 (#706)                      #

1774
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
not looked for by those concerned in the face of the proven thoroughness
of the principles already applied. Rather is attention being turned to the
development of auxiliary mechanisms, by which to improve the efficiency
of the general types now so well established. Thus, we hear of extensive
researches in progress on waste heat recovery and on supercharging. It
is with the latter that we are now more particularly concerned.
Supercharging is rather an ambiguous expression, in that it is applied
unconditionally to any means of employing a compressor for introducing
the charge into an internal combustion engine. In consequence, it frequently
gives rise to misconceptions. Although known before, this particular use
of the compressor first found serious application during the war, to over-
come the loss of engine power, caused by the rarified atmosphere, when
flying at high altitudes. In effect, it increased the density of the air, thereby
insuring a combustible mixture of the same quality, and having the same
properties as when flying near the ground. But, it is open to question
whether some word other than supercharging should not be found to describe
what, after all, is only a method of correcting the deterioration of normal
combustion conditions. Although the cycle is similar, the conditions are quite
different when the compressor is applied for introducing the mixture to the
combustion chamber of a land engine. In the case of the aircraft engine, the
compressor is necessary at high altitudes to maintain the normal fuel con-
sumption, i.e., to provide sufficient air to maintain the normal power output;
but in the case of the land engine the compressor is applied solely to increase
the specific power, or power output, in proportion to the capacity of the cylin-
der, and so involves increased fuel consumption. This, after a certain stage
is passed, means increased mean temperature. General application of the
term supercharging to both sets of conditions gives rise to misunderstandings
between those more intimately concerned with aero-engines who do not
experience this temperature effect, and others who are primarily. interested
in obtaining higher specific powers at ground level. Supercharging is the
subject of considerable experimental work now in progress in this country,
Italy, Sweden, and elsewhere. It is recognized that far-reaching effects may
result from the perfection of a method of introducing into engines a weight
of mixture considerably greater than that which corresponds with the normal
capacity of the cylinders. In fact, the principle, in addition to offering
higher powers from a given weight of metal, holds out prospects of over-
coming one of the inherent characteristics which limits the utility of the
internal combustion engine, namely, its lack of flexibility. If that can be
achieved, we are within sight of what will be a welcome and revolutionary
development in motor car design-the elimination of the gear box, an un-
desirable device which is responsible for the wastage of millions of gallons
of fuel. A reduction in the size of the motor car engine to that required
for normal working conditions on level roads, with the gear box replaced
by a supercharging device, which would provide the necessary reserve of
power for hill-climbing and bursts of speed, is not an inconceivable develop-
ment. Moreover, as the motor would, generally, be run at a speed corre-
sponding to the maximum efficiency, such a system would offer a solution
of the variable power engine problem, and, indeed, a complete solution if
the effect of the supercharger could be proportioned to any load on the
motor. Another prospect held out by the supercharging principle is that
of utilizing the heat generated by the compressor, and the pulverizing effect
of the air blast, to facilitate the combustion of heavier fuels.
It is realized that much costly research will be necessary before the
developments foreshadowed can be brought to fruition, and the problem
appears to be, to a considerable extent, a metallurgical one. Laboratory
tests have indicated the possibility of increasing the power of existing
motors up to 20 per cent, by means of supercharging, but the temperatures
attained are prohibitive, and cause rapid deterioration of material. The


  p. 1775 (#707)                      #

1925)
1775
Professional Notes
risk of injury is not entirely absent with increases of only 10 per cent,
and as increases approaching that figure are still well within the range of
possibility for many engines, by general improvements and re-design of
existing features, no general development in supercharging seems probable
until metallurgical developments permit the fullest application of the prin-
ciple.
German Admiralty's Proposed Rotorship
The Nautical Gazette, 18 July, 1925.-Details are now available of the
new rotor-ship which will be built by the German Admiralty, says Fairplay.
The vessel will have dimensions of 85 by 13.20 by 5.80 meters, and a
deadweight capacity of 3,000 tons. The hull will be that of an ordinary
freighter, with a cruiser stern and a Flettner rudder. The main propelling
machinery consists of two six-cylinder single-acting four-cycle Diesel engines,
running at 300 revolutions per minute. The power, which amounts to 1,050
b.h.p., is transmitted to a single-screw propeller by a Vulcan hydraulic
clutch gear, and when the vessel is being driven by the wind the engines
can be disengaged and the propeller allowed to revolve freely. The screw
propeller will alone give the ship a speed of ten knots, and the power taken
from the wind may be used either to increase the speed or to replace one or
two engines while these are stopped.
The rotor tower is placed amidships, and has a height of 28 meters
(92 ft.), and a diameter of 7 meters (23 ft.), while the Buckau had two
towers of a height of 15.6 meters (51 ft.), and 2.8 meters (9.2 ft.) diameter.
The projected area of the tower of the new vessel, which is a measure
of the driving power, is thus more than double that of the Buckau towers.
Fine Performance of Motorships
The Nautical Gasette, 25 July, 1925.—The remarkable performance of
the motorships City of Panama and City of San Francisco, operated by
the Panama Mail Steamship Company in the California-Central American
trade, is exciting much favorable comment on the Pacific Coast, and it is
hinted that the owners intend, at some future date, to build other vessels
of this type for the Central American route. The two vessels have now
been operating more than a year, and their repair bills have been almost
wholly negligible. In eight months the City of Panama has required only
a small welding job, costing less than $5, and the upkeep record of the
City of San Francisco is little, if any, less impressive. They are both
powered within twin six-cylinder, four-cycle, single-acting, directly rever-
sible crosshead-type Burmeister and Wain Diesels, developing 1,400 horse-
power, and making 130 revolutions per minute at full speed. The vessels
were built in Sweden but now fly the Panama flag.
The “Aorangi”
The Marine Engineer and Motorship Builder, July, 1925.–From time
to time paragraphs appear in the columns of the daily papers, both home
and colonial, relative to the service performance of the motor liner Aorangi,
which aroused so much interest when she left this country for her maiden
trip early this year, and from these reports it would seem that both owners
and builders must have every reason to be satisfied with their choice of
Diesel engines for the particular service in question. We understand that
on her maiden voyage the Aorangi encountered extremely heavy weather,
both in the Atlantic and in the Pacific, so much so that part of her super-
structure was carried away, and had it not been for the regularity and
precision with which the engines ran, the ship would have been placed
in a very awkward position. One of the latest reports says that she left


  p. 1776 (#708)                      #

1776
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Auckland for Vancouver many hours late owing to a severe rain storm
and that she succeeded in reaching Vancouver several hours ahead of her
scheduled time, thus proving that she has a very ample reserve of speed
and power. The Aorangi is the pioneer large passenger and mail motor
liner and, as such, she occupies a very important position in the marine
engineering world because other owners and other builders are watching
her performance with more than usual care in order to obtain an indication
as to the desirability or otherwise of fitting their new tonnage with Diesel
engines. The next large motor passenger and mail liner, the Gripsholm, was
due originally to go on service early this year but, so far, owing to a
series of strikes in Denmark, where her main engines are being built, she
has been regrettably delayed, and it seems that we shall not see her on the
Atlantic until toward the end of the year. In this case, also, the enterprise
of both builders and owners is to be greatly admired. The Gripsholm will
be as much a pioneer as the Aorangi, but in a different direction, because
she will be the first large ship to be fitted with double-acting Diesel engines;
also she will be the first large motorship on the Atlantic service. The Pacific
service and, in particular, the service which the Union Steam Ship Company
of New Zealand Limited maintains, has seen many pioneering developments
in marine engineering, including the combination steam reciprocating engine
and low-pressure turbine, which has worked very successfully indeed.
6
.....................
2,000
German Diesel Engine Practice*
The Marine Engineer and Motorship Builder, July, 1925.—The new
single-acting six-cylinder four-stroke cycle crosshead type M.A.N. Diesel
engine is the outcome of long experience, both in the construction of low
and high-speed engines of the trunk piston type, as well as in earlier types
of slow-running crosshead engines. The particular engine described in
the present article may be considered as typical as other sizes and powers,
and has the following principal dimensions :
Maximum length ....
.....10,850 mm. (36 ft.).
Maximum width ......... ............... 3,500 mm. (11.5 ft.).
Maximum height above center of shaft ... 7,080 mm. (23.3 ft.).
Maximum height above base of bedplate .. 7,880 mm. (25.8 ft.).
Cylinder, diameter .......
700 mm. (27.5 in.).
Stroke ..
1,400 mm. (4.6 ft.).
Number of cylinders .....
Brake horse-power
Revolutions per min......
108
Mean effective pressure
5.17 atmos. (76 lb. per sq. in.).
Injection air compressor, d eters-
ist stage ......,
700 mm. (27.5 in.).
2nd stage ...........
620 mm. (24.4 in.).
3rd stage ..............
150 mm. (5.94).
Piston Stroke ............
500 mm. (19.65 in.).
Crank shaft, diameter ...,
455 mm. (17.85 in.).
Weight of engine with air bottles, exclusive of flywheel, exhaust mani-
fold and fittings, 270 tons approximate.
The cast iron bedplate is built in two parts, each bolted together. The
bedplate supports eight identical and interchangeable shaft bearings, and
carries below it a steel plate oil drip trough; the used oil being led through
two holes in the trough to the lubricating oil pumps. The main bearings
are lined with white metal, the liners themselves being easily withdrawable.
The upper half of the liners is prevented from rotating, holes being made
in them to enable the bearings to be readily examined. The bearing caps
Abstract of an article appearing in the Zeitschrift des Vereines deutscher Ingenieure.
June 6, 1925.


  p. 1777 (#709)                      #

1925]
1777
Professional Notes
are held down by long through bolts. These, because of their length, are
much less likely to fracture than short tap screws.The crank shaft is made
in two main parts with forged screwed-on flanges; each half is built up by
shrinking on the crank webs to the pins. The scantlings of the shaft satis-
fies Classification Society requirements. The cranks are set at 120°.
The cylinder columns, eight pairs in all, are made of cast iron, of hollow
rectangular section, and are placed immediately above the crank bearings,
thus enabling the spread of the columns to be reduced to a minimum. The
type of column bolting adopted reduces the length of the engine consider-
ably and makes the parts more readily accessible. The cylinders are held
down by long steel bolts, passing through the columns to the bedplate.
The crosshead guides are screwed to adjustable blocks between the columns
on the control side of the engine. These assist considerably to stiffen up
the columns longitudinally. Each set of four pairs of columns supports
one three-cylinder unit, the two units being bolted together over the whole
width. In the designing of these units, as well as the columns and bedplates,
care was taken to evolve a 'form free from likelihood of casting defects.
In each block of cylinders the shrunk cylinder liners are exchangeable.
Between the cylinder block and cover a special cast iron cooling ring is
fitted which takes the top of the cylinder liner, absorbs its heat, leads it
appreciably away, and thus obviates heat stresses in the cylinder castings.
The cylinder covers are each held down by eight bolts. These pass through
the cooling ring, and are bedded to the cylinders. The cover is fitted inside
with a dividing wall placed near the under face of the cover. This wall
serves to restrain the cooling water to the bottom with a consequently
higher speed and greater cooling efficiency.
Between the piston proper (Fig. 1) and the piston rod flange a separate
head is fitted whose ribbing is so designated to convey the cooling water
at suitable speed from the center to the sides of the piston. To supply and
lead away the cooling water telescopic tubes are used, fitted with stuffing
boxes which prevent the leakage of the cooling water into the lubricating
oil. The outer of these telescopic tubes is only connected at its lower end;
the inner and stronger tube is screwed to the piston. The outer, elastic
tube carries the stuffing box and readily adapts itself to the heat of the
engine, thus economizing in packing and ensuring adequate tightness with
but little attention. Water hammer in the supply and exhaust tubes
is counteracted by air vessels. The piston and crank chambers are separated
by plates fitted with stuffing boxes which prevent the dirty oil coming
from the piston and cylinder walls passing through to the oil lubricating
the cranks. The crank shaft and connecting rod arrangement is of the
usual type. The steel connecting rod head is forked and has bronze bear-
ings, the lower crank pin bearings and the crosshead slipper block being
lined with white metal. The crosshead guides are water cooled.
The three-stage air compressor is driven by a bell crank transmission from
an eccentric placed between the two main halves of the crank shafting at
the mid-length of the engine. The second stage is arranged below the first,
and this insures sufficient distribution of the loads coming on the eccentric
and driving pin. The air cooler and oil separator are fitted immediately
adjacent to the compressor.
The engine is lubricated on the forced system, oil being led into each
crank bearing and thence through the center of the crank shaft. As the
shaft is hollow throughout its entire length any disturbance in the oil
circulation can be isolated to one bearing.
In the cylinder cover are arranged the inlet, exhaust, fuel, starting, and
safety valves. The fuel valve is shown in Fig. 2, and is so constructed that
packing previously considered necessary for injection air is avoided. The
needle valve is in an enclosed casing which also contains the rocking lever


  p. 1778 (#710)                      #

1778
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings


U
Lub. Oil
HEERDE
Test Valve
da Fuer
Supply
Check
Valve
SECT. CD
Lub. 0,1
ib
ot
B
101100
SECT. A-8.
FIG. 1.-Piston COOLING ARRANGEMENT AND FUEL VALVE DETAILS
for controlling the needle. On this rocking lever an encased pointer
stamp also acts, and this carries the block upon which the fuel valve lever
presses in opening the needle valve. The stamp previously referred to has a
ball seat at its lower end which closes and opens with the needle valve,
thus avoiding all air loss. The springs of the inlet and exhaust valves are
external, the exhaust valve casing being water cooled. The valve seat is
made of special cast iron connected to the steel valve spindle. The starting
air valve is designed to start up under the pressure of the starting air;
!
0 Overflow
Valve
Der From Injection
Air Container
To Fuel
Valves.
sonjen
24
Fig. 2.--DETAILS OF THE FUEL VALVE


  p. 1779 (#711)                      #

1925)
1779
Professional Notes

Max. Charge
Zero Charge
Running. 6
Running/3.
VIEW FROM
FORWARD.
IE
dib
Stop, Start
Fuel Out
Test Pipe
To Fuel
Valves
no
Up Gear.
Fig. 3.-FUEL PUMP DETAILS
it is, however, controlled by the starting cam. The valve thus only opens
when the pressure in the cylinder is lower than in the air lead and auto-
matically closes when ignition takes place. The escape of hot gases with
this design of starting valve is thus avoided. The safety valve is designed
to take effect at pressures exceeding fifty atmospheres. The valves are
controlled by rocking levers from the camshaft at the level of the cylinder
Reversing Positions
Ahead Astern
E
Test Cock
-PI
Ahead Chamber
Astern Chamber
BE
SECTION A-8.
Fig. 4.-DETAILS OF REVERSING GEAR


  p. 1780 (#712)                      #

1780
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
covers. It is driven from the main shaft between Nos. 3 and 4 cylinders
through a pair of bevel wheels and a lower and upper pair of cone wheels.
The upper pair of cone wheels reduces the shaft revolutions in the ratio of
2:1. The fuel pump shown in Fig. 3 is placed on the camshaft side of the
engine near the central platform. The horizontal intermediate shaft for
driving the central shaft carries an eccentric from which the fuel pump is
driven. The arrangements for varying the fuel change, and hence the
engine power, are fitted to the fuel pump. A safety valve is also fitted
to this pump in order to cut out the fuel supply in case of engine racing or
propeller fracture.
In reversing the engine the camshaft, which carries distinct sets of
ahead and astern cams, is moved axially (see Fig. 4). This motion, at the
instant of reversal, results in a rotation of the valve lever shaft, thus lifting
simultaneously all valve levers and leaving the cams free. The necessary
power for reversing is supplied by compressed air from the injection or
starting air container, this container being connected up with one or other of
the oil chambers by pulling over the reversing levers. The resulting oil
pressure moves the piston, whose motion is transmitted through a rod and
pinion drive to a shaft which, through a cone wheel drive, rotates the cam-
shaft. This, through the movement of the cam levers, displaces the shaft
axially. Finally, the valve levers are brought down to the cams by further
rotation of their shaft.
In starting up compressed air of fifteen to twenty atmospheres pressure
is used. The cylinders are split up into two groups the first of which is
started up on fuel from the control-platform, while the other half is
operated with starting air. In this way it is insured that an effective torque
exists during reversal, thus preventing the sticking of the engine. Stops
are fitted to prevent the starting lever being used before the reversing lever
is hard over. Similarly, the reversing lever can only be moved when the
starting lever is shut off. When the starting lever is shut off the fuel
pumps for the corresponding cylinder group are similarly shut off, and
fuel can only be drawn when the starting lever is moved in.
The hand levers for starting and reversing, for the fuel supply, the in-
jection air pressure, air pump, and lubricating oil pressure regulators are all
placed at the control platform.
Any type of Diesel oil can be used as fuel. With coal tar oil or viscous
high ignition point oils, heating of the oil is necessary in conjunction with the
use of the ignition-oil method of starting up. The specific fuel consump-
tion at full load amounts to 180 g/b.h.p./hour (0.457 lb.) with fuel of a
calorific value of 10,000 k. cal./kg. (18,000 B.Th.U. per lb.). The lubricat-
ing oil consumption amounts to between 0.6 and 0.9 g./b.h.p./hour. Alto-
gether some twenty engines of the above type are at present under construc-
tion for German, Swedish, Dutch, and Italian owners.
ORDNANCE
Gunnery in the Battle of Jutland
By Hector C. Bywater, Baltimore Sun, 30 July, 1925.--London, July 20.-
Although to the general public the Battle of Jutland is ancient history
now, it still remains a subject of lively debate in service circles everywhere.
Early descriptions of the battle have fallen into discredit, for they were
written when the evidence was meager and conflicting, and are therefore
full of inaccuracies. Even Lord Jellicoe's version in his book, The Grand
Fleet, is no longer accepted as authoritative, since it omits all mention of
some of the most important German maneuvers that were executed during
the combat.
High praise is awarded by many British critics to the study of Jutland
which appears in Captain Frothingham's new volume of World War naval
history, although the author, as an American, maintains a perfectly impar-


  p. 1781 (#713)                      #

1925)
1781
Professional Notes
tial attitude, and distributes praise or censure without regard to national
susceptibilities. He has certainly contrived to draw the clearest picture of
Jutland that has come under my notice, and I have waded through a vast
amount of British and German literature on this topic.
From the viewpoint of tactical leadership, the most arresting feature of
the battle was the masterly way in which the German Admiral Scheer
handled his fleet. Three times in succession did he swing the whole force
round by a maneuver (Kehrtwendung) which the British commander had
deemed impossible. In this way he was able to extricate his feet from a
most dangerous position, leaving his opponent completely baffled.
In the German naval staff history of Jutland, published last month, the
escape of the high sea fleet is attributed partly to ineffective British gun-
nery. The same theme is developed on rather sensational lines by an article
in the latest issue of the Marine Rundschau, the German semi-official re-
view. The author, Captain Punt, of the German Navy, submits some very
striking figures taken from official sources. His contention is that British
naval gunnery was inferior not only at Jutland but in every engagement of
the war.
He begins by drawing a contrast between the actions of Coronel and the
Falklands. In the former battle the Germans had an advantage in number
of big guns, but weather conditions were unfavorable for good shooting.
In spite of this handicap the Scharnhorst and Gneisenau sank the Good
Hope and Monmouth in less than an hour, while they themselves received
only a few superficial hits.
But, if Captain Punt were an impartial critic, he would have mentioned
that the British ships were old, their guns of low power and their crews
largely composed of raw recruits and elderly reservists, whereas the Ger-
man ships had been in commission several years and had taken all the
Kaiser's gunnery prizes on the China station.
At the Falklands, where the British superiority in weight of gunfire and
speed was overwhelming, it took hours to destroy the Scharnhorst and
Gneisenau, which scored a great many hits on their opponents before going to
the bottom. In view of the disparity between the forces engaged it certainly
is remarkable that the German squadron should have survived so long.
At the Dogger Bank action in January, 1915, five British battle cruisers,
mounting forty big guns of 13.5 and 12-in. caliber, were opposed to three
similar German ships armed with twenty-eight guns of 11 and 12 in., and the
armored cruiser Blücher, carrying only 8-in. guns. In this fight, it is claimed,
the Germans inflicted twenty hits and received only six, apart from those
suffered by the Blücher when, after being disabled, she became the target
for concentrated fire at close range.
Here again, however, Captain Punt suppresses some important facts-
namely, that the Blücher was knocked out by a British shell fired at 18,000
yards and that the Seydlitz had two turrets wrecked and 150 men killed by
one shell, also fired at extreme range.
Coming to Jutland, he reminds us that in the initial stage Beatty had six
battle cruisers with forty-eight big guns, against five German ships with
forty-four guns, mainly of smaller caliber. The Germans began hitting
first, and in less than an hour had sunk two British battle cruiesrs and
damaged two others, while they themselves received only ten hits, none of
which caused serious injury. In this phase the total number of hits re-
ceived is given as follows: British, 36; German, 10.
Each successive phase of the battle is then reviewed, and it is shown how
at one period only did the Germans receive more punishment than they gave,
this being due to the British use of the Scott firing director, a device which
the German fleet did not at that time possess.
There is no doubt that the Germans shot splendidly in this fight, es-
pecially their battle cruisers. They got onto the target almost at once,


  p. 1782 (#714)                      #

1782
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
holding it under fire with rapid salvos that pitched close together with
little or no "spread.” Often the four shells of one salvo would crash
home together in a British ship, and when that occurred the effect was
usually catastrophic.
The appalling destructiveness of German shells was not the least singular
feature of the battle. Three British battle cruisers and two armored cruisers
were sunk outright after short bursts of fire and a third armored cruiser
was so cruelly punished that she had to be left to founder. On the other
hand, the German ships seemed proof against the heaviest hammering. It
is clear that the British projectiles were lacking in efficiency, either through
defective fuses or an unsuitable bursting charge.
At Jutland the British feet fired 4,598 heavy projectiles and the Ger-
man fleet 3,597, the percentage of hits being, respectively, 2.17 and 3.33. On
the British side the heaviest guns were 15-in., the majority being 13.5-in.
The Germans had nothing larger than 12-in. and a third of their ships had
only Il-in. guns.
Regarded as a gunnery test, Jutland was undeniably a success for the
Germans. Whether their brilliant shooting was due to better material or
better methods of training, or to a combination of both, is an open question.
It is acknowledged that their range-finding instruments were much superior
to the British.
In the sphere of naval gunnery the latter appear to have concentrated
on quantity, the Germans on quality. The British Navy, on the outbreak of
the war, was still permeated with the doctrines of Lord Fisher, who made
a fetish of mere bigness—the biggest ships, the biggest guns. But, he had
a sublime disregard for detail, which was precisely where the Germans
excelled.
If the percentage of hits at Jutland, as given above, is correct, it offers
food for thought. At Santiago in 1898 the American percentage is said
to have been 1.4. At Tsushima the Japanese percentage was claimed as
3.2. If the next naval battle is fought out at anything above 20,000 yards a
lower percentage may be looked for, despite the improvement in fire-control
methods.
All of which imparts an air of unreality to discussions on gun elevation
which postulate a decisive range of 25,000 yards or more.
MERCHANT MARINE
World's Shipbuilding Touches Lowest Level Since the War
The Nautical Gazette, 18 July, 1925.—A new low record in world ship-
building since the late war is shown by returns covering all maritime coun-
tries for the quarter ended June 30 last, says a statement just issued by Lloyd's
Register of Shipping. Increases in tonnage orders in the past quarter, as
compared with the previous one, shown by the shipyards of the United States,
Italy, Japan, and some of the smaller shipbuilding nations. were more than
offset by the decreases in Great Britain and Ireland, Germany, France,
Holland and Denmark. The general contrast between the two last quarters
is shown by the following table, the figures representing gross tons of
shipping :
June 30, 1925 March 31, 1925
United States..
92,001
81,728
Great Britain and Ireland ............ 1,093,587 1,165,468
Other countries ....
.. 1,184,243 1,149,714
World Total .....
.....
2,369,831 2,396,910
The previous low mark, of September 30, 1923, showed a total of ap-
proximately 99,000 gross tons for the United States, 1,271,000 tons for


  p. 1783 (#715)                      #

1925]
1783
Professional Notes
Great Britain and Ireland, and 1,007,000 tons for all other countries com-
bined, making the world total at that period, 2,377,000 tons, so that the
present decline from that figure is not a sharp one. It compares, however,
with 2,616,000 gross tons for June 30, 1924, since which time the decline
has been a steady one.
But, Lloyd's Register points out, the decrease is accompanied by a
falling off in orders for steam tonnage. Once again, the figures for con-
struction of vessels equipped with internal-combustion engines show an
advance, so that now almost 50 per cent of the world's shipbuilding is com-
posed of motor vessels. In Great Britain and Ireland motorships represent
36.5 per cent of the total construction, while the figure for other maritime
countries is 57-3 per cent, making the proportion for all countries combined
47.7 per cent, as compared with 42 per cent for the quarter ended March
31 last, and only 28 per cent a year prior to that. The tonnage of motorships
building during the past two quarters compares as follows, in gross tons:
June 30, 1925 March 31, 1925
Great Britain and Ireland ......
399,070
359,920
Other countries .....
730,842 661,711
World total ........
1,129,912 1,021,631
It will be noticed that, while on construction of all kinds, Great Britain
and Ireland's share is nearly half the world's total, they are constructing
only a little more than a third of the total motor tonnage.
According to the returns, the construction work being done in all coun-
tries under supervision of Lloyd's Register, and intended to be classed with
that Society, aggregates 1,587,386 gross tons, of which 876,143 tons represent
orders contracted for in Great Britain and Ireland. Lloyd's, therefore, is
supervising more than two thirds of the world's shipbuilding, and more than
80 per cent of that in Great Britain and Ireland. Both percentages show a
gain over those for the previous quarter.
A new feature of Lloyd's returns gives additional evidence of the develop-
ment of the motorship. Data showing the indicated horsepower of marine
engines now building or being installed throughout the world shows that
out of a total of 1,721,378 i.h.p., 353,144 represents the aggregate for steam
turbines; 559,970 for reciprocating steam engines, and 808,264 for motor
propulsion. The indicated horsepower for motor driven vessels is, therefore,
only 100,000 i.h.p. less than for steam turbines and steam engines combined.
The outlook for an increase in the world's shipbuilding industry is not
brightened by the returns showing the contrast between new orders begun
and tonnage launched. Another sign of depression is seen in the fact that
of the 1,093,000 gross tons of orders with the shipyards of Great Britain
and Ireland, suspension of work has been ordered on 76,000 tons.
The comparison between new orders and launchings of steamers and
motor vessels is not quite so pronounced, however, for the quarter just ended
as for the previous one. During the three months ending June 30, launchings
exceeded new work begun by 171,000 gross tons, while during the three pre-
ceding months, ships sent down the ways exceeded those on which work
was started by more than 210,000 tons. The comparative launchings for the
two periods were as follows, in gross tons :
June 30, 1925 March 31, 1925
Great Britain and Ireland .....
297,517
338,790
Other countries
295,770
267,431
World total
593,287 606,221
The sharp decrease in the amount of tonnage launched by British ship-
yards contrasts with the increase for other countries. This decrease for


  p. 1784 (#716)                      #

1784
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Great Britain and Ireland and increases for the other maritime nations is
also apparent in the comparative figures of new work commenced during the
two quarters, as shown in the following table of gross tonnage:
June 30, 1925 March 31, 1925
Great Britain and Ireland ............ 187,445
198,152
Other countries ..... ............ 234,669
196,818
.
.
.
.
.
.
.
.
.
World total ....
422,114
394,970
During the quarter recently ended, therefore, while the shipyards of Great
Britain and Ireland launched slightly more tonnage than all other countries
together, the new work secured by the British yards was 47,000 gross tons
less than for the other shipbuilding nations, while in the previous quarter,
Great Britain and Ireland led in both launchings and new work.
One direction in which Great Britain and Ireland gained during the last
quarter, while other countries fell back, was that of tanker construction. It
is also noted by Lloyd's Register, in this connection, that while no tankers
were reported to be building in the United States during the first three
months of this year, 9,500 gross tons are now stated to be under way there.
The gains of the shipyards of Great Britain and Ireland during the quarter
ended June 30 were 43,000 tons, while the other nations combined showed a
decrease of about 23,000 tons, as indicated by the following table of gross
tonnage:
June 30, 1925 March 31, 1925
Great Britain and Ireland .............. 165,467 122,128
Other countries ............
.... 206,800
230,015
World total ....................... 372,267
352,143
Little change was recorded in the ranking of the various shipbuilding
nations during the past quarter. France, which stood third during the first
quarter of the year, changed places with Italy, which had ranked fourth.
The United States, which had been in seventh position, just ahead of Japan
and behind Denmark, moved up to the latter's place and is now sixth, while
Japan, which was 42,000 tons behind Denmark in the March quarter, is now
only 19,000 tons behind. Lloyd's shows the comparative standings in tonnage
for the quarter, noting a gain for the group of smaller shipbuilding countries
of about 25,000 tons, as indicated in the following table:
June 30, 1925 March 31, 1925
Great Britain and Ireland
1,093,587 1,165,468
Germany ..
407,366
420,860
Italy ......
212,798
164,023
France .......
169,485
187,437
Holland ....
100,682
119,908
United States
92,001
81,728
Denmark
78,061
83,794
Japan .........
59.740
41,755
Other countries.
156,131
131,937
World total .....
.... 2,369,831 2,396,910
The gain made by the United States brings American shipyards only
8,000 gross tons behind the Dutch, who in the first quarter of this year had
a lead over the United States of 38,000 tons.
The proportionate division of shipbuilding now, as compared with a year
ago, is as follows:
Great Britain and Ireland: A decline from 58 per cent to 46 per cent;
Germany, a gain from 12 to 17 per cent; the United States, unchanged at


  p. 1785 (#717)                      #

1925)
1785
Professional Notes
about 4 per cent; other countries combined, an advance from about 26 to 33
per cent. The volume of motorships on order now is 319,000 gross tons
greater than at June 30, 1924, and tanker construction shows a gain of
192,000 tons, being more than double the total for a year ago.
The World's Merchant Shipping
Engineering, 10 July, 1925.—A fitting opportunity is afforded for a review
of the world's merchant shipping by the appearance of the new annual
edition of Lloyd's Register of Shipping. As the Register contains particu-
lars of all the sea-going vessels of 100 tons and upwards, it would be a
tedious task to attempt an analysis of the records, given in alphabetical
order, of the 33,000 vessels of various types which come under this cate-
gory; but fortunately this is rendered unnecessary by the inclusion in the
Register of an admirable series of statistical tables, in which the char-
acteristics of the ships are classified in a variety of ways.
In commenting on the previous edition of the Register, in our issue of
July 18, 1924, we noted an actual decrease of upwards of 1,000,000 tons in
the total merchant shipping, owned in all parts of the world, in the course
of the preceding twelve months, but the corresponding figure for the
period now under review shows a net increase of 617,851 tons. This figure
includes sailing vessels, which in themselves show a decrease of 248,385 tons,
and as this type of craft is relatively unimportant, a more representative
figure is given by considering steam and motor tonnage only, in which
case the increase amounts to 866,236 tons. In view of the continuance
of the world-wide shipping depression which has marked the last few years,
this figure is somewhat unexpected, and cannot fail to give rise to specula-
tion. When commenting on the reduction in the total in the previous
year, we suggested that it was due to the circumstance that the prevailing
low freights had caused shipowners to dispose of large quantities of in-
efficient tonnage for breaking up, and that the continual general depression
of the shipping industry had delayed the construction of tonnage for re-
placement purposes. We are not aware that either freights had appreciably
improved or that the depression has become noticeably less acute since
that date, and the explanation of the change over from a decrease to an
increase must be sought elsewhere. The main increases in ships of all types
have been, in the case of Great Britain and Ireland, 33,873 tons, in that of
Italy 196,449 tons, and in that of Norway 175,249 tons. On the other hand,
the tonnage of the United States has suffered a very considerable reduction,
amounting as it does to some 579,000 tons less than it was twelve months ago.
It is probable that the policy of scrapping inefficient tonnage has reached
its economic limit, and that the low price obtainable for vessels to be broken
up has resulted in a considerable tonnage being laid up by the owners in
preference to being scrapped. This supposition is to some extent borne out
by the fact that the most recent returns show a decided falling off in the
amount of tonnage withdrawn for breaking up. At the best, this factor can
only account for an absence of further reductions, and the increase remains
to be explained. If we confine our attention to the case of Great Britain
and Ireland, we find that the reduction in ships of all types was 175,711
tons for the year ending June, 1924, and, as stated, this has been converted
into an increase of 334,873 in the year just ended. In commenting on the
world's shipbuilding in our issue of January 23 last, we mentioned that there
was a great increase in tonnage launched in 1924 as compared with 1923,
due to improvements in the figures for British yards. We pointed out,
however, that much of the building had been undertaken at prices which
admitted of little or no profit, and that in some cases it had actually been
undertaken at a loss. The actual increase of the year's production was
604,570 tons, and a large proportion of this was to the order of British


  p. 1786 (#718)                      #

1786
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
firms. It would thus appear that shipowners have been in a position to
profit by the unusual economic conditions prevailing in the shipbuilding
yards, and in this way to strengthen their fleets by the addition of vessels of
the latest type. Considerable doubt may be felt about the economic soundness
of such a state of affairs from a national standpoint, but with this we are
not concerned at the moment. One of the results will certainly be to place
British shipowners in a favorable position to obtain their fair share of in-
creased trade, which may be looked forward to with some confidence in view
of the more hopeful prospects of a return to stability in central Europe.
This increase in the efficiency of the mercantile marine is not confined
to the British Isles, as is shown by the considerable increase which has
taken place generally in recent years in the number of sea-going steamers
and motorships of relatively large tonnage. Confining our attention to
vessels of both types of 4,000 tons or over, it is mentioned in the register
that there were 3,608 such vessels in 1914, whereas today the figure reaches
6,060. If these figures are further examined, is is found that of the latter
number, 356 are of 10,000 tons or over, while 36 are of 20,000 tons and up-
wards. It is satisfactory to note that of the 356 vessels of 10,000 tons
or over, no less than 211 are under the British flag. The group of vessels
which form the largest tonnage is that between 4,000 and 6.000 tons each.
This group totals 17,768,634 tons, equal to 28.5 per cent of the total steam
and motor tonnage of the world. It is interesting to note that the largest
liners, of 15,000 tons each and upwards, only represent some 3.4 per cent of
the total.
Considerable attention was devoted at the meeting of the Institution of
Naval Architects, held in London in April last, to the relative overall
efficiency of oil and steam-engined vessels, but as this subject was discussed
in our columns as recently as June 12 last, we do not propose to comment on
it here. As illustrating the growing size and commercial importance of
motorships, it may be noted that 264 are of 4,000 tons and upwards. Forty-
three of these are of 8,000 tons and upwards, the total tonnage of the latter
amounting to 441,520 tons. Dealing with the figures for the last twelve
months, the tonnage of motorships has increased by 738,000; of vessels
fitted with steam turbines by 305,000; while that of vessels fitted with re-
ciprocating steam engines has decreased by 152,000. Of the two alternative
types of transmission, a total tonnage of 440,000 is now fitted with a combina-
tion of steam turbines and reciprocating engines, while thirty-six vessels,
with a total tonnage of 110,000, are fitted with electric transmission, this
figure including both the steam turbine and Diesel engine as the prime mover.
Of the 3,490 steamers of 17,804,122 tons fitted for burning oil fuel, 730,
of 4,679,695 tons, are registered in Great Britain and Ireland, and 1,855, of
8,999,050 tons, are registered in the United States.
A table classifying all existing steamers and motorships according to age,
shows that there are 4,003 vessels less than five years old, their tonnage
representing just under 21 per cent of the total in existence. There is thus
a very large bulk of relatively inefficient tonnage still on the register,
and it is reasonable to suppose that a revival in trade would lead to a very
appreciable portion of this tonnage being scrapped, to the great advantage of
ship builders. Some of the statistics in relation to the older ships are of
considerable interest. Thus it appears that there are over 7,000 vessels of
twenty-five or more years old still in service, this figure including over
1,000,000 tons of wood and composite steamers. The general increase in
the size of tonnage to which we have referred is reflected in the fact that of
the vessels built in 1900 or before, nearly 65 per cent are of less than 1,000
tons each, the average size of the remainder being 2,705 tons; while of the
vessels built during the last five years, only about 33 per cent are of less
than 1,000 tons each, the average for the remainder reaching 4.708 tons. Of
a proportion of tonnage less than five years old, Germany has 50.6 per


  p. 1787 (#719)                      #

1925]
1787
Professional Notes
cent, Holland 33.5 per cent, France 27 per cent, Denmark 26.7 per cent,
and Great Britain and Ireland 25.5 per cent.
Merchant Ship Subsidy Systems
By Cary W. Cook, Chairman, American-Hawaiian Steampship Company,
The Nautical Gazette, 25 July, 1925.—The legitimate function of a ship is to
transport goods at a rate that will enable those who send the goods by
her to carry out their business at a profit. At the same time the ship must
be operated so efficiently and cheaply that whatever the goods pay in freight
money will be enough to cover the cost of operation and to set aside a certain
sum annually to be used in building another ship when she herself is past
her efficient life.
So far as there is any record, the business of shipowning has been done
by those who have found in that a better return than shore occupations
afforded. The high rank of Norway as a shipping nation is due to the
seafaring qualities of her people, to her geographic location, and to the
fact that because of her limited industrial development, merchant shipping
offers greater financial rewards and better opportunities for the employ-
ment of her people. The conditions in our New England States where
American shipping originated were very similar, but with the opening of the
West and almost unlimited opportunities on the land, we gave up our
shipping and left the carriage of our goods to those who were less for-
tunately situated and who were content with a smaller return. We were
not less patriotic than now. Shipping didn't pay. Those who took up our
shipping when we cast it aside have been continuously at it and neither
England, Norway, Sweden, nor Holland have ever paid, nor do they now
pay, any subsidy to cargo carriers and they are the leading maritime nations.
France has made frequent and costly experiments with various forms of
subsidies without accomplishing the results hoped for and is not considered
a maritime nation. Her subsidy systems have been used as models by Italy,
Austria, Hungary and Spain; none of these are considered maritime nations.
Japan in 1896 instituted a liberal subsidy policy under a law resembling
in many respects the subsidy laws of France. The fact that the merchant
marine of Japan has developed very rapidly since the institution of the sub-
sidy policy has been attributed by many to the liberal state aid which it has
received, but account should be taken of the fact that Japan has had a re-
markable industrial and commercial development during this period. Al-
though the principal Japanese steamship companies have been in receipt of
government aid since 1888 and have developed rapidly, their financial state-
ments for recent years show that they have not gotten beyond the need for
financial assistance from the state.
Those countries which have been driven by necessity to the sea and which
have relied upon individual enterprise and self-reliance rather than on
government bounty are today successful in shipping. Those countries which
do other things better and find them easier and which do not go to sea unless
guaranteed a profit by the state, hold an inferior maritime position. Bel-
gium, which has a very large overseas trade, has been content to have
most of this trade carried in foreign bottoms by those who could do it the
cheapest and put her in a position to compete. To promote the export of
agricultural products, Denmark for a number of years paid a substantial
subsidy to lines operating to England, but withdrew it under the fear of
retaliation.
It would seem that subsidizing cargo carriers would be in defiance of
demonstrated failures and must lead to commercial unfriendliness curtailing
our foreign trade. It may even lead to retaliation, affecting seriously our
industrial, cargo carriers. It is upon these industrial ships that we must
place our reliance for the foundation of an American merchant marine in


  p. 1788 (#720)                      #

1788
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
the foreign trade. Our first shipowners were primarily merchants who
themselves furnished the cargoes or foundations for them and provided
space for the more or less small ventures of others. The lines or public
carriers were an outgrowth. The movement is being revived. The lumber
mills of this coast always had their own fleets of sailing ships. The oil
companies, owing to the nature of their cargoes, were forced to provide their
own tankers. The steel companies first of all chartered to bring ore from
abroad and have expanded into ownership and the transportation of their
finished product. Our most prominent automobile manufacturer is trying
out the plan of his own ships. The ownership of vessels by large industries
is capable of great expansion and will expand unless some of the lines tem-
porarily hurt by this competition should more insistently and definitely de-
mand regulation.
Even carefully considered regulation, together with full details worked
out in advance of any law providing for it, will surely impair the service to
the small shipper who must, without sufficient cargo at one time, depend
altogether on the line. Hasty, ill-considered regulatory legislation will,
until effective regulation of ships is found impossibe, nullify all the ad-
vantages otherwise to be had from water competition. Nations have gone to
war and will again go to war to gain access to the sea and all the natural
advantages growing out of such access and if we, with a coastline on
four seas, shall nullify that advantage by attempted regulation we will for-
feit our birthright and, instead of service born of free competition, will
descend to a self-satisfied mediocrity in the protected coastwise trade and
disappear from foreign waters.
The greatest danger to the industry from state aid is that such aid carries
with it government meddling. The man who puts up the money always wants
to know how it is being spent. Even mail subventions, which differ from
subsidies in that they require a definite service in return, carry with them
regulation and in some cases participation by the government.
The Austria Lloyd contract provides that three members of the board of
directors, including the chairman, shall be nominated by the government
and that all freight and passenger tariffs shall be submitted to the Minister
of Commerce for approval and that the government shall share in the net
earnings above 6 per cent, and so forth. The French Government contracts
give practically as much control. The Japanese lines give the government as
much control as it is possible to give over privately owned lines. The
tendency is strongly toward a division of profits above a fair return on the
investment and the requirements are very exacting. One government re-
quires that it be consulted in regard to arrangement of routes, ports of call,
number of voyages to be made and time of voyage.
It is true, and it is no wonder, that the White Star Line, which has
never received aid of any kind from the British Government and which has
been a competitor of the Cunard Line in the transatlantic trade, has been
far more successful as an earner of dividends than has its subsidized rival,
This is true also of the Anchor Line, the Leyland Line, and the Red Star
Line in the same trade.
Mail subventions are granted principally to insure close communication
between the mother countries and their colonies. We are not a colonizing
nation and our efforts along the line of subventions have been somewhat
spasmodic and lacked definite purpose. No one has cared to risk his
money to establish a costly line of steamers based on a subsidy or subven-
tion which might be withdrawn at the whim of the political party in power.
With a definite policy and mail contracts for a period long enough to
amortize the vessel, it is quite within the probabilities that private capital
would undertake fast mail and passenger lines on major routes.
The argument that we need for the national defense a merchant marine
in the foreign trade is open to question. There has been no publicly ex-


  p. 1789 (#721)                      #

1925]
1789
Professional Notes
pressed opinion from the Army and Navy upon it, and if it really is true,
it would seem an easy thing for those charged with the national defense,
to select from the left-overs of the late war such ships as are required
for purposes of defense only, and thereafter take care of them and put the
expense where it belongs rather than continue losses of a million dollars
a week of tax money, under the delusion that our attempt to create a
merchant marine by law is justified by the doctrine of national defense.
There are approximately nine million gross tons of American ships in the
American coastwise trade. These coasters gave a good account of them-
selves in the late war and the fleet is better now than then. The definite
policy of the United States reserving the coasting trade to its own vessels
will not only preserve and expand this fleet without aid or regulation but,
what is of more importance, preserve our shipyards, which have already
given evidence of an almost unbelievable power to meet emergencies anü
with removal of the absurd prohibition against transfer of the flag can un-
doubtedly build for foreign account.
There has been so much sentiment interwoven in all discussions of
shipping that the real functions of the ship have been lost sight of or
obscured by hampering the record with insistence that each petty annoyance
shall be cured by legislation. There is no serious artificial obstacle to an
American Merchant Marine. The impassable barrier is that other things
pay better and, whenever American ships become a necessity and, therefore,
profitable, American ships will be provided. There are laws now which pre-
vent progress. Chiefest of these are the Shipping Act of 1916 and the
Merchant Marine Act of 1920. A few of my shipowning friends and my-
self devoted much time, labor, and all the ability vouchsafed us by the
Almighty's endowment of brains, to revise these two laws. The result was
embodied in the Shipping Act of 1924, which is momentarily in seclusion
owing to the more ambitious program of the shipping associations, but
it is far from dead and provides the practical man's solution of an intensely
practical question. It will, I think, be seriously considered by the next
Congress. It conforms to this declaration of a National Merchant Marine
· Policy:
It is necessary for the national defense that the United States shall have
a merchant marine sufficient to carry all of its domestic commerce and serve
as a naval or military auxiliary in time of war or national emergency.
It is desirable for the national defense that the United States shall have
upon the major trade routes between United States ports and foreign ports
combination passenger and freight lines with vessels of sufficient speed
to enable them to effectively compete with foreign lines in the carriage of
the mails and to serve as troop transports in time of war. Such ships to
be compensated by liberal mail subventions. Any other form of aid, whether
in the form of cash subsidy, discriminating duties, free Canal tolls, or the
like, inevitably and invariably leads to a dependence on Federal paternalism
in a field where individual courage and independence are demanded, and
should not be granted.
It has been found by some of our large industries desirable to own their
own cargo vessels in the foreign trade and this should be encouraged.
It is hereby declared to be the policy of the United States to encourage
the maintenance by private owners of such a merchant marine, assuring to
owners freedom from regulation or competition, direct or indirect, by the
government. It is recognized that to maintain and expand a merchant
marine the art of shipbuilding shall not be lost or impaired and that Ameri-
can shipyards must be encouraged to maintain themselves in a position to
again rapidly expand to meet any national emergency. To that end no ves-
sels except those wholly built and equipped ready for sea in American yards
shall be permitted to trade between ports of the United States except the
trade between United States ports and the Philippine Islands.


  p. 1790 (#722)                      #

1790
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Except in time of war or national emergency there shall be no restric-
tion upon :
Building for foreign owners.
Sale of American ships abroad.
Selling securities of shipowners or shipbuilders abroad as long as the
management through ownership of a majority of the capital stock of
building and owning corporations is in the hands of American citizens.
If, under laws passed or to be passed in furtherance of the above-
declared policy, American shipowners enter the foreign trade with purely
cargo vessels, they will be encouraged as far as consistent with the proper
growth of our foreign trade; but it must be recognized that ships alone do
not make foreign commerce and sentimantal regard for American ships in
the foreign trade must not interfere with the more important consideration
of placing the exporters of our surplus in position to cultivate the friend-
ship of foreign buyers, themselves shipowners, and to take advantage of as
low freight rates as our competitors enjoy through free competition of
foreign ships.
Ford's Bid for Scrap Ships Recommended for Acceptance
The Nautical Gazette, 25 July, 1925.—The Ford bid of $1,706,000 for the
200 Shipping Board vessels for scrap has been recommended by President
Palmer of the Fleet Corporation for acceptance. The suggestion in the Ford
Company's bid that there be substituted for some of the ships included in
the offer certain other vessels located north of the James River, was dis-
approved by Admiral Palmer on the ground that the government would
have to go to the expense of arranging for transportation of these sub-
stituted vessels, and, also, because of the possibility of other higher bids
having been tendered had these ships been included in the list as originally
advertised.
The automobile manufacturer's bid was the second highest proposal in
actual amount received as the Ocean Power Company, of Bar Harbor,
Maine, bid $2,244,000 for the 200 ships but no check accompanied the bid,
which was said to rule it out of consideration for failure to comply with
the terms of the advertisement requiring a deposit of 10 per cent of the
proposed purchase price with cach tender.
Formal protest against any action on the new bids by the Shipping Board
was filed by the Boston Iron and Metal Company, of Baltimore, on the
ground that, under the original advertisement for the sale of the ships, the
board should only negotiate with the original bidders; that the board should
not have made public the original bids unless it was going to accept or
reject them and that it was unfair and inequitable to make public prices of
the June 30 opening and then call for new bids. General Council Chauncey
Parker of the Shipping Board, however, has upheld the proceedings of the
board incident to the receipt of the Ford bid.
A summary of the bids opened July 16 follows:
The Ford Motor Company, of Detroit, $1,706,000 for the entire 200 ships
for scrapping.
A. V. Wilson, president, the Ocean Power Company, of Bar Harbor,
Maine, $2,244,000 for the entire 200 ships, but no check accompanied the bid.
The General Metals Supply Company, of San Francisco, three different
bids for 50 ships, at prices ranging from $4,287 each to $5,226 each for
complete scrapping and from $4,537 to $5,476 for partial scrapping; for
21 ships, from $3,800 to $5,027 for comlete scrapping and from $4,100
to $4,800 for partial scrapping; and for 40 ships, from $4,287 to $6,415 for
complete scrapping and from $4,537 to $6,815 for partial scrapping.


  p. 1791 (#723)                      #

1925)
1791
Professional Notes
The Newport News Shipbuilding and Dry Dock Comany, $808,100 for
139 ships.
The Hickman-Williams Company, of Philadelphia, $92,860 or $7,905 for
each of twelve ships.
August A. Weber and Dan Robins, of Buffalo, $650,000 for the entire
200 ships for scrapping.
The Newport News Shipbuilding and Dry Dock Company, $808,100 for
130 ships.
The Hickman-Williams Company, of Philadelphia, $94,860 or $7,905 for
cach of 12 ships.
N. Block and Company, of Norfolk, Virginia, for 25 ships at prices
ranging from $4,030 to $4,777 each.
A. Douglas Gibson, of Washington, on behalf of J. T. Knight and Son,
of Columbus, Georgia, $5,500 each for 29 ships.
The Sun Shipbuilding and Dry Dock Company, of Chester, Pennsylvania,
$6,800 for five ships and $5,800 for five ships for complete scrapping or
$29,000 for the ten ships for partial scrapping
B. R. Stafford, of New York, $20,000 for two ships for operation, re-
submitted.
Hart Enterprise Electric Company, of New Orleans, $3,695 each for two
ships, resubmitted, no check.
American Ship Wrecking Corporation, $2,000 each for three ships, re-
submitted.
In addition an offer was made by Frank Harrisons Company, of Chicago,
to scrap the 200 ships, guaranteeing the government a minimum of $1,250.000
from the sale of the scrap and 50 per cent of the money realized from
the scrap above that amount.
The Ford Company agrees to scrap the ships within the continental
limits of the United States within eighteen months of delivery of the ves-
sels, agrees that none of the machinery shall be put onto the market, but
reserves the right to use of any of the machinery from the ships in its
own factories and plants.
The Ford Company reserved the right to Dieselize any of the ships of
design number 1023 which are included in the 200 for salt water navigation.
There are 50 of these vessels, which are oil-burners and range from 5,070
to 5,340 deadweight tons. Of the 50 there are 19 located at New York,
19 in the James River, and 12 at Philadelphia.
Scrapping Shipping Board Ships
The Nautical Gazette, i August, 1925.—Another statement equally mis-
leading is attributed in the press to Senator Duncan U. Fletcher. of Florida.
Senator Fletcher takes occasion to discuss the Shipping Board's action in
the matter of the sale of two hundred ships for scrap and to inject some
severe criticisms of the board's decision. He takes the view that the
board is without power, under the law, to scrap ships unless they are unfit
for sea service. Somebody has told Senator Fletcher that the two hundred
ships offered for sale for scrap are not unfit for service, that they are being
well preserved at low cost, and that they could be placed in commission
on short notice at slight expense. The Senator goes on to state that it is
costing $750 a year to maintain the ships, and that they will be as good
ten or fifteen years from now as they are today. All of this is contrary to
the real facts. A survey by experts of the Shipping Board's fleet last
year revealed that there were 521 ships which would never be of any
commercial value, therefore, 200 can easily be scrapped and still leave
margin in the event that any additional ships above those now in service and
those being held as a first and second reserve should be required. Figures
of the Fleet Corporation show that the total cost of caring for the laid-up


  p. 1792 (#724)                      #

1792
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
fleets is $2,700,000 per year, or an average of $3,000 per ship, which is a long
way from Senator Fletcher's estimate of $750 per ship. To say that the
vessels will be as good ten or fifteen years from now is tantamount to an
admission of ignorance of ships. It is true that the vessels may be in
almost as good a physical condition as they are today, but in comparison
with the merchant vessels of ten or fifteen years hence they will be hope-
lessly obsolete. Marine engineering and naval architecture are not sta-
tionary arts; they are progressive, and with the rapid development of direct
Diesel and Diesel-electric driven ships the vessel of today which is con-
sidered suitable only for scrap will be completely outclassed fifteen years
from now, and will be out of the running in competition with modern ships
of other nations. Above all things, the American merchant marine must be
kept up to date if it is to compete successfully for world trade, and the re-
tention of ships that are only fit for scrap is an obstacle in the way of that
essential modernization.
MISCELLANEOUS
Submarine Cruisers
Engineering, 17 July, 1925.—At the meetings of the Association Tech-
nique Maritime et Aëronautique, held in Paris in May, a paper, entitled
"Submarine Cruisers," was presented by M. de Vito, the director of Naval
Construction of the Ansaldo Works, at Genoa. In his introductory re-
marks, the author stated that although from 1900 to 1914 the submarine was
in process of development in most navies, yet so far as its tactical and
strategical employment was concerned, it had not passed the experimental
stage. The vast majority of naval officers had little confidence in the type,
and only a few of the most thoughtful and progressive predicted a future
for it, and visualized some of its functions in a naval conflict. It was not
until September 23, 1914, that the faith of the few was fully justified,
and the responsible naval authorities were convinced of the important part
the submarine was likely to take in the world war. On this date, the Ger-
man submarine U-9 sank three cruisers of the Cressy class, and 1,500
officers and men lost their lives. From that date, the submarine proved itself
a most effective and dangerous weapon of war, and at times threatened to
jeopardize the cause of the Allies. M. de Vito expresses the opinion that
but for the continuous and increasing pressure of the Allies on land, and
the consequent break up of the enemy armies, the submarine would have
forced a victory for the Central Powers.
In August, 1914, one single type of submarine was afloat. Its armament
was the torpedo and its purpose the attack of enemy surface warships. As
the war progressed and the nature and magnitude of its naval problems be-
came more clearly defined, other types of submarines were developed and
purposes of which were as diverse as those of surface warships. The
gun and the mine were added to the torpedo in the armament of under-
water craft, and as experience was gained, the caliber of the former and the
number of mines which could be carried were both increased. At the
Armistice, in addition to the much improved type in existence at the out-
break of war, there were several others; the monitor submarine, the de-
stroyer, the mine-layer, fleet and cruiser submarines. One of the most
difficult post-war problems of the naval staffs of the powers was to de-
termine which of the types should be developed for future use and which
abandoned. The problem varied with the naval policy of the nation con-
cerned, and the decisions reached may be interpreted by the types which are
building and projected. In August, 1914, only a few expert officers possessed
the necessary knowledge to discuss such questions; now they must be de-
bated and determined by a far larger circle. For this reason, says M. de
Vito, submarine technique must be popularized, so that ideas on the subject


  p. 1793 (#725)                      #

1925)
1793
Professional Notes
shall be as clear as those for ordinary surface warships. His paper has
been written with that object in view.
The author next reviews the powers and weights of Diesel engines which
are suitable for the surface propulsion of submarines, and remarks in
passing that, as with surface ships, the dimensions and speeds of submarines
have increased with the power of the engine. He states that the most power-
ful engines of the submarine type yet constructed are the 3,000 h.p. Nurn-
burg, the 3,500 h.p. Sulzer and the 3,000 h.p. Tosi, but considers it is now
practicable to build an engine to develop 6,000 h.p. and mentions a report
that the Sulzer Company are constructing one of 7,000 brake horsepower.
The weights of submarine engines, with shafts, propellers and other neces-
sary gear, vary from 88 lb. to 99 lb. per horsepower, figures which compare
with 44 lb. for the propelling installations of light cruisers, 33 lb. for flotilla
leaders, 26 lb. for destroyers, 11 lb. for motorboats, and 2} lb, for aeroplane
engines. This comparison shows the submarine Diesel engine to be very
heavy, but it is not greatly different in this respect from those for merchant
ships or earlier cruisers. The fuel economy of the Diesel engine is neglected
in this comparison, although of importance from other points of view.
For submerged propulsion, the weight of the main motors and the bat-
teries from which they draw their power, is 220 lb. to 264 lb. per horsepower
developed normally. The distribution of the total weight or surface dis-
placement of a modern submarine is stated to be as follows: Hull structure,
fittings and fixed ballast, 58 per cent; crew with their effects, provisions
and fresh water, 2 per cent; armament, i.e., torpedoes and tubes, guns, and
charges, and so forth, 5 per cent; and fuel and lubricating oils 5 per cent.
The remaining 30 per cent of the surface displacement is represented by
the weight of the surface and submerged propelling installations.
Using the foregoing figures as a basis, and taking 25 h.p. to the ton for
surface and 10 h.p. for submerged propulsion, the author considers two
extreme cases. In the first, the 30 per cent of the surface displacement is
used for a submarine Diesel installation, and in the second it is entirely
utilized for motors and batteries for submerged propulsion. The two cases
are designated A and D, and assuming various surface displacements, the
resulting speeds are determined. The tables given above show the results.
From these figures, it is concluded that, in the present stage of Diesel
engine design, is is impracticable to obtain more than 25 knots, even when
submerged navigation is entirely sacrificed.
In calculating these speeds, the submerged displacement is taken as 25
per cent greater than the surface. The results show that submerged speed
is very costly, an increase in 1,000 tons of surface displacement being
necessary to obtain half a knot extra speed for the largest vessels. It is
concluded that 14 knots is the practical limit to submerged speed. In gen-
eral a maximum of 10 to 11 knots is specified for the ordinary types of
submarines.
Two further cases are next considered, these being more nearly in ac-
cordance with actual practice. The first, B, assumes that the power sub-
merged is one-half that on the surface, and the second, C, that the two are
equal. In both, the weights of the submerged and surface power installa-
tions are together taken as 30 per cent of the surface displacement.
A comparison of the speeds in the two tables shows that for submarines
above 1,200 tons displacement the surface speed is reduced by 21/2 knots to
obtain an increase of i knot of submerged speed.
The paper then proceeds to quote examples of actual submarines to illus-
trate the results obtained in the four tables. The first example is the British
R class, which are described as submarine destroyers, having been designed
with high submerged speed for rapidly approaching and destroying sub-
marines sighted on the surface. The published particulars of this class give


  p. 1794 (#726)                      #

1794
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
CASE A.-INTERNAL-COMBUSTION ENGINES ONLY
2,000
Surface displacement......... tons
Weight of power plant....
inverno
Approximate horsepower ...B.H.P.
Number of shafts.....
Maximum speed............knots |
500
150
3,750
1,500
450
1,000
300
7,500
2,500
750
18,750
600
15,000
3,000
900
22,500
11,250
3,500
1,050
26,250
4
25.8
4
20.8
22:5
23.4
24:3
24.9
25.4
CASE B.-POWER OF MOTORS EQUAL TO ONE-HALF OF THE DIESEL ENGINES
Surface displacemet. tons
Power on surface. . H.P.
Power submerged.. ”
Speed on surface. . knots
Speed submerged..
500
1,600
800
15.5
8.7
800
2,600
1,300
16.6
9.2
1,200
4,000
2,000
17.5
9:7
1,500
5,000
2,500
17.9
9.9
2,000
6,600
3,300
18:5
10.2
2,500
8,200
4,100
18.9
10.5
3,000
10,000
5,000
19.3
10.7
3,500 | 4,000
11,600 13,200
| 5,800 6,600
19.6 119.9
10.9 11:1
CASE C.-POWER OF MOTORS EQUAL TO THAT OF THE DIESEL ENGINES
800
700
| 1,200
2,600
1,500
3,200
2,000
4,300
2,500
5,400
3,000
6,500
3,500
7,500
4,000
8,600
Surface displacement.tons 500
Power on surface...h.p. 1,100
Power submerged..
Speed on surface. . knots 13.6
Speed submerged
9.6
14.3
10:1
15.1
10.5
15.4
17.0
16:0
11.1
16.4
11.5
16.7
11.7
17.3
12:1
10.8
11.9
CASE D.-ELECTRIC MOTORS AND BATTERIES ONLY
... ton
S
Surface displacement...
Weight of power plant (electric)..
Power of motors..
Submerged speed.
500
150
1,500
10.8
1,000
300
3,000
11.5
horsepower
......knots
2,000
600
6,000
12:5
3,000
900
9,000
13
4,000
1,200
12,000
13.5
5,000
1,500
15,000
13.9


  p. 1795 (#727)                      #

1925]
1795
Professional Notes
the surface displacement as 420 tons, surface power 240 h.p., submerged
power 1,200 h.p., surface speed 9/2 knots, and submerged speed 15 knots.
This type falls between cases C and D, being nearer the latter. According
to the table for case D, the maximum submerged speed for 420 tons surface
displacement should be about 107/2 knots. The author considers the reputed
speed of 15 knots to be impracticable, and that twice the power stated would
be required for such a speed. He states that 15 knots has never been ob-
tained. The difference between 10/2 and 15 knots is a large one to explain,
but probably a more efficient form than that assumed for the tables was
adopted by the British authorities. The paper states that the type has been
abandoned by the British Admiralty, but it is to be noted that two of the
class are mentioned as being in commission in the published official lists
of ships.
Submarine minelayers are next referred to, this type also falling between
cases C and D, but being nearer to the former. The 5 per cent for arma-
ment of the modern submarine is greatly exceeded in this type by the
weight and number of the mines, and this has the effect of reducing the
30 per cent for propelling installations to 25 and even 20 per cent. The
speeds, surface and submerged, are therefore smaller than are shown in
Table C. The following particulars of German minelaying submarines are
quoted:
Displacements
Tons
Powers
H.P.
Speeds
Knots
417
500
11.4
U.C. 16-79...
493
7.4
600
11.5
»
90-105...
620
10.5
»
74-80....
883
Between Cases B and C fall all submarines of the coastal or defensive
type which have been constructed, and particularly those of from 500 to
600 tons with 14 or 15 knots surface and 8 or 9 knots submerged speed.
This type is considered to have a great future, as it can be economically
constructed in large numbers. The new French Ariane class of 600 tons
surface and 765 tons submerged displacement, 1,300 h.p. surface and 1,000
h.p. submerged giving speeds of 14 and 9.5 knots, are quoted as examples.
In Class B is placed the ordinary submarine for offensive action—the
type afloat in August, 1914-having a displacement of 800 to 900 tons with
speeds of 16 and 9 knots surface and submerged. The French vessels of
the Requin class, now under construction, are the latest examples of this
type. Their displacements are 1,150 and 1,410 tons, horsepowers 2,900 and
1,800, and speeds 16 and 10 knots.
Between A and B comes the submarine cruiser, of which the German
U 142 class is stated to be the prototype. These were of 2,200 tons surface
displacement, engine of 6,000 h.p., and motors of 2,600 h.p. with corre-
sponding speeds of 17.8 and 8.5 knots, thus falling nearer to B than A. The
British XI, of 2,800 tons, is also placed in this category, and it is deduced
from the tables that, with this displacement and if fitted with Diesel engines,


  p. 1796 (#728)                      #

1796
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
the surface speed cannot exceed 21 or 22 knots. If the vessel falls exactly
under Class B the surface speed should be 19 knots and the horsepower
about 9,300. The projected V engeur class of 2,400 tons surface displace-
ment and 3,000 tons submerged, with speeds of 18 and i knots, is also
quoted as an example, and it is stated that, for the surface power plant of
these submarines, the French authorities are experimenting with light Diesel
engines to develop from 5,000 to 7,000 h.p.
M. de Vito next considers submarine cruisers at some length, and outlines
the general particulars of a design which the firm of Ansaldo has prepared.
He states that the number of guns to be mounted must be four at least, but
six or eight are preferable. With a limitation of 3,000 tons surface dis-
placement, 6-in. guns can be mounted, whereas for 8-in. guns the displace-
ment would reach 8,000 tons, an increase in size over present submarines
which no naval authorities would attempt. For such a displacement, four
shafts, each with an engine of 6,000 h.p., would give 21 knots.
In the preliminary design for a 3,000-ton vessel, Messrs. Ansaldo have
allowed for six 6-in. guns mounted in two triple turrets, these being entered
from the conning tower, whereas, according to M. de Vito, the two turrets
in the British XI are isolated from the tower. A secondary armament of
four 4-in, anti-aircraft guns in twin mountings is also arranged for in the
Italian design. These are installed on the superstructure above the triple
turrets. Four torpedo tubes at the bow and four at the stern are proposed,
making the total armament weights 450 tons, or 15 per cent of the surface
displacement. This largely increased percentage over the 5 per cent quoted
for the ordinary submarine necessitates economy in other directions.
Considering next the submerged speed and the power required to main-
tain it, the author argues that, since economy in weight is required to allow
for the heavier armament, a submerged speed of 4 or 5 knots with sufficient
battery endurance to maintain the speed during daylight, i.e., for 15 hours,
is all that is necessary. A radius of action of 60 miles at 4 knots is allowed
for in the design, necessitating a weight of motors and batteries of 240
tons, or 8 per cent of the displacement. The two motors, each of 1,000 h.p.,
are capable of an overload for a short time and weigh 20 tons each. The
maximum submerged speed that can be maintained for one hour is 742
knots, but if this were increased to 10 knots the weights would be augmented
by 110 tons to 160 tons.
The maximum surface speed of the design is 21 knots, and to attain this
speed two engines, each of 6,000 brake horsepower, are proposed. These
would be single-acting, four-cycle, six-cylinder engines of 25.6 in. stroke
and diameter and 330 r.p.m., each engine weighing 130 tons. The 3,000 h.p.
M.A.N. engine weighs 70 tons, and on this basis the estimate appears rea-
sonable. For the complete engine installation, 400 tons is the weight esti-
mated to be necessary. This gives 30 h.p. per ton, as compared with the
25 h.p. used in preparing the four tables, an indication of the greater econ-
omy in weight of the more powerful engines. The total weight of the two
propelling installations-surface and submerged—is thus 640 tons, or 21
per cent of the displacement. At a cruising speed of 10 knots, the designers
estimate the consumption of oil fuel to be about 60 lb, per nautical mile.
The total fuel allowed is 190 tons, giving a radius of action of 7,000 miles
at 10 knots. To this weight is added thirty tons of lubricating oil, giving
a total of 220 tons, or 7 per cent of the submerged displacement.
The officers and men for the cruiser submarine are estimated to number
100, their weight with provisions and water being taken as 55 tons to 60
tons, or 2 per cent of the displacement.
The total percentage already allocated reaches 45.5, leaving for the hull,
fittings and ballast 54.5 per cent, as compared with the 58 per cent quoted
for the ordinary submarine. The weight of accessories, auxiliary mechan-


  p. 1797 (#729)                      #

1925]
1797
Professional Notes
isms, anchors, cables, and equipment is stated to vary from 14 per cent to
15 per cent of the surface displacement for a large submarine, leaving 40
per cent for the hull structure and fixed ballast.
The author then discusses the various schemes which have been adopted
for the provision of the ballast, fuel, and other necessary tanks, quoting
figures to illustrate his arguments. He arrives at the conclusion that the
main ballast and oil-fuel tanks are most economically fitted outside the
pressure hull, i.e., between the pressure and external hulls, the method now
usually adopted. Certain tanks, such as compensating and trimming tanks,
which are relatively small, are more satisfactorily placed inside the pressure
hull. The thickness of the latter and the scantlings of its framing must
depend on the maximum depth to which it is intended the submarine should
submerge. In the earliest submarines, this depth was 30 m, and in 1914 had
increased to 45 m, while during the war 80 m to 100 m were employed. In
the submarine cruiser design 100 m has been allowed for, and for such a
depth the weight of the pressure-hull plating and framing is about 440 lb.
to 484 lb. per cubic metre of displacement. This amounts to about 20 per
cent of the surface displacement, to which must be added 5 per cent for
bulkheads, decks, and so forth. Finally, the structure of the submarine is
stated to require from 34 per cent to 36 per cent of the surface displace-
ment, which, deducted from the 40 per cent previously arrived at, leaves
4 per cent to 6 per cent for fixed ballast.
The paper next refers to the difficult question of stability, and mentions
that in the single-hull submarine of circular section, the stability, when sub-
merged, was satisfactory, while on the surface it was small and ballast had
to be added to secure an adequate amount. In the double-hull type, the
conditions are reversed, the stability on the surface being ample, while to
insure a satisfactory state when submerged, from 6 to 7 per cent of the
displacement is required for a ballast keel. The problem of securing stability
during the process of submerging, when the ballast tanks are only partially
full, is stated to be a difficult one, more especially in a double-hull sub-
marine. The unsatisfactory stability of German submarines, and the meas-
ures taken to remedy this are also referred to.
Some proposals have been advanced lately by which the stability of sub-
marines can be secured, the ballast keel reduced, and the weight thereby
saved applied to the improvement of other qualities. Three of these pro-
posals are referred to in the paper. The first is that of Professor Flamm,
who replaces the completely circular sectioned pressure hull by a trilobular
one and claims for this a smaller weight of pressure hull and framing for
the same depth of submergence, and also an improved stability. Both of
these results permit of an economy in weight, which he proposes to allocate
to armor and guns. M. de Vito states that his predecessor at the Ansaldo
Works, Colonel Soliani, has studied the problem, and has patented a section
of pressure hull with two circular lobes by which the same results are ob-
tained as for the trilobular, but which permits of much simpler internal
arrangements. The third proposal is that of Captain de Feo, of the Royal
Italian Navy, who retains the circular pressure hull, but arranges his ballast
and fuel tanks before and abaft it, instead of laterally as in the usual design.
This is the type submarine, a description of which has appeared in
Engineering, on page 171 of Vol. CXVIII. With this design economy in
hull structure is obtained, and the stability both when submerging and sub-
merged is satisfactory. M. de Vito inclines to the opinion that such a
system with some modifications will be found useful for adoption in cruiser
submarines. With it, however, the surface stability is not as satisfactory
as in the ordinary type, and it may be found necessary to add ballast or
fit bulges at the waterline to remedy this defect.


  p. 1798 (#730)                      #

1798
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
In concluding the paper, M. de Vito states that submarine experts have
always opposed large submarines, and he surmises that they appreciate the
difficulties more clearly than others with less experience, and prefer to
advance by reasonable steps to larger dimensions. Before the war, Italian
experts considered 700 tons as the maximum limit of displacement, and
this opinion was shared in other countries. During the war, however, sub-
marines of over 2,000 tons were constructed and operated successfully, indi-
cating that the difficulties were less than had been anticipated. He considers
that to the defensive, offensive and mine-layer types it is necessary to add
the submarine cruiser, and although he recognizes the time has not yet
arrived, presumably for lack of the powerful engines required, it will not
be long before the type is built. He believes a solution will be found by
reducing the submerged power installation to a minimum.
The author has successfully accomplished the object he had in view when
writing the paper. For various reasons information on submarines is far
more limited than for ordinary warships, and the data given in the paper
will indicate to the non-expert some of the difficulties of submarine design.
The naval officer will appreciate the effect of modification of qualities, espe-
cially surface and submerged speeds, on the displacement, while the expert
will find matter for study and criticism in the details of the cruiser design.
Two important considerations have not been mentioned in the paper. The
first of these is the cost of such vessels, and the second the tactical and
strategical purposes for which they are intended. In this country the cost
of a 3,000-ton submarine would be at least a million pounds, for which
three or four submarines of the offensive type of from 1,000 or 1,200 tons
could be constructed. The determination of the type to be built is the duty
of the higher naval authorities, but unless the cruiser type possesses very
great advantages over the equivalent larger number of the smaller and
offensive type, it is difficult to find a satisfactory reason for building it.
CURRENT NAVAL AND PROFESSIONAL PAPERS
“The Hawaiian Maneuvers,” by Brigadier General Richmond P. Davis,
U.S.A. Coast Artillery Journal, July.
“Hydro-Electric Development at Muscle Shoals." The Engineer, July 3,
et seq.
"Meteorology, An Aid in Warfare,” The Military Engineer, July-August.
"The World's Largest Diesel Electric Ships," (M.S. J. W. Van Dyke),
Nautical Gazette, July 4.
“Liner Tonnage in Overseas Trade," Nautical Gazette, July 24 and
August 1.
"Application of Turbine to European Inland Waterway Navigation," (De-
scription of Turbine Paddle Wheel Tug 245 ft. long, 31 ft. beam, 4!2 it.
draft.) The Marine Engineer and Motorship Builder, July.
"Turbine Blade Corrosion Prevented by Eliminating Oxygen," (Abstract
of Paper Read before American Chemical Society). Power, July 21.
"The Problem of the Tank.” The Journal of the Royal Artillery, July.


  p. 1799 (#731)                      #

NOTES ON INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS
FROM 7 JULY TO 7 AUGUST
PREPARED BY PROFESSOR ALLEN WESTCOTT, U. S. NAVAL
DEMY
EUROPEAN SECURITY NEGOTIATIONS
GERMAN REPLY Favorable.—Germany's reply to the French observa-
tions on Germany's offer of a security pact was handed to M. Briand,
French Minister of Foreign Affairs, on July 20. Germany's latest reply
again raised objections to the military obligations that would be incurred
by Germany's joining the league, and expressed objection also to the
proposal that France should act as guarantor for the treaties to be negotiated
between Germany and her eastern neighbors.
The note proceeds to deal with "the serious consequences," which might
arise from the form of the French proposals for the guarantee of the
treaties of arbitration. Pointing out the absolute power which it is proposed
to give the guarantor, the note says:
"This would mean that, should a conflict arise, it would be for the
guarantor to decide which of the two contracting parties to a treaty of ar-
bitration should be considered the aggressor, and he would have the right
to decide, even if he were bound to one of the contracting parties by a
special alliance. It is quite clear that the system of guarantees would
by such construction be invalidated, to the sole detriment of Germany. Real
pacification, as aimed at by the German Government, in concert with the
Allied governments, would not be reached
In the way of general remarks the note says: “In spite of the doubt and
apprehensions here indicated, the German Government is able to observe
that on essential points a significant rapprochment of views by the two sides
already has taken place. The interested governments are in principle
unanimous in their desire to settle the security problem on the lines Ger-
many has suggested and by further development of the system of arbitration
treaties."
Expressing the conviction that these difficulties can be overcome, the note
concludes:
"The German Government would heartily welcome acceleration of these
discussions so that the urgent desire of the nations for reliable guarantees
of peace and peaceful development, as well as for the restoration of the
world's normal economic relations destroyed by the war, soon may be
satisfied."
Press reports indicated a difference of position between France and
Great Britain on the arbitration features of the proposed agreement.
France desired that arbitration should be obligatory, and that the treaties
between Germany on the one hand and Poland and Czecho-Slovakia on
the other should have a guarantor; whereas the British Government ap-


  p. 1800 (#732)                      #

1800
[Sept.
U. Ș. Naval Institute Proceedings
peared inclined to put Germany on an equal footing and consider her
word as good as that of the Allies. A consultation of British and French
ministers was planned before M. Briand made his reply.
SKILL OF GERMAN NOTE.-- (By Robert Dell in Baltimore Sun of July 23).
Rarely has the Quai d'Orsay been presented with a document so difficult
to answer. It is now France that is in danger of appearing as an obstacle
to peace and to the conclusion of the proposed security pact.
Two passages in the German reply are particularly effective. One refers
to the proposed French guarantee of arbitration treaties between Germany
on the one hand and Poland and Czecho-Slovakia on the other. The
skillful way in which the reply makes clear that France, in fact, proposes
to act as Foreign Minister Stresemann has previously said privately, as
second and umpire at the same time puts the French Government in a
very difficult position.
Equally effective is the German argument relative to Article XVI of the
League of Nation's covenant, with its telling allusion to the fact that, ac-
cording to the Treaty of Versailles, German disarmament is to be only the
prelude to general disarmament. It is quite natural that Germany should
ask for exceptional treatment as a member of the league in regard to Ar-
ticle XVI so long as she is in her present exceptional position.
Switzerland has, in fact, already been granted exceptional treatment in
this respect because she is a neutral country.
The German reply spikes the French objection, that all members of the
league must have equal rights and duties, by showing that Germany will
not have equal rights until her disarmament is followed by general dis-
armament.
DEBT NEGOTIATIONS
BELGIAN Mission to UNITED STATES.—The Belgian Debt Commission,
consisting of Former Premier Theunis, the American Ambassador Baron
de Cartier, and two leading Belgian bankers, arrived in New York on
August 5. Negotiations were scheduled to begin shortly thereafter, and a
speedy solution was anticipated. In a speech in the Belgian Parliament on
July 15, Paul Hymans, Belgian Foreign Minister at the time of the Versailles
Treaty, presented the view that the United States was under special moral
obligations in regard to the Belgian debt, in view of the fact that Belgium
had signed the Versailles Treaty only upon express assurance of priority of
payments from Germany to Belgium and concessions regarding payment of
Belgium's debts to the Allies; and that although the Versailles Treaty was
not ratified by the United States Senate, President Wilson's signature in a
measure committed the American Government. This view was not accepted
by Washington officials.
The Italian negotiations with the American Debt Commission were fur-
ther postponed by the departure of Ambassador de Martino for Italy early
in August
It was reported on July 30 that French debt negotiations in London had
broken down, owing to the unwillingness of Great Britain to accept the
French offer of annual payments of £4,000,000 plus £6,000,000 in German
marks to be transferred from France's share of payments from Germany.


  p. 1801 (#733)                      #

1925]
1801
.
Notes on International Affairs
Negotiations were postponed indefinitely, until after French negotiations
with the United States.
.
FRANCE
FRENCH SUCCESS IN MOROCCO.- Following the appointment of General
Naulin as director of military operations in Morocco, under Marshal Lyautey
as Minister of War to the Sultan and French Resident in Morocco, French
forces began offensive operations with apparently general success.
On July 9 further agreements were signed between France and Spain,
providing for a land blockade to supplement the joint naval blockade of
Riff territory, and providing also for coordination of aims in the prosecu-
tion of the war, determination of political boundaries and zones of interest,
and an agreement not to conclude a separate peace. Thus, even in the event
of complete victory over the Riffs, there will remain the problems involved
in Spanish control in Morocco and incapacity to subdue the subject popula-
tion.
Peace terms were offered to Abd-el-Krim and were published in the
London Times, but these were so difficult of acceptance as to support the
view that they were put forward by the French Government merely to se-
cure Socialist acquiescence for the credits needed to carry on the war.
In the middle of July the Chamber voted a credit of 183,000,000 francs
(about $9,000,000), the Socialists not voting and the Communists forming
the opposition.
NEAR EAST
GREEK-Bulgarian TENSION.—(From Baltimore Sun of August 5).
Paris, August 4 (AP).-Greek troops were on their way to the Greeco-
Bulgarian frontier today, having been dispatched by the Greek Government
following the recent assassination of M. Nicolaides, a Greek citizen, at
Stanimaka, Bulgaria, and allegations by Greece of terroristic acts by Bul-
garians against Greeks along the border line.
Word has reached here from Athens that the government has pointed
out the possibility of seizing Bulgarian frontier towns in retaliation for the
killing of M. Nicolaides unless suitable reparation is made. While one
report from the Greek capital is that the Bulgarian reception of the demand
for reparation has not been favorable, a dispatch from Sofia, the Bulgarian
capital, says that in reply to the Greek communication, Foreign Minister
Kalfoff has expressed extreme regret over the assassination and promised
that all measures would be taken to punish the offenders.
M. Dendramis, Greek delegate to the League of Nations and Greek
Minister to Switzerland, is reported in a dispatch from Geneva as saying
that if the reply to the note sent from Athens to Sofia is not considered
satisfactory by Greece, an appeal would be taken to the League of Nations.
Under the voluntary agreement for the exchange of populations between
the two Governments, M. Dendramis explained, about 6,000 Greek residents
in Bulgaria were scheduled to depart for their homeland by mid-October.
In Greece, he said, the recent murders were looked upon as designed to ter-
rorize the Greeks into leaving in haste, thus affording an opportunity for the
confiscation of their property.


  p. 1802 (#734)                      #

1802
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
LATIN AMERICA
Latin AMERICA AND THE LEAGUE OF NATIONS.—(From Baltimore Sun
of July 27).
Williamstown, Massachusetts, July 27 (AP).-The assertion that a
growing trend toward a balance of power in the Latin-American countries
must be combated by the United States to avoid the same disastrous con-
sequences which resulted from the European balance of power was made
here today by Dr. Leo S. Rowe, director general of the Pan-American
Union, at Washington.
Stating that the tremendous and rapidly increasing volume of investments
by this country in the Latin-American countries is creating a fear there
of coming political domination, and citing the fact that the League of
Nations has developed in the Latin-American republics a much greater
consciousness of individuality and power, Dr. Rowe said:
"In view of the probable developments in the next twenty-five or fifty
years there could be nothing worse than this country's policy of isolation
from Europe on one hand and from Latin-America on the other, by reason
of the latter's affiliation with the league.
"Such a policy would be disastrous to our domestic development and would
place us on the defensive as a nation. Therefore, we have a very deep in-
terest in fostering an American system in which we shall form a part and
in which we shall be integrated as the Latin-American countries are inte-
grated.”
Discussing remedies for the situation by closer cooperation among all
the Americas, Dr. Rowe said:
"The formation of intellectual and cultural ties between this country and
the other American nations is a patriotic duty and we must not lull our-
selves to sleep with the thought that commercial bonds are sufficient. It is
essential, also, that Great Britain, with her possessions in this hemisphere,
be given a voice in the determination of Pan-American policies.
"The United States must make the Monroe Doctrine a continental doc-
trine, arousing the confidence of the Latin-American countries instead of
their distrust as at present."
This distrust was clearly shown, he asserted, "by the fact that disputes
between Latin-American republics have been submitted to the League of
Nations, which has superseded the action of the United States in securing
their settlement."
“When seventeen of the twenty Latin-American states were admitted to
the league," he went on, "it looked as if the discussion of American ques-
tions would be shifted from Washington to Geneva. There is a growing
feeling that the league may serve the countries to the south of us as a
counterweight to the influence of the United States.
"The fact of the overwhelming power of the United States, the fact that
from a military, naval, commercial and national viewpoint our power out-
weighs that of all the Latin-American countries combined is alone enough to
create a constant questioning as to what the United States is going to
do next.
"We are beginning to realize, however," he said, "that insofar as we
can develop a unity of purpose and of policy with these countries, our in-
fluence in world affairs will be correspondingly strengthened."
U. S. MARINES LEAVE NICARAGUA.—The 150 marines remaining in Nica-
ragua out of the company that Captain (now General) Smedley Butler
took there in 1912 will embark tomorrow for their journey back to the
United States, it was announced at the Navy Department today. They will
arrive at Hampton Roads on August 17 and from there will go to the
East Coast expeditionary base at Quantico, Virginia.


  p. 1803 (#735)                      #

1925)
1803
Notes on International Affairs
The marines were sent to Nicaragua under the command of Butler to
quiet the reign of terror that brought to a close the sixteen years' rule
of Dictator Jose Santos Zelaya and continued after he left office. At the
time it was announced that they would be kept there so long as the interests
and lives of foreigners were in danger.
The "lost battalion," as the marines were designated by the natives,
stayed through the administration of half a dozen presidents. Several
times former Secretary of State Hughes made moves to withdraw them,
but each time the party in power, representing the anti-Liberal element,
urged that they be retained. All the while, though, the opposition to the
party in power fought against the American supervision.
This year, when the Liberals got into power with a platform of “Nica-
ragua for Nicaraguans," it might have been expected that the new Presi-
dent, Carlos Solorzano, would wish a speedy departure of Uncle Sam's
troops—but he did not. Solorzano requested an extension of their stay and
it was agreed last winter that the marines would remain until not later
than September i to drill a native constabulary to take their place in main-
taining law and order.
Since the marines went to Nicaragua the gold standard has been estab-
lished, the monetary system has been reformed on the basis of the dollar
and a financial organization has been built up by a committee of Americans
and natives. The customs tariff was revised, the railroad was placed on a
dividend paying basis and the public debt was studied and liquidated to the
satisfaction of all, it is said, with the exception of about 3 per cent of the
creditors.
FAR EAST
Russo-JAPANESE RIVALRY IN MANCHURIA.—(From The Struggle in
Manchuria, by Philip Kerby, reprinted in Living Age from Japan Ad-
vertiser of May 19).
During the past six months the activity of both Russia and Japan in
Manchuria to gain economic and military supremacy has been increased
a hundred fold. No effort has been spared on the part of either nation
to forge ahead the outposts of their separate civilizations, and it would
seem that in the very near future a crisis must occur which will have an
effect upon the whole of Northern Asia.
After making an extensive trip lasting more than two months and taking
in nearly all of both Southern and Northern Manchuria, I firmly believe
that the stage is set for one of the greatest economic battles of modern
history. Whether or not it will assume proportions of open conflict, time
alone can tell. Both the Soviet and Japan are making preparations for
development in Manchuria on a much greater scale than ever before at-
tempted, but both are reckoning without their host, namely, China.
The Soviet has sworn "blood allegiance" to China and is doing every-
thing in her power to further the abrogation of the so-called "unequal
treaties"--if we are to believe the statements of Comrade Karakham,
first Soviet Ambassador to China in Peking. While the Soviet is meta-
phorically patting China on the back with one hand, she is calmly pursuing
an imperialistic policy of land-grabbing and concession-hunting with the
other which would have put the Tsarists to shame. The Soviet encroach-
ments in Manchuria during the past half year are greater than at any time
since the period immediately preceding the Russo-Japanese War.
NINE-POWER TREATY RATIFIED.-Early in July France ratified the two
Nine-Power Treaties relating to China which were negotiated in 1922 at
the Washington Conference. Since all other powers concerned (United


  p. 1804 (#736)                      #

1804
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
States, Great Britain, Italy, Japan, The Netherlands, Portugal, Belgium,
and China) had previously ratified, arrangements were made at Washington
for final exchange of ratifications on August 5, and for the calling of an
international conference, as provided in the treaties, to consider abrogation
of an extraterritoriality (consular courts), setting up of mixed courts, with-
drawal of foreign troops from China, and retrocession of leaseholds.
The Nine-Power Treaties include the so-called Root resolution binding the
powers to respect the sovereignty, independence, and administrative in-
tegrity of China, and to maintain the principle of equality of opportunity
for all nations in commerce and industry.
PROPOSALS TO China.—(From Baltimorė Sun, July 22).
Washington, July 22 (AP).-Definite proposals for settlement of pending
questions growing out of the recent anti-foreign outbreak in China are ex-
pected to be transmitted to the Chinese Provisional government by the
Peking diplomats in the near future.
While details are lacking, it now seems certain that the settlement
formula to be presented by the Peking diplomats will embrace two distinct
elements. They are :
Convocation of the Chinese customs revision conference with a minimum
of delay and creation of a commission to inquire into extra-territorial mat-
ters at a date still to be fixed.
Reference of the question of responsibility for bloodshed in the recent
Shanghai riots to a judicial inquiry, with the Chinese Government participat-
ing, and all governments bound to abide by the findings.
Formal expressions from Japan of her desire to carry out strictly the
commitments entered into with respect to China at the Washington Con-
ference is expected to pave the way for the first step. Similar expressions
from other governments are confidently expected as the result of the note
proposing this course sent out by Secretary Kellogg.
China and Russia.--(From Time, July 20).
Unbiased reports from China—that is, the average of biased reports, for
all communications from that once celestial land are more or less colored-
seem unanimous that the root of the disturbances is due to the foreign
powers which exploit China economically and dominate her politically.
Bolshevik influences, which are obviously existent, found rather than caused
a situation of deep discontent, which was naturally receptive of Moscow's
virulent propaganda.
But, if Bolshevism is not at the bottom of the Chinese anti-foreign move-
ment, it is a menace capable of endless trouble in China which can be offset
only by the unified action of the powers. The greatest danger is that the
Chinese Government, being met with nothing from the powers (mainly
Britain) but chilly demands for justice with idemnities for the Shanghai
outrages, will listen readily to the friendly advances of Moscow. Un-
doubtedly with this in their minds, the United States, Britain, and Japan
agreed to a compromise at Tokyo aimed at calming China, while at Swamp-
scott President Coolidge insisted on a scrupulous observance of the Nine-
Power Treaties, and respect for foreign lives and property by China and
virtually called an international conference for the fall.
The signs in Peking were that the Chinese Government would do its
best-and what that is remains to be seen-to restore quiet. How far the
nationalistic students will support the central government is another specula-


  p. 1805 (#737)                      #

1925]
1805
Notes on International Affairs
tion which appears equally impossible to hazard. Said the New York Times:
“When do Chinese students study?"
AMERICANS KILLED AND CAPTURED.—(From New York Times, July 24).
Peking, July 23 (AP).-Morgan Palmer, an American, has been killed by
bandits at his ranch on the Sungari River, near Harbin, Manchuria. Dr.
Harvey J. Howard, an eye specialist attached to the Rockefeller Hospital
in Peking, was captured at the same time.
Consular advices from Kalgan state that Mr. Palmer was killed on
July 20 while defending his property against the bandits.
Mr. Palmer and his mother, Dr. Howard and his son James, and an
American trader named Harold Baldwin of Kalgan, Chihli Province, to-
gether with his wife and child, were visiting Mr. Palmer's ranch, which
is in the Province of Kirin, when the attack was made.
The consular advices say that Dr. Hoard was still in captivity last
night, while the others were “safe for the present," but their whereabouts
was not known.
Mr. Palmer was connected with the Salt Administration in Peking, but
retired some time ago to conduct an experimental farm.


  p. 1806 (#738)                      #

BOOK REVIEWS
COMBATS ET BATAILLES SUR MER (September-Decem-
ber, 1914)—Claude Farrère et Paul Chack, Paris. E. Flam-
marion, Editeur, Paris. 7 fr. 95. p. 279.
REVIEWED BY REAR ADMIRAL ALBERT GLEAVES, U. S. N. (Red.)
The authors of these stories of sea fights during the World War are
naval officers of distinction. They are commanders on the active list, and
were classmates at the Naval School at Brest. Farrère is a well known
novelist and playwright, and in the service is generally regarded as a second
Pierre Loti. Commander Chack is chief of the historical section of the
Admiralty, and is the author of the Guerre de Croiseurs, a monumental
work which for originality in design, and wealth of detail is probably su-
perior to any other history of the operations which it describes. The
writers have blended their individual styles so admirably that it is not
possible to discern the dividing line; we presume, however, that Farrère
paints the background of sea and earth and sky, against which Chack
projects, with characteristic clearness and unusual freedom from technical
phraseology, a few chapters from the Odyssey of Count von Spee's ill-
fated squadron. The student, and also those who read for amusement, will
be interested in the pictures of the tropics, notably of Tahiti; that wonder
of the ocean bed, the submarine forests of coral at the Abrolhas Islands,
(“lookout for breakers") which are visible at a depth of twenty fathoms
when the sea is calm, and the sun high, and of the storm encountered by
the Germans on the voyage around the Horn.
The stories are made up largely from the personal narratives of the
survivors, and contain much material which, so far as we know, has not
hitherto been published. The human element of the book constitutes its
principal charm.
The operations selected by the authors are the bombardment of Papéété,
the "Death" of the Emden, the “Cavalry and Passion" of Admiral Cradock,
and the battle of the Falkland Islands.
The volume begins with a brief statement of the war situation as it was
on September 22, 1914, when "more than 850,000,000 of human beings, that
is to say, more than one half of the inhabitants of the globe, were more or
less engaged in the gigantic struggle, with eyes anxiously fixed on the
trenches, and ears listening to the fabulous tumult of armed forces. No
one, or almost no one, thought of the sea, and yet it was by the sea that
the contest was to be decided. To keep the sea lanes open for reinforcing
and supplying the troops at the front was the task for four years of the
allied navies.”


  p. 1807 (#739)                      #

1925]
1807
Book Reviews
Fifteen days before war was declared Admiral von Spee with his
squadron sailed from Tsing-tau and disappeared into the “blue immensity”
of the Pacific Ocean. About the same time a number of big German col-
liers departed without clearing from various ports of China and Japan.
Notwithstanding all efforts by wireless and cable, no news could be obtained
of their whereabouts, and eighty cruisers failed to located them. Thus
the Germans became a fleet in being, a menace to commerce and convoy,
holding the supreme strategic advantage of choice of time and position.
With a fatal disregard of this, the German admiral revealed his secret
to the world by appearing off Apia on September 14 with the Scharnhorst
and Gneisenau in the vain hope of surprising some British cruiser. Disap-
pointed in this, he continued on toward his rendezvous at Easter Island, but
stopped at Bora-Bora in the Society Islands to coal from the colliers he
had with him. Flying no colors, and covering the names of the ships with
tarpaulins, they were taken for English ships by the people on shore.
Cap ribbons were removed, and no officers were allowed on deck who
could not speak either French or English. When, therefore, the French
representative, a brigadier of gendarmes, came on board, he was completely
fooled and freely answered all questions. From him the admiral learned that
the defenses at Tahiti were insignificant and had not been strengthened,
and there was no ship there except a small gunboat and a German collier
containing 3,000 tons of coal, which she had recently captured. In the
afternoon von Spee sailed, and as he passed out of the harbor a large
French flag was hoisted ashore. He replied by displaying his own national
colors!
The next morning at day break, the German ships appeared off Tahiti
out of a dense fog. The captain of the Zelee, the French gunboat, had
assumed charge of the defense of the island. His name was Destremau
and he was a lieutenant de vaisseau, and is highly commended by the
authors as an exceptionally fine officer. Von Spee probably would not
have fired on the town had not the little French battery opened on him.
The result of the affair was that the Germans sank the gunboat and collier
by gun fire and fired a number of shells into the village of Papéété, which
caught fire and "burned like a torch." As the French had already set
fire to their own coal pile and destroyed the leading marks of the channel,
the object of the visit to replenish his colliers was frustrated, and von Spee
proceeded to the Marquesas, anchoring for a few hours in the beautiful
harbor of Nuka-Hiva where Commodore “Essex" Porter had refitted his
ships just 100 years before, prior to his battle in Valparaiso Harbor. ..
The authors consider the "combat de Tahiti” as lost by von Spee and won
by Lieutenant Destremau. Four years afterwards Destremau, then dead,
was awarded the posthumous honor of the rosette of the Legion of Honor
and the Croix de Guerre, on the recommendation of Admiral de Bon, the
chief of the naval general staff.
To Captain von Müller, of the Emden, the authors give unstinted praise.
Their opinion is that he lived up to the high traditions of the sea, and they
compare him with Sorcouf and Pierre de Bouvet.


  p. 1808 (#740)                      #

1808
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
On August 12 the Emden, which had sailed from Tsing-tau on August 3,
joined von Spee at Pagen Island. At the request of von Müller he was de-
tached and ordered on special duty. From that time until the loss of the
Emden at Cocos Island, on November 9, his career was one of destruction
and terror to merchant shipping, but without stain or blemish; as the
authors say, "he was a gentleman.” In this brief notice we are only con-
cerned with the Emden's action with the destroyer Mousquet immediately
following von Müller's brilliant exploit at Penang.
The Mousquet, under the command of Lieutenant Théroinne, was re-
turning from a night patrol off Penang ; her ammunition was stored away,
torpedo tubes trained fore and aft, awnings spread and the ship tidied
up for the day. At 6:20, when about fourteen miles north of Penang, she
sighted the Emden through the mist, and taking her for an ally hoisted the
recognition signal of the day, which was returned by a salvo of five 10 c.m.
shell, followed at minute intervals by five others. The Emden hoisted
her own colors and closed in but kept out of torpedo range. The action
lasted sixteen minutes (Corbett says seven). The Mousquet was literally
shot to pieces and went slowly down, bow first, her colors flying at the
gaff, her stern high in air, “as if drawn to heaven by the three-colored flag
of France."
The Germans picked up the survivors, many of whom were wounded,
but the captain, two officers and forty men disappeared with the ship.
The French fought to the last against overwhelming odds with that
courage, which, to use Macaulay's fine phrase, has so often claimed the
admiration of history. In that early morning fight Théroinne and his men
gave the French Navy another glorious tradition, and proved themselves
worthy successors of the great Suffren. Officers and crew were cited
for bravery, eight received special mention, and the name of Ensign Carri-
son was given to an ex-German submarine.
After the battle of Coronel von Spee with the Scharnhorst and Gneisenau
put into Valparaiso on November 3, 1914.
At once the ships were surrounded by a multitude of small boats filled
with an excited howling mob of Germans, screaming "Hochs," and calling
for the admiral to show himself.
But the count did not appear. He was closeted in his cabin with his
chief of staff, preparing his own report of the battle and scanning the
despatches just received. Save for bits of news, more or less unreliable,
which have drifted through Reuters and Havas he had been without in-
formation for many weeks.
When the German Minister came on board he at once began a flowery
speech of welcome, hailing von Spee as the Master of the Sea. The latter,
grave and dignified, interrupted and took him to his cabin with Captain
Fielitz, and the three remained there for two hours. When the conference
was over it was noticed that the admiral seemed even more serious, and
the gaiety of the minister had entirely vanished. In the meantime German
bands were making the harbor ring with Deutchland über Alles, Heil dir
im Seigerskrans and the Wacht am Rhein.


  p. 1809 (#741)                      #

1925)
1809
Book Reviews
The admiral declined all invitations ashore except the banquet in the
evening at the German club given by the German colony. This was an
obligatory sacrifice which he could not escape. The authors say, “The Ad-
miral dined at the club, drank champagne, and drained the chalice to the
dregs.” It was all in the day's work, a part of his trade.
To an old friend on the legation staff who said au revoir to him, he
replied Not au revoir, but adieu, and to another who presented him with
flowers, "I will keep these to the end ; they will still be fresh at our
funerals.”
It was not until after Coronel that the German Admiralty seemed to
see the writing on the wall, and, in despatches received at Valparaiso, it
suggested to von Spee that he return to Germany with his ships, but that
he keep them together. The authors criticize this as lacking in dash and
determination, and express the opinion that the admiral should have been
directed to scatter his force, the ships to make the best of their way in-
dependently, avoiding action, coaling from their own colliers or from prizes.
At the end of the allowed twenty-four hours von Spee put to sea and
returned to Mas-a-fuera. He realized the increasing seriousness of his
position and that it was daily more difficult to obtain shelter in Chilian
harbors or opportunities to coal. All the news received at Valparaiso con-
vinced him that the famous German organization was crumbling. He must
have passed many gloomy hours in his cabin alone with his thoughts. It
has been said that just as mercury shows the coming of bad weather and will
shrink within its glass artery, so there may be some subtle property in the
blood which perceives the hands that are raised to waste and spill it. If
this be true the German admiral's blood must have warned him of his fate.
From all accounts of his last days from those who saw him in Chile and the
few survivors from the fleet who are qualified to speak, Count von Spee
was a changed man after his victory over Cradock. He was obsessed with
the idea of English revenge. Had he pushed on with his former energy
after leaving Valparaiso, either to the Falklands or to the coast of Argen-
tine, history would have been written differently, but he spent a week coaling
at Mas-a-fuera, and again five days in St. Quentin Bay, 300 miles north
of the Straits of Magellan. It seemed, as the authors say, that he could
not make up his mind to leave those calm waters, or the hospitable shores
of the Gulf of Peñas “trembling with the call of the southern springtime.”
The voyage to Cape Horn was made in such heavy weather that speed was
reduced to little more than steerage way, and the ships loaded to the gunwales
with coal labored so heavily that the seas broke over them as upon rocks
at half tide. The wind blew a hurricane from the southwest and over-
head black clouds drove like a funeral pall over the doomed ships. Ac-
cording to the authors they were frequently on their beam ends, rolling
their keels out of water.
On December 2 the squadron was off the Horn and the weather began to
abate. At this time the Leipzig sighted an English sailing vessel which
proved to be a collier. For von Spee it was an unfortunate prize. She


  p. 1810 (#742)                      #

1810
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
was towed to Picton Island at the entrance of Beagle Channel, and the next
day the ships coaled again. The three days delay at Picton Island sealed
their death warrant.
Before sailing on December 6, the captains were called on board the
flagship, and, to their astonishment, were informed by von Spee that he
proposed to attack Port Stanley. The chief of staff and the captain of the
Nürnberg were the only ones who concurred; the others were silent, ex-
cept the captain of the Leipzig, who firmly dissented, but the admiral
had at last made up his mind. He ended the conference by saying, “Gentle-
men, I have spoken. Day after tomorrow at 8:00 A.M. we shall attack Port
Stanley." It was a dramatic scene and reminds one of Beauregard's coun-
cil of war the night before the second day's battle of Shiloh: "Gentlemen.
tomorrow night we shall sleep in the camps of the enemy," and the dreams of
the admiral were as futile as those of the general.
The authors' account of how the news of Coronel was received at the
Admiralty, of Sir John Fisher's calmness but prompt action is as graphic
as Sir Quiller-Couch's description of Lord Barham's reception of the mes-
senger from Trafalgar. When Admiral Oliver, the chief of staff, showed
the telegram to Fisher, without a word the latter turned to the chart on
which the positions of the allied and enemy's ships were plotted with colored
pins, picked out those of the Good Hope and the Monmouth and dropped
them on the floor. After a few minutes thought he measured the distance
between Valparaiso and Falkland and from the English Channel to Falk-
land, then said “Call Sturdee.” Admiral Sturdee left London on an hour's
notice for Devonport and on November il sailed for the South Atlantic
with the Invincible and the Inflexible. He arrived at the Abrozhos Islands
on November 26, where he found the squadron of Rear Admiral Stoddert
consisting of six ships. From Admiral Stoddert, Sturdee heard that the
Germans were expected to arrive off the Plate about December 15.
Fisher had said that von Spee would go to the Falklands, and Sturdee
refused to be diverted by unreliable telegrams and conflicting reports that
the Germans were on the west coast of South America bound for Panama ;
at any rate that contingency had been provided for by the Titan in London,
who had sent the Princess Royal to the West Indies. On November 28,
two days after the Germans started for the Falklands, Sturdee sailed from
the Abrolhos rendezvous. He arrived at Port Stanley at 11:00 A.m. on
December 7 and at once began coaling and overhauling engines.
History, perhaps, does not record a greater surprise or one fraught with
more momentous consequences, than that of the navigator of the Gneisenau
when he sighted the tripodmasts of the British battle cruisers over the sand
dunes of the Falklands, at daybreak on December 8. Those masts spelled the
death warrant of Admiral von Spee's squadron. It is the opinion of the
authors that even at this hour von Spee had a chance, and that a Nelson
or a Suffren would have seized it and won. The English were at anchor,
coaling, overhauling engines, under low steam, and without a thought
that the Germans were east of Cape Horn. It was a situation that would


  p. 1811 (#743)                      #

1925)
1811
Book Reviews
have meant disaster to Sturdee had von Spee been a Farragut or a Dewey.
Lord Fisher once said that imagination and audacity beget surprise, and
according to the authors von Spee, whom they admit was a good fighter,
lacked the very qualities of imagination and audacity which make a great
leader; they admit that he was a valiant sailor, but no chart genius, and
did not know how to make war.
The story of December 8 has never been better told. "Sturdee held all
of the trumps, but Sir John Fisher had won the battle a month before-
what followed was the execution, not swift destruction by the guillotine,
but destruction by the slow process of the saw. The battle dragged nearly
three hours. The end, however, was the same, and von Spee's head fell into
the basket.”
During the battle a singular thing occurred. A sailing ship under full
canvas suddenly appeared between the opposing vessels. She saluted by
dipping her colors, which, unfortunately could not be made out. The salute,
of course, could not be returned, but Sturdee, with the meticulous courtesy
of the sea, ran off his course to clear her, and the Invincible, none the less
gallant, opened out from the Inflexible, in order that the ricochets from the
Germans might go clear of "the frail hull and her snowy sails bathed in the
sunshine.”
"Even as the French guns on the Marne sounded the knell of the German
Armies, so the British guns off the Falklands sounded the knell of the Ger-
man Navy. The guns of Falkland were heard in London, and Fisher
recognized them—he had waited for them. They were heard in Berlin and
their burning breath scorched the Kaiser and von Tirpitz, for they dedicated
the German squadrons to defeat.”
So ends the book. It is to be hoped that the authors will find as com-
petent and sympathetic a translator as the author of that other classic,
Ariel.
COMBATS ET BATAILLES SUR MER (September-Decem-
ber, 1914)—By Claude Farrère and Paul Chack. E. Flam-
marion, Editor. Paris. 7 fr. 95. Five articles : Tahiti, Penang,
La Mort de l'Emden, Coronel and Les Falkland.
These articles are far from being war stories such as we have known them
from the pen of the “Correspondent” or the "Eye Witness.” There are some
efforts at literary garnish, some speculative and descriptive digressions,
but the dominant tone is that of an appreciative expert noting faithfully
and progressively what is happening and the conditions under which it is
happening. Time and again, the authors refuse to maneuver for dramatic
effect, little inclined to make a thriller out of the subject matter ; on the
other hand, they are equally far from the grave historian. Generalization
is avoided, detail is the order of the day, and episodes have their place.
Furthermore, the style is conversational, informal, at times familiar and
even rubbing elbows with jargon. However, the details are invariably


  p. 1812 (#744)                      #

1812
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
significant and the episodes luminous and interesting. If the style flies
below the literary levels, it makes up by being remarkably clear, concise,
flexible, and, shall we say, self-effacing ? Objects, events, states of mind are
rapidly noted, significance and relation neatly underscored. The reader
is hardly aware of reading; he has the feeling of reality, of selected,
significant reality.
Tahiti.—The book should not be judged by the first article. Notwith-
standing many excellent pages on the general situation contained in Tahiti,
this article suffers severely from heterogeneous elements, aims and efforts,
and is considerably marred by gusts of a controversial nature. It also
fails to carry persuasion in the main theme. To be sure, Lieutenant
Destremau performs his duty in admirable fashion, but the lay reader is
not persuaded that three volleys from 65-mm. guns frightened von Spee
into renouncing his plan of taking Tahiti. In fact, the reader is not
informed why von Spee, whose escarde fantôme is causing so much anxiety
by the mystery of its whereabouts, should abandon his design on Cradock's
squadron and announce himself “at home at Papéété." All that the reader
sees is that von Spee carefully surveys the situation, takes the most favor-
able position, opens fire and reduced Papéété to ashes.
Penang.-Penang is perhaps the best of the five articles. The historical
event is simple: The Russian cruiser Yemchoug moors in the harbor of
Penang. Toward daybreak, the Emden passes by, fires one torpedo going ;
another, coming; the Yemchoug is no more; the Emden sinks a French
torpedo boat and leaves for an unknown destination.
How did it happen? or, did it actually happen? Was it a nightmare?
a mirage? Such seems to have been the atmosphere, and the authors excel
in reproducing that atmosphere in the making.
La Mort de l'Emden is more exhilarating reading. It covers the career
of the Einden after Penang, including her fight for life, as well as the
Odyssey of von Mücke, beginning on a sail boat at Cocos Islands and ending
at Constantinople, where he rejoins the German forces after eighty-four days
of peril and adventure. There is not an incident that could be spared
without loss; not a word that would not be missed; no delay in the progress
of the narrative unless it be to give the reader his bearings, to listen to the
wireless or to note that it is not heard. It is a stern but appreciative account
of will, courage, and resourcefulness.
Coronel and Les Falkland.-In both Coronel and Les Falkland much
space is devoted to preliminaries, to states of mind, to Cradock's vain
appeals for reinforcement and his stoic attitude after repeated refusals,
von Spee's heavy hearted celebration of the victory, a glance at Fisher, at
the War Office, at Sturdee's speedy departure for Port Stanley
The main action in each battle is fully noted. But, however important,
however long drawn, however touching and admirable in their stoic heroism,
they furnish less opportunity to the writers than the situation that follows
each main section, at dusk, in the dark: the suspense, anxiety, the nervous-
ness when friend and foe rub noses without recognizing each other. It is


  p. 1813 (#745)                      #

1925)
1813
Book Reviews
this phase of the fighting that also presents what is perhaps the outstanding
episode: the last gasps of the Monmouth.
Helplessly crippled, unable to move, with a list that makes her guns
point to the water on one side and to the clouds on the other, the Monmouth
is challenged in the dark by the Nürnberg. No reply. The enemy opens a
violent fire; he ceases, he renews. The sole reply is that of the last
projector casting its light on the flag Aoating from the after mast. Gradually
the Monmouth is gliding into the water, and the flag is foating and the
projector is shedding its light until it is extinguished by the water.
From the beginning to the end, through the irony sprinkled in Tahiti,
the sluggish atmosphere of Penang, the brisk career of the Emden, the
Odyssey of von Mücke and the tragedies of the South American waters,
the authors are sparing in, almost refraining from, terms expressing emotion.
It is by skilful selection and careful notation that they attain the desired
end.
It is realism with a vengeance.
H. B.
!
ALL THE WORLD'S AIRCRAFT. Founded by Fred T.
Jane, Edited and Compiled by C. G. Grey. Sampson Low, and
Marston, Ltd., 1923. D. Van Nostrand Co., New York.
$12.50
To those familiar with Jane's Fighting Ships little introduction is needed
to Jane's All the World's Aircraft. The two volumes, aside from being
similar in construction and binding, are also similar in general arrange-
ment.
All the World's Aircraft has been published yearly since 1911. The book
contains nearly 400 pages and consists of four parts as follows:
Part A-World's Aeronautical Progress.
......... 78 pages
Part B—All the World's Airplanes (Including Sections on
Helicopters and Glides)......
........ 230 pages
Part C—All the World's Aero-Engines..................... 53 pages
Part D-All the World's Airships.
.. 8 pages
Each of these four parts contains a separate section for every country
having standing in the aeronautical world. Photographs and sketches are
numerous.
The yearly editions follow closely the world's aeronautical progress.
During 1923 there was great activity in development of the aircraft engine.
Nearly every nation has begun to re-arm its air services with faster and
more powerful airplanes. These new types appear in the 1924 edition.
Several countries are producing new types of civilian airplanes for both
passenger and freight service. Among some of the most interesting machines
described appear a number of types designed and built in countries which


  p. 1814 (#746)                      #

1814
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
have not hitherto appeared as aircraft producers, having previously bought
all of their machines abroad.
One of the most striking features of airplane design during 1923 was
the introduction of light airplanes, commonly miscalled “motor gliders”
(because they were developed as a result of the glider competitions of 1922).
These are described and illustrated.
The air lines of the world are described at length. Such progress as has
been made in airship design is given attention. Gliders, though nearly
extinct, receive consideration. Several types of helicopters are described,
and even naval aircraft carriers are treated briefly.
A historical section deals fully with the latest developments of the air
services of all nations and gives details of the organization and establishment
of each nation's air force. For the first time considerable information is
given concerning aviation in the Union of Soviet Republics, generally called
Russia.
Captain W. H. Sayers, late R.A.F., and now technical editor of The
Aeroplane, deals comprehensively, in special articles, with the general trend
of aircraft and engine design, and indicates recent progress in comparison
with previous years.
Containing a variety of information generously illustrated, All the
World's Aircraft is a most valuable book for study and reference to every-
one interested in aeronautics.
W. W W.


  p. 1815 (#747)                      #

SECRETARY'S NOTES
Membership New members joining since last report:
Davis, Kenneth S., Ensign, U.S.C.G. Davis, R. G., Lieut. Comdr., U.S.N.
Raynor, Leroy P., Lieut., Č. & G. Survey Kelly, R. K., Lieut., U.S.N.
Bell, A. Colquhoun, Lieut. Comdr., R.B.N. Borden, M. E., Lieut., U.S.N.R.F.
Johnson, H. W., Lieut., U.S.N.
Wellings, Augustus J., Lieut., U.S.N.
Special Information
Number
The October, 1925, PROCEEDINGS will be
known as the “Special Information Num-
ber," commemorative of Navy Day.
The Institute desires articles of interest to all branches
Articles of the service, including the reserve force. Non-
members as well as members may submit articles, and
authors receive due compensation for articles published. Com-
pact, well digested articles are more likely to be accepted for
early publication. In accepting articles for publication, the In-
stitute reserves the right to have such articles revised or rearranged,
where necessary, in order to bring them up to the required stand-
ard of articles published in the PROCEEDINGS—the cost, if any, to
be deducted from the compensation due the author.
Contributors are requested to observe the following special in-
structions in preparing articles for the PROCEEDINGS:
(a) In writing names of ships put only the initial letters in
capitals and underscore the names. The underscoring sig.
nifies to the printer that the word is to be in italics. The
same applies to names of publications. Foreign words not
anglicized should also be italicized.
(b) In preparing tables and computations employing fractions,
sub-numbers, etc., do by hand that part which cannot be
made perfectly clear by the typewriter.
(c) In typing the script use double space between lines.
(d) When a quotation is included in an article the editor should
be assured by appropriate notation that the writer has care-
fully verified the quotation as presented.


  p. 1816 (#748)                      #

1816
(Sept.
:
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Perry's
Referring to page 1475 of the August PROCEED-
Ings in the article "Perry's Victory on Lake
Original Flag
Erie,” the original flag of Perry, bearing Law-
rence's motto, “Don't Give up the Ship,” is now at the Naval
Academy, and so displayed in Memorial Hall that it is the first
object to greet the eye of any midshipman or visitor.
Discussion of articles published in the PROCEED-
Discussions INGS is cordially invited. Discussions accepted
for publication are paid for at approximately
one-half the rate for original articles.
Book
Reviews
As soon as practicable after the publication of books
on subjects of professional interest, the Institute
aims to publish authoritative reviews of them.
The Institute desires to obtain a copy of Jane's
Jane's
"Fighting Ships”
Fighting Ships, 1924, the edition of which
is exhausted; and requests that anyone wish-
(1924)
ing to dispose of a copy communicate with
the Naval Institute, stating price desired and condition of book.
Storage Battery
Manual
The price of Dunn's Storage Battery Manual
has been reduced from $7.00 to $2.00 per copy.
New
Naval Ordnance, 1921 is now under revision. The
new book will be ready for issue about the 15th of
Books
November, and will be known as Naval Ordnance,
1925. It will retail at $8.00 per copy, postpaid.
There has just been received from the printer a new book,
Radio Manual, prepared by the Department of E. E. and P., U. S.
Naval Academy, for use as a textbook by midshipmen of the first
class. The book was designed to meet the special requirements
of the midshipmen, and treats not only with the receiving, but
also with the sending of messages. Price $3.00, postpaid.
H. A. BALDRIDGE,
; Captain, U. S. Navy, Secretary-Treasurer.


  p. 1816 (#749)                      #

United States
Naval Institute
Proceedings
VOL. 51
OCTOBER, 1925
NO. 272


LIN
KSTI
00
NAV
NAVAL
ACADEMY
U.S.
TUT
E
IDENS
1873
SCIENTIA)
CONTENTS
1817
1825
1832
1838
Gentlemen, The Navy.-Robinson . .
Navy Day. Howe
The Elements of Sea Power and the Future of the Navy.-Eberle
Petroleum and National Defense.—Jones.
Military Preparedness Necessary to the Economic and Social Welfare of the
United States.-Rodgers
The United States Marine Corps. -Lejeune.
Some Aviation Fundamentals.- Moffett.
The Wise Man Knows His Tools.-Robison,
The Development and Growth of the American Na
ans
The Array Against Sovereignty. Cluverius
The Naval Research Laboratory. -Foley
Unified Procurement of Government Aircraft.-Wilson
New Lease of Life for Old Ironsides.-Krafft
The Government-Owned Merchant Marine. — Palmer
Comparative Naval Data for the Treaty Navies
Discussion . . . .
Professional Notes .
Notes on International Affairs
Book Reviews
Secretary's Notes
..
1845
1858
1871
1882
1897
1916
1925
1933
1938
1944
1954
1961
1967
2036
2045
2047
....
.
..


  p. 1816 (#750)                      #

1816
(Sept.
:
U.S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Referring to page 1475 of the August PROCEED-
Perry's
Original Flag
Ings in the article “Perry's Victory on Lake
& Erie," the original flag of Perry, bearing Law-
rence's motto, “Don't Give up the Ship,” is now at the Naval
Academy, and so displayed in Memorial Hall that it is the first
object to greet the eye of any midshipman or visitor.
Discussion of articles published in the PROCEED-
Discussions INGS is cordially invited. Discussions accepted
for publication are paid for at approximately
one-half the rate for original articles.
Book
Reviews
As soon as practicable after the publication of books
on subjects of professional interest, the Institute
aims to publish authoritative reviews of them.
The Institute desires to obtain a copy of Jane's
Jane's
“Fighting Ships"
Fighting Ships, 1924, the edition of which
is exhausted; and requests that anyone wish-
(1924)
ing to dispose of a copy communicate with
the Naval Institute, stating price desired and condition of book.
Storage Battery The price of Dunn's Storage Battery Manual
Manual
has been reduced from $7.00 to $2.00 per copy.
Naval Ordnance, 1921 is now under revision. The
New
new book will be ready for issue about the 15th of
Books
November, and will be known as Naval Ordnance,
1925. It will retail at $8.00 per copy, postpaid.
There has just been received from the printer a new
Radio Manual, prepared by the Depart of E. E. and
Naval Academy, for use as a textbra hidshipm
class. The book was designed
of the midshipmen, and treat
also with the sending of m


  p. 1816 (#751)                      #


United States
Naval Institute
Proceedings
VOL. 51
OCTOBER, 1925
NO. 272
NST
VAL
NAV
NAVAL
ACADEMY
U.S.
TUTA
D
* 18
SCIENTIA
13
CONTENTS
n, T
-Robinson
jet
1817
1825
1832
1838
Power and the Future of the Navy.-Eberle
1 Defense. -Tones . .
Necessary Economic and Social Welfare of the
Rodgers
arine Co
mentals.
18 His
Growt
can Navy.-Evans
Sovereig
Labor
of Go
lft.-Wilson
afft.
2.- Palmer
Data
Navies
for Old
wned
1845
1858
1871
1882
1897
1916
1925
1933
1938
1944
1954
1961
1967
2036
2045
2047
tional


  p. 1816 (#752)                      #


FUEL OIL
GAS OIL
DIESEL OIL
There is more power in
THAT GOOD GULF GASOLINE
and
SUPREME AUTO OIL
GULF REFINING COMPANY
New York
Boston
New Orleans
Philadelphia
Atlanta
Houston
General Sales Office
PITTSBURGH, PA.